
Chapter 2. Installing and Upgrading MySQL

   This chapter describes how to obtain and install MySQL. A summary
   of the procedure follows and later sections provide the details.
   If you plan to upgrade an existing version of MySQL to a newer
   version rather than install MySQL for the first time, see Section
   2.12.1, "Upgrading MySQL," for information about upgrade
   procedures and about issues that you should consider before
   upgrading.

   If you are interested in migrating to MySQL from another database
   system, you may wish to read Section A.8, "MySQL 5.1 FAQ ---
   Migration," which contains answers to some common questions
   concerning migration issues.

    1. Determine whether MySQL runs and is supported on your
       platform. Please note that not all platforms are equally
       suitable for running MySQL, and that not all platforms on
       which MySQL is known to run are officially supported by Sun
       Microsystems, Inc.:

          + For MySQL Enterprise Server, the officially supported
            platforms are listed at
            http://www.mysql.com/support/supportedplatforms.html.

          + MySQL Community Server runs on the platforms listed at
            Section 2.1.1, "Operating Systems Supported by MySQL
            Community Server."

    2. Choose which distribution to install. Several versions of
       MySQL are available, and most are available in several
       distribution formats. You can choose from pre-packaged
       distributions containing binary (precompiled) programs or
       source code. When in doubt, use a binary distribution. We also
       provide public access to our current source tree for those who
       want to see our most recent developments and help us test new
       code. To determine which version and type of distribution you
       should use, see Section 2.1.2, "Choosing Which MySQL
       Distribution to Install."

    3. Download the distribution that you want to install. For
       instructions, see Section 2.1.3, "How to Get MySQL." To verify
       the integrity of the distribution, use the instructions in
       Section 2.1.4, "Verifying Package Integrity Using MD5
       Checksums or GnuPG."

    4. Install the distribution. To install MySQL from a binary
       distribution, use the instructions in Section 2.2, "Standard
       MySQL Installation Using a Binary Distribution." To install
       MySQL from a source distribution or from the current
       development source tree, use the instructions in Section 2.10,
       "MySQL Installation Using a Source Distribution."
       If you encounter installation difficulties, see Section 2.13,
       "Operating System-Specific Notes," for information on solving
       problems for particular platforms.

    5. Perform any necessary post-installation setup. After
       installing MySQL, read Section 2.11, "Post-Installation Setup
       and Testing." This section contains important information
       about making sure the MySQL server is working properly. It
       also describes how to secure the initial MySQL user accounts,
       which have no passwords until you assign passwords. The
       section applies whether you install MySQL using a binary or
       source distribution.

    6. If you want to run the MySQL benchmark scripts, Perl support
       for MySQL must be available. See Section 2.15, "Perl
       Installation Notes."

2.1. General Installation Issues

   The MySQL installation procedure depends on whether you will
   install MySQL Enterprise Server or MySQL Community Server. The set
   of applicable platforms depends on which distribution you will
   install:

     * For MySQL Enterprise Server, the officially supported
       platforms are listed at
       http://www.mysql.com/support/supportedplatforms.html.

     * MySQL Community Server runs on the platforms listed at Section
       2.1.1, "Operating Systems Supported by MySQL Community
       Server."

   For MySQL Enterprise Server, install the main distribution plus
   any service packs or hotfixes that you wish to apply using the
   Enterprise Installer. For platforms that do not yet have an
   Enterprise Installer, use the Community Server instructions.

   For MySQL Community Server, install the main distribution plus any
   hotfixes and updates:

     * Download a binary release, or download a source release and
       build MySQL yourself from the source code.

     * Retrieve MySQL from the Bazaar tree and build it from source.
       The Bazaar tree contains the latest developer code.

   The immediately following sections contain the information
   necessary to choose, download, and verify your distribution. The
   instructions in later sections of the chapter describe how to
   install the distribution that you choose. For binary
   distributions, see the instructions at Section 2.2, "Standard
   MySQL Installation Using a Binary Distribution." To build MySQL
   from source, use the instructions at Section 2.10, "MySQL
   Installation Using a Source Distribution."

2.1.1. Operating Systems Supported by MySQL Community Server

   This section lists the operating systems on which MySQL Community
   Server is known to run.

Important

   Sun Microsystems, Inc. does not necessarily provide official
   support for all the platforms listed in this section. For
   information about those platforms that are officially supported,
   see MySQL Server Supported Platforms
   (http://www.mysql.com/support/supportedplatforms.html) on the
   MySQL Web site.

   We use GNU Autoconf, so it is possible to port MySQL to all modern
   systems that have a C++ compiler and a working implementation of
   POSIX threads. (Thread support is needed for the server. To
   compile only the client code, the only requirement is a C++
   compiler.)

   MySQL has been reported to compile successfully on the following
   combinations of operating system and thread package.

     * AIX 4.x, 5.x with native threads. See Section 2.13.5.3,
       "IBM-AIX notes."

     * Amiga.

     * FreeBSD 5.x and up with native threads.

     * HP-UX 11.x with the native threads. See Section 2.13.5.2,
       "HP-UX Version 11.x Notes."

     * Linux, builds on all fairly recent Linux distributions with
       glibc 2.3. See Section 2.13.1, "Linux Notes."

     * Mac OS X. See Section 2.13.2, "Mac OS X Notes."

     * NetBSD 1.3/1.4 Intel and NetBSD 1.3 Alpha. See Section
       2.13.4.2, "NetBSD Notes."

     * Novell NetWare 6.0 and 6.5. See Section 2.8, "Installing MySQL
       on NetWare."

     * OpenBSD 2.5 and with native threads. OpenBSD earlier than 2.5
       with the MIT-pthreads package. See Section 2.13.4.3, "OpenBSD
       2.5 Notes."

     * SCO OpenServer 5.0.X with a recent port of the FSU Pthreads
       package. See Section 2.13.5.8, "SCO UNIX and OpenServer 5.0.x
       Notes."

     * SCO Openserver 6.0.x. See Section 2.13.5.9, "SCO OpenServer
       6.0.x Notes."

     * SCO UnixWare 7.1.x. See Section 2.13.5.10, "SCO UnixWare 7.1.x
       and OpenUNIX 8.0.0 Notes."

     * SGI Irix 6.x with native threads. See Section 2.13.5.7, "SGI
       Irix Notes."

     * Solaris 2.5 and above with native threads on SPARC and x86.
       See Section 2.13.3, "Solaris Notes."

     * Tru64 Unix. See Section 2.13.5.5, "Alpha-DEC-UNIX Notes
       (Tru64)."

     * Windows 2000, Windows XP, Windows Vista, Windows Server 2003,
       and Windows Server 2008. See Section 2.3, "Installing MySQL on
       Windows."

   MySQL has also been known to run on other systems in the past. See
   Section 2.13, "Operating System-Specific Notes." Some porting
   effort might be required for current versions of MySQL on these
   systems.

   Not all platforms are equally well-suited for running MySQL. How
   well a certain platform is suited for a high-load mission-critical
   MySQL server is determined by the following factors:

     * General stability of the thread library. A platform may have
       an excellent reputation otherwise, but MySQL is only as stable
       as the thread library it calls, even if everything else is
       perfect.

     * The capability of the kernel and the thread library to take
       advantage of symmetric multi-processor (SMP) systems. In other
       words, when a process creates a thread, it should be possible
       for that thread to run on a CPU different from the original
       process.

     * The capability of the kernel and the thread library to run
       many threads that acquire and release a mutex over a short
       critical region frequently without excessive context switches.
       If the implementation of pthread_mutex_lock() is too anxious
       to yield CPU time, this hurts MySQL tremendously. If this
       issue is not taken care of, adding extra CPUs actually makes
       MySQL slower.

     * General file system stability and performance.

     * Table size. If your tables are large, performance is affected
       by the ability of the file system to deal with large files at
       all and to deal with them efficiently.

     * Our level of expertise here at Sun Microsystems, Inc. with the
       platform. If we know a platform well, we enable
       platform-specific optimizations and fixes at compile time. We
       can also provide advice on configuring your system optimally
       for MySQL.

     * The amount of testing we have done internally for similar
       configurations.

     * The number of users that have run MySQL successfully on the
       platform in similar configurations. If this number is high,
       the likelihood of encountering platform-specific surprises is
       much smaller.

2.1.2. Choosing Which MySQL Distribution to Install

   When preparing to install MySQL, you should decide which version
   to use. MySQL development occurs in several release series, and
   you can pick the one that best fits your needs. After deciding
   which version to install, you can choose a distribution format.
   Releases are available in binary or source format.

2.1.2.1. Choosing Which Version of MySQL to Install

   The first decision to make is whether you want to use a production
   (stable) release or a development release. In the MySQL
   development process, multiple release series co-exist, each at a
   different stage of maturity:

     * MySQL 5.4 and 6.0 are the current development release series.

     * MySQL 5.1 is the current General Availability (Production)
       release series. New releases are issued for bugfixes only; no
       new features are being added that could affect stability.

     * MySQL 5.0 is the previous stable (production-quality) release
       series.

     * MySQL 4.1, 4.0, and 3.23 are old stable (production-quality)
       release series. MySQL 4.1 is now at the end of the product
       lifecycle. Active development and support for these versions
       has ended.
       Extended support for MySQL 4.1 remains available. According to
       the MySQL Lifecycle Policy
       (http://www.mysql.com/company/legal/lifecycle/#policy), only
       Security and Severity Level 1 issues are still being fixed for
       MySQL 4.1.

   We do not believe in a complete code freeze because this prevents
   us from making bugfixes and other fixes that must be done. By
   "somewhat frozen" we mean that we may add small things that should
   not affect anything that currently works in a production release.
   Naturally, relevant bugfixes from an earlier series propagate to
   later series.

   Normally, if you are beginning to use MySQL for the first time or
   trying to port it to some system for which there is no binary
   distribution, go with the General Availability release series.
   Currently, this is MySQL 5.1. All MySQL releases, even those from
   development series, are checked with the MySQL benchmarks and an
   extensive test suite before being issued.

   If you are running an older system and want to upgrade, but do not
   want to take the chance of having a nonseamless upgrade, you
   should upgrade to the latest version in the same release series
   you are using (where only the last part of the version number is
   newer than yours). We have tried to fix only fatal bugs and make
   only small, relatively "safe" changes to that version.

   If you want to use new features not present in the production
   release series, you can use a version from a development series.
   Note that development releases are not as stable as production
   releases.

   If you want to use the very latest sources containing all current
   patches and bugfixes, you can use one of our Bazaar repositories.
   These are not "releases" as such, but are available as previews of
   the code on which future releases are to be based.

   The MySQL naming scheme uses release names that consist of three
   numbers and a suffix; for example, mysql-5.0.12-beta. The numbers
   within the release name are interpreted as follows:

     * The first number (5) is the major version and describes the
       file format. All MySQL 5 releases have the same file format.

     * The second number (0) is the release level. Taken together,
       the major version and release level constitute the release
       series number.

     * The third number (12) is the version number within the release
       series. This is incremented for each new release. Usually you
       want the latest version for the series you have chosen.

   For each minor update, the last number in the version string is
   incremented. When there are major new features or minor
   incompatibilities with previous versions, the second number in the
   version string is incremented. When the file format changes, the
   first number is increased.

   Release names also include a suffix to indicates the stability
   level of the release. Releases within a series progress through a
   set of suffixes to indicate how the stability level improves. The
   possible suffixes are:

     * alpha indicates that the release is for preview purposes only.
       Known bugs should be documented in the News section (see
       Appendix C, "MySQL Change History"). Most alpha releases
       implement new commands and extensions. Active development that
       may involve major code changes can occur in an alpha release.
       However, we do conduct testing before issuing a release.

     * beta indicates that the release is appropriate for use with
       new development. Within beta releases, the features and
       compatibility should remain consistent. However, beta releases
       may contain numerous and major unaddressed bugs.
       All APIs, externally visible structures, and columns for SQL
       statements will not change during future beta, release
       candidate, or production releases.

     * rc indicates a Release Candidate. Release candidates are
       believed to be stable, having passed all of MySQL's internal
       testing, and with all known fatal runtime bugs fixed. However,
       the release has not been in widespread use long enough to know
       for sure that all bugs have been identified. Only minor fixes
       are added. (A release candidate is what formerly was known as
       a gamma release.)

     * If there is no suffix, it indicates that the release is a
       General Availability (GA) or Production release. GA releases
       are stable, having successfully passed through all earlier
       release stages and are believed to be reliable, free of
       serious bugs, and suitable for use in production systems. Only
       critical bugfixes are applied to the release.

   MySQL uses a naming scheme that is slightly different from most
   other products. In general, it is usually safe to use any version
   that has been out for a couple of weeks without being replaced by
   a new version within the same release series.

   All releases of MySQL are run through our standard tests and
   benchmarks to ensure that they are relatively safe to use. Because
   the standard tests are extended over time to check for all
   previously found bugs, the test suite keeps getting better.

   All releases have been tested at least with these tools:

     * An internal test suite
       The mysql-test directory contains an extensive set of test
       cases. We run these tests for every server binary. See Section
       22.1.2, "MySQL Test Suite," for more information about this
       test suite.

     * The MySQL benchmark suite
       This suite runs a range of common queries. It is also a test
       to determine whether the latest batch of optimizations
       actually made the code faster. See Section 7.1.4, "The MySQL
       Benchmark Suite."

     * The crash-me test
       This test tries to determine what features the database
       supports and what its capabilities and limitations are. See
       Section 7.1.4, "The MySQL Benchmark Suite."

   We also test the newest MySQL version in our internal production
   environment, on at least one machine. We have more than 100GB of
   data to work with.

2.1.2.2. Choosing a Distribution Format

   After choosing which version of MySQL to install, you should
   decide whether to use a binary distribution or a source
   distribution. In most cases, you should probably use a binary
   distribution, if one exists for your platform. Binary
   distributions are available in native format for many platforms,
   such as RPM files for Linux or PKG package installers for Mac OS X
   or Solaris. Distributions also are available as Zip archives or
   compressed tar files.

   Reasons to choose a binary distribution include the following:

     * Binary distributions generally are easier to install than
       source distributions.

     * To satisfy different user requirements, we provide several
       servers in binary distributions. mysqld is an optimized server
       that is a smaller, faster binary. mysqld-debug is compiled
       with debugging support.
       Each of these servers is compiled from the same source
       distribution, though with different configuration options. All
       native MySQL clients can connect to servers from either MySQL
       version.

   Under some circumstances, you may be better off installing MySQL
   from a source distribution:

     * You want to install MySQL at some explicit location. The
       standard binary distributions are ready to run at any
       installation location, but you might require even more
       flexibility to place MySQL components where you want.

     * You want to configure mysqld to ensure that features are
       available that might not be included in the standard binary
       distributions. Here is a list of the most common extra options
       that you may want to use to ensure feature availability:

          + --with-libwrap

          + --with-named-z-libs (this is done for some of the
            binaries)

          + --with-debug[=full]

     * You want to configure mysqld without some features that are
       included in the standard binary distributions. For example,
       distributions normally are compiled with support for all
       character sets. If you want a smaller MySQL server, you can
       recompile it with support for only the character sets you
       need.

     * You have a special compiler (such as pgcc) or want to use
       compiler options that are better optimized for your processor.
       Binary distributions are compiled with options that should
       work on a variety of processors from the same processor
       family.

     * You want to use the latest sources from one of the Bazaar
       repositories to have access to all current bugfixes. For
       example, if you have found a bug and reported it to the MySQL
       development team, the bugfix is committed to the source
       repository and you can access it there. The bugfix does not
       appear in a release until a release actually is issued.

     * You want to read (or modify) the C and C++ code that makes up
       MySQL. For this purpose, you should get a source distribution,
       because the source code is always the ultimate manual.

     * Source distributions contain more tests and examples than
       binary distributions.

2.1.2.3. How and When Updates Are Released

   MySQL is evolving quite rapidly and we want to share new
   developments with other MySQL users. We try to produce a new
   release whenever we have new and useful features that others also
   seem to have a need for.

   We also try to help users who request features that are easy to
   implement. We take note of what our licensed users want, and we
   especially take note of what our support customers want and try to
   help them in this regard.

   No one is required to download a new release. The News section
   helps you determine whether the new release has something you
   really want. See Appendix C, "MySQL Change History."

   We use the following policy when updating MySQL:

     * Enterprise Server releases are meant to appear every 18
       months, supplemented by quarterly service packs and monthly
       rapid updates. Community Server releases are meant to appear
       2-3 times per year.

     * Releases are issued within each series. For each release, the
       last number in the version is one more than the previous
       release within the same series.

     * Binary distributions for some platforms are made by us for
       major releases. Other people may make binary distributions for
       other systems, but probably less frequently.

     * We make fixes available as soon as we have identified and
       corrected small or noncritical but annoying bugs. The fixes
       are available in source form immediately from our public
       Bazaar repositories, and are included in the next release.

     * If by any chance a security vulnerability or critical bug is
       found in a release, our policy is to fix it in a new release
       as soon as possible. (We would like other companies to do
       this, too!)

2.1.2.4. MySQL Binaries Compiled by Sun Microsystems, Inc.

   Sun Microsystems, Inc. provides a set of binary distributions of
   MySQL. In addition to binaries provided in platform-specific
   package formats, we offer binary distributions for a number of
   platforms in the form of compressed tar files (.tar.gz files). See
   Section 2.2, "Standard MySQL Installation Using a Binary
   Distribution." For Windows distributions, see Section 2.3,
   "Installing MySQL on Windows."

   If you want to compile a debug version of MySQL from a source
   distribution, you should add --with-debug or --with-debug=full to
   the configure command used to configure the distribution and
   remove any -fomit-frame-pointer options.

2.1.3. How to Get MySQL

   Check our downloads page at http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/ for
   information about the current version of MySQL and for downloading
   instructions. For a complete up-to-date list of MySQL download
   mirror sites, see http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/mirrors.html. You
   can also find information there about becoming a MySQL mirror site
   and how to report a bad or out-of-date mirror.

   Our main mirror is located at http://mirrors.sunsite.dk/mysql/.

2.1.4. Verifying Package Integrity Using MD5 Checksums or GnuPG

   After you have downloaded the MySQL package that suits your needs
   and before you attempt to install it, you should make sure that it
   is intact and has not been tampered with. There are three means of
   integrity checking:

     * MD5 checksums

     * Cryptographic signatures using GnuPG, the GNU Privacy Guard

     * For RPM packages, the built-in RPM integrity verification
       mechanism

   The following sections describe how to use these methods.

   If you notice that the MD5 checksum or GPG signatures do not
   match, first try to download the respective package one more time,
   perhaps from another mirror site. If you repeatedly cannot
   successfully verify the integrity of the package, please notify us
   about such incidents, including the full package name and the
   download site you have been using, at webmaster@mysql.com or
   build@mysql.com. Do not report downloading problems using the
   bug-reporting system.

2.1.4.1. Verifying the MD5 Checksum

   After you have downloaded a MySQL package, you should make sure
   that its MD5 checksum matches the one provided on the MySQL
   download pages. Each package has an individual checksum that you
   can verify with the following command, where package_name is the
   name of the package you downloaded:
shell> md5sum package_name

   Example:
shell> md5sum mysql-standard-5.1.39-linux-i686.tar.gz
aaab65abbec64d5e907dcd41b8699945  mysql-standard-5.1.39-linux-i686.ta
r.gz

   You should verify that the resulting checksum (the string of
   hexadecimal digits) matches the one displayed on the download page
   immediately below the respective package.

Note

   Make sure to verify the checksum of the archive file (for example,
   the .zip or .tar.gz file) and not of the files that are contained
   inside of the archive.

   Note that not all operating systems support the md5sum command. On
   some, it is simply called md5, and others do not ship it at all.
   On Linux, it is part of the GNU Text Utilities package, which is
   available for a wide range of platforms. You can download the
   source code from http://www.gnu.org/software/textutils/ as well.
   If you have OpenSSL installed, you can use the command openssl md5
   package_name instead. A Windows implementation of the md5 command
   line utility is available from http://www.fourmilab.ch/md5/.
   winMd5Sum is a graphical MD5 checking tool that can be obtained
   from http://www.nullriver.com/index/products/winmd5sum.

2.1.4.2. Signature Checking Using GnuPG

   Another method of verifying the integrity and authenticity of a
   package is to use cryptographic signatures. This is more reliable
   than using MD5 checksums, but requires more work.

   We sign MySQL downloadable packages with GnuPG (GNU Privacy
   Guard). GnuPG is an Open Source alternative to the well-known
   Pretty Good Privacy (PGP) by Phil Zimmermann. See
   http://www.gnupg.org/ for more information about GnuPG and how to
   obtain and install it on your system. Most Linux distributions
   ship with GnuPG installed by default. For more information about
   GnuPG, see http://www.openpgp.org/.

   To verify the signature for a specific package, you first need to
   obtain a copy of our public GPG build key, which you can download
   from http://keyserver.pgp.com/. The key that you want to obtain is
   named build@mysql.com. Alternatively, you can cut and paste the
   key directly from the following text:
-----BEGIN PGP PUBLIC KEY BLOCK-----
Version: GnuPG v1.0.6 (GNU/Linux)
Comment: For info see http://www.gnupg.org
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=Xquv
-----END PGP PUBLIC KEY BLOCK-----

   To import the build key into your personal public GPG keyring, use
   gpg --import. For example, if you have saved the key in a file
   named mysql_pubkey.asc, the import command looks like this:
shell> gpg --import mysql_pubkey.asc
gpg: key 5072E1F5: public key "MySQL Package signing key (www.mysql.c
om) <build@mysql.com>" imported
gpg: Total number processed: 1
gpg:               imported: 1
gpg: no ultimately trusted keys found

   You can also download the key from the public keyserver using the
   public key id, 5072E1F5:
shell> gpg --recv-keys 5072E1F5
gpg: requesting key 5072E1F5 from hkp server subkeys.pgp.net
gpg: key 5072E1F5: "MySQL Package signing key (www.mysql.com) <build@
mysql.com>" 2 new signatures
gpg: no ultimately trusted keys found
gpg: Total number processed: 1
gpg:         new signatures: 2

   If you want to import the key into your RPM configuration to
   validate RPM install packages, you should be able to import the
   key directly:
shell> rpm --import mysql_pubkey.asc

   If you experience problems, try exporting the key from gpg and
   importing:
shell> gpg --export -a 5072e1f5 > 5072e1f5.asc
shell> rpm --import 5072e1f5.asc

   Alternatively, rpm also supports loading the key directly from a
   URL, and you cas use this manual page:
shell> rpm --import http://dev.mysql.com/doc/refman/5.1/en/checking-g
pg-signature.html

   After you have downloaded and imported the public build key,
   download your desired MySQL package and the corresponding
   signature, which also is available from the download page. The
   signature file has the same name as the distribution file with an
   .asc extension, as shown by the examples in the following table.
   Distribution file mysql-standard-5.1.39-linux-i686.tar.gz
   Signature file    mysql-standard-5.1.39-linux-i686.tar.gz.asc

   Make sure that both files are stored in the same directory and
   then run the following command to verify the signature for the
   distribution file:
shell> gpg --verify package_name.asc

   Example:
shell> gpg --verify mysql-standard-5.1.39-linux-i686.tar.gz.asc
gpg: Signature made Tue 12 Jul 2005 23:35:41 EST using DSA key ID 507
2E1F5
gpg: Good signature from "MySQL Package signing key (www.mysql.com) <
build@mysql.com>"

   The Good signature message indicates that everything is all right.
   You can ignore any insecure memory warning you might obtain.

   See the GPG documentation for more information on how to work with
   public keys.

2.1.4.3. Signature Checking Using RPM

   For RPM packages, there is no separate signature. RPM packages
   have a built-in GPG signature and MD5 checksum. You can verify a
   package by running the following command:
shell> rpm --checksig package_name.rpm

   Example:
shell> rpm --checksig MySQL-server-5.1.39-0.glibc23.i386.rpm
MySQL-server-5.1.39-0.glibc23.i386.rpm: md5 gpg OK

Note

   If you are using RPM 4.1 and it complains about (GPG) NOT OK
   (MISSING KEYS: GPG#5072e1f5), even though you have imported the
   MySQL public build key into your own GPG keyring, you need to
   import the key into the RPM keyring first. RPM 4.1 no longer uses
   your personal GPG keyring (or GPG itself). Rather, it maintains
   its own keyring because it is a system-wide application and a
   user's GPG public keyring is a user-specific file. To import the
   MySQL public key into the RPM keyring, first obtain the key as
   described in Section 2.1.4.2, "Signature Checking Using GnuPG."
   Then use rpm --import to import the key. For example, if you have
   saved the public key in a file named mysql_pubkey.asc, import it
   using this command:
shell> rpm --import mysql_pubkey.asc

   If you need to obtain the MySQL public key, see Section 2.1.4.2,
   "Signature Checking Using GnuPG."

2.1.5. Installation Layouts

   This section describes the default layout of the directories
   created by installing binary or source distributions provided by
   Sun Microsystems, Inc. A distribution provided by another vendor
   might use a layout different from those shown here.

   For MySQL 5.1 on Windows, the default installation directory is
   C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1. (Some Windows users
   prefer to install in C:\mysql, the directory that formerly was
   used as the default. However, the layout of the subdirectories
   remains the same.) The installation directory has the following
   subdirectories.
   Directory Contents of Directory
   bin       Client programs and the mysqld server
   data      Log files, databases
   Docs      Manual in CHM format
   examples  Example programs and scripts
   include   Include (header) files
   lib       Libraries
   scripts   Utility scripts
   share     Error message files

   Installations created from our Linux RPM distributions result in
   files under the following system directories.
   Directory            Contents of Directory
   /usr/bin             Client programs and scripts
   /usr/sbin            The mysqld server
   /var/lib/mysql       Log files, databases
   /usr/share/info      Manual in Info format
   /usr/share/man       Unix manual pages
   /usr/include/mysql   Include (header) files
   /usr/lib/mysql       Libraries
   /usr/share/mysql     Error message and character set files
   /usr/share/sql-bench Benchmarks

   On Unix, a tar file binary distribution is installed by unpacking
   it at the installation location you choose (typically
   /usr/local/mysql) and creates the following directories in that
   location.
   Directory   Contents of Directory
   bin         Client programs and the mysqld server
   data        Log files, databases
   docs        Manual in Info format
   man         Unix manual pages
   include     Include (header) files
   lib         Libraries
   scripts     mysql_install_db
   share/mysql Error message files
   sql-bench   Benchmarks

   A source distribution is installed after you configure and compile
   it. By default, the installation step installs files under
   /usr/local, in the following subdirectories.
   Directory     Contents of Directory
   bin           Client programs and scripts
   include/mysql Include (header) files
   Docs          Manual in Info, CHM formats
   man           Unix manual pages
   lib/mysql     Libraries
   libexec       The mysqld server
   share/mysql   Error message files
   sql-bench     Benchmarks and crash-me test
   var           Databases and log files

   Within its installation directory, the layout of a source
   installation differs from that of a binary installation in the
   following ways:

     * The mysqld server is installed in the libexec directory rather
       than in the bin directory.

     * The data directory is var rather than data.

     * mysql_install_db is installed in the bin directory rather than
       in the scripts directory.

     * The header file and library directories are include/mysql and
       lib/mysql rather than include and lib.

   You can create your own binary installation from a compiled source
   distribution by executing the scripts/make_binary_distribution
   script from the top directory of the source distribution.

2.2. Standard MySQL Installation Using a Binary Distribution

   The next several sections cover the installation of MySQL on
   platforms where we offer packages using the native packaging
   format of the respective platform. (This is also known as
   performing a "binary install.") However, binary distributions of
   MySQL are available for many other platforms as well. See Section
   2.9, "Installing MySQL from tar.gz Packages on Other Unix-Like
   Systems," for generic installation instructions for these packages
   that apply to all platforms.

   See Section 2.1, "General Installation Issues," for more
   information on what other binary distributions are available and
   how to obtain them.

2.3. Installing MySQL on Windows

   A native Windows distribution of MySQL has been available since
   version 3.21 and represents a sizable percentage of the daily
   downloads of MySQL. This section describes the process for
   installing MySQL on Windows.

Note

   If you are upgrading MySQL from an existing installation older
   than MySQL 4.1.5, you must first perform the procedure described
   in Section 2.3.14, "Upgrading MySQL on Windows."

   To run MySQL on Windows, you need the following:

     * A Windows operating system such as Windows 2000, Windows XP,
       Windows Vista, Windows Server 2003, or Windows Server 2008.
       Both 32-bit and 64-bit versions are supported.
       A Windows operating system permits you to run the MySQL server
       as a service. See Section 2.3.11, "Starting MySQL as a Windows
       Service."
       Generally, you should install MySQL on Windows using an
       account that has administrator rights. Otherwise, you may
       encounter problems with certain operations such as editing the
       PATH environment variable or accessing the Service Control
       Manager. Once installed, MySQL does not need to be executed
       using a user with Administrator privileges.

     * TCP/IP protocol support.

     * Enough space on the hard drive to unpack, install, and create
       the databases in accordance with your requirements (generally
       a minimum of 200 megabytes is recommended.)

   For a list of limitations within the Windows version of MySQL, see
   Section D.7.3, "Windows Platform Limitations."

   There may also be other requirements, depending on how you plan to
   use MySQL:

     * If you plan to connect to the MySQL server via ODBC, you need
       a Connector/ODBC driver. See Section 21.1, "MySQL
       Connector/ODBC."

     * If you plan to use MySQL server with ADO.NET applications, you
       need the Connector/NET driver. See Section 21.2, "MySQL
       Connector/NET."

     * If you need tables with a size larger than 4GB, install MySQL
       on an NTFS or newer file system. Don't forget to use MAX_ROWS
       and AVG_ROW_LENGTH when you create tables. See Section
       12.1.17, "CREATE TABLE Syntax."

   MySQL for Windows is available in several distribution formats:

     * Binary distributions are available that contain a setup
       program that installs everything you need so that you can
       start the server immediately. Another binary distribution
       format contains an archive that you simply unpack in the
       installation location and then configure yourself. For
       details, see Section 2.3.1, "Choosing An Installation
       Package."

     * The source distribution contains all the code and support
       files for building the executables using the Visual Studio
       compiler system.

   Generally speaking, you should use a binary distribution that
   includes an installer. It is simpler to use than the others, and
   you need no additional tools to get MySQL up and running. The
   installer for the Windows version of MySQL, combined with a GUI
   Configuration Wizard, automatically installs MySQL, creates an
   option file, starts the server, and secures the default user
   accounts.

Caution

   Using virus scanning software such as Norton/Symantec Anti-Virus
   on directories containing MySQL data and temporary tables can
   cause issues, both in terms of the performance of MySQL and the
   virus-scanning software mis-identifying the contents of the files
   as containing spam. This is because of the fingerprinting
   mechanism used by the virus scanning software, and the way in
   which MySQL rapidly updates different files, which may be
   identified as a potential security risk.

   After installing MySQL Server, it is recommended that you disable
   virus scanning on the main directory (datadir) being used to store
   your MySQL table data. There is usually a system built into the
   virus scanning software to allow certain directories to be
   specifically ignored during virus scanning.

   In addition, by default, MySQL creates temporary files in the
   standard Windows temporary directory. To prevent the temporary
   files also being scanned, you should configure a separate
   temporary directory for MySQL temporary files and add this to the
   virus scanning exclusion list. To do this, add a configuration
   option for the tmpdir parameter to your my.ini configuration file.
   For more information, see Section 2.3.7, "Creating an Option
   File."

   The following section describes how to install MySQL on Windows
   using a binary distribution. To use an installation package that
   does not include an installer, follow the procedure described in
   Section 2.3.5, "Installing MySQL from a Noinstall Zip Archive." To
   install using a source distribution, see Section 2.10.6,
   "Installing MySQL from Source on Windows."

   MySQL distributions for Windows can be downloaded from
   http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/. See Section 2.1.3, "How to Get
   MySQL."

2.3.1. Choosing An Installation Package

   For MySQL 5.1, there are three installation packages to choose
   from when installing MySQL on Windows:

     * The Essentials Package: This package has a file name similar
       to mysql-essential-5.1.39-win32.msi and contains the minimum
       set of files needed to install MySQL on Windows, including the
       Configuration Wizard. This package does not include optional
       components such as the embedded server and benchmark suite.

     * The Complete Package: This package has a file name similar to
       mysql-5.1.39-win32.zip and contains all files needed for a
       complete Windows installation, including the Configuration
       Wizard. This package includes optional components such as the
       embedded server and benchmark suite.

     * The Noinstall Archive: This package has a file name similar to
       mysql-noinstall-5.1.39-win32.zip and contains all the files
       found in the Complete install package, with the exception of
       the Configuration Wizard. This package does not include an
       automated installer, and must be manually installed and
       configured.

   The Essentials package is recommended for most users. It is
   provided as an .msi file for use with the Windows Installer. The
   Complete and Noinstall distributions are packaged as Zip archives.
   To use them, you must have a tool that can unpack .zip files.

   Your choice of install package affects the installation process
   you must follow. If you choose to install either the Essentials or
   Complete install packages, see Section 2.3.2, "Installing MySQL
   with the Automated Installer." If you choose to install MySQL from
   the Noinstall archive, see Section 2.3.5, "Installing MySQL from a
   Noinstall Zip Archive."

2.3.2. Installing MySQL with the Automated Installer

   New MySQL users can use the MySQL Installation Wizard and MySQL
   Configuration Wizard to install MySQL on Windows. These are
   designed to install and configure MySQL in such a way that new
   users can immediately get started using MySQL.

   The MySQL Installation Wizard and MySQL Configuration Wizard are
   available in the Essentials and Complete install packages. They
   are recommended for most standard MySQL installations. Exceptions
   include users who need to install multiple instances of MySQL on a
   single server host and advanced users who want complete control of
   server configuration.

2.3.3. Using the MySQL Installation Wizard

   MySQL Installation Wizard is an installer for the MySQL server
   that uses the latest installer technologies for Microsoft Windows.
   The MySQL Installation Wizard, in combination with the MySQL
   Configuration Wizard, allows a user to install and configure a
   MySQL server that is ready for use immediately after installation.

   The MySQL Installation Wizard is the standard installer for all
   MySQL server distributions, version 4.1.5 and higher. Users of
   previous versions of MySQL need to shut down and remove their
   existing MySQL installations manually before installing MySQL with
   the MySQL Installation Wizard. See Section 2.3.3.6, "Upgrading
   MySQL with the Installation Wizard," for more information on
   upgrading from a previous version.

   Microsoft has included an improved version of their Microsoft
   Windows Installer (MSI) in the recent versions of Windows. MSI has
   become the de-facto standard for application installations on
   Windows 2000, Windows XP, and Windows Server 2003. The MySQL
   Installation Wizard makes use of this technology to provide a
   smoother and more flexible installation process.

   The Microsoft Windows Installer Engine was updated with the
   release of Windows XP; those using a previous version of Windows
   can reference this Microsoft Knowledge Base article
   (http://support.microsoft.com/default.aspx?scid=kb;EN-US;292539)
   for information on upgrading to the latest version of the Windows
   Installer Engine.

   In addition, Microsoft has introduced the WiX (Windows Installer
   XML) toolkit recently. This is the first highly acknowledged Open
   Source project from Microsoft. We have switched to WiX because it
   is an Open Source project and it allows us to handle the complete
   Windows installation process in a flexible manner using scripts.

   Improving the MySQL Installation Wizard depends on the support and
   feedback of users like you. If you find that the MySQL
   Installation Wizard is lacking some feature important to you, or
   if you discover a bug, please report it in our bugs database using
   the instructions given in Section 1.6, "How to Report Bugs or
   Problems."

2.3.3.1. Downloading and Starting the MySQL Installation Wizard

   The MySQL installation packages can be downloaded from
   http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/. If the package you download is
   contained within a Zip archive, you need to extract the archive
   first.

Note

   If you are installing on Windows Vista it is best to open a
   network port before beginning the installation. To do this, first
   ensure that you are logged in as an Administrator, go to the
   Control Panel, and double click the Windows Firewall icon. Choose
   the Allow a program through Windows Firewall option and click the
   Add port button. Enter MySQL into the Name text box and 3306 (or
   the port of your choice) into the Port number text box. Also
   ensure that the TCP protocol radio button is selected. If you
   wish, you can also limit access to the MySQL server by choosing
   the Change scope button. Confirm your choices by clicking the OK
   button. If you do not open a port prior to installation, you
   cannot configure the MySQL server immediately after installation.
   Additionally, when running the MySQL Installation Wizard on
   Windows Vista, ensure that you are logged in as a user with
   administrative rights.

   The process for starting the wizard depends on the contents of the
   installation package you download. If there is a setup.exe file
   present, double-click it to start the installation process. If
   there is an .msi file present, double-click it to start the
   installation process.

2.3.3.2. Choosing an Install Type

   There are three installation types available: Typical, Complete,
   and Custom.

   The Typical installation type installs the MySQL server, the mysql
   command-line client, and the command-line utilities. The
   command-line clients and utilities include mysqldump, myisamchk,
   and several other tools to help you manage the MySQL server.

   The Complete installation type installs all components included in
   the installation package. The full installation package includes
   components such as the embedded server library, the benchmark
   suite, support scripts, and documentation.

   The Custom installation type gives you complete control over which
   packages you wish to install and the installation path that is
   used. See Section 2.3.3.3, "The Custom Install Dialog," for more
   information on performing a custom install.

   If you choose the Typical or Complete installation types and click
   the Next button, you advance to the confirmation screen to verify
   your choices and begin the installation. If you choose the Custom
   installation type and click the Next button, you advance to the
   custom installation dialog, described in Section 2.3.3.3, "The
   Custom Install Dialog."

2.3.3.3. The Custom Install Dialog

   If you wish to change the installation path or the specific
   components that are installed by the MySQL Installation Wizard,
   choose the Custom installation type.

   A tree view on the left side of the custom install dialog lists
   all available components. Components that are not installed have a
   red X icon; components that are installed have a gray icon. To
   change whether a component is installed, click on that component's
   icon and choose a new option from the drop-down list that appears.

   You can change the default installation path by clicking the
   Change... button to the right of the displayed installation path.

   After choosing your installation components and installation path,
   click the Next button to advance to the confirmation dialog.

2.3.3.4. The Confirmation Dialog

   Once you choose an installation type and optionally choose your
   installation components, you advance to the confirmation dialog.
   Your installation type and installation path are displayed for you
   to review.

   To install MySQL if you are satisfied with your settings, click
   the Install button. To change your settings, click the Back
   button. To exit the MySQL Installation Wizard without installing
   MySQL, click the Cancel button.

   After installation is complete, you have the option of registering
   with the MySQL web site. Registration gives you access to post in
   the MySQL forums at forums.mysql.com (http://forums.mysql.com),
   along with the ability to report bugs at bugs.mysql.com
   (http://bugs.mysql.com) and to subscribe to our newsletter. The
   final screen of the installer provides a summary of the
   installation and gives you the option to launch the MySQL
   Configuration Wizard, which you can use to create a configuration
   file, install the MySQL service, and configure security settings.

2.3.3.5. Changes Made by MySQL Installation Wizard

   Once you click the Install button, the MySQL Installation Wizard
   begins the installation process and makes certain changes to your
   system which are described in the sections that follow.

   Changes to the Registry

   The MySQL Installation Wizard creates one Windows registry key in
   a typical install situation, located in
   HKEY_LOCAL_MACHINE\SOFTWARE\MySQL AB.

   The MySQL Installation Wizard creates a key named after the major
   version of the server that is being installed, such as MySQL
   Server 5.1. It contains two string values, Location and Version.
   The Location string contains the path to the installation
   directory. In a default installation it contains C:\Program
   Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\. The Version string contains the
   release number. For example, for an installation of MySQL Server
   5.1.39, the key contains a value of 5.1.39.

   These registry keys are used to help external tools identify the
   installed location of the MySQL server, preventing a complete scan
   of the hard-disk to determine the installation path of the MySQL
   server. The registry keys are not required to run the server, and
   if you install MySQL using the noinstall Zip archive, the registry
   keys are not created.

   Changes to the Start Menu

   The MySQL Installation Wizard creates a new entry in the Windows
   Start menu under a common MySQL menu heading named after the major
   version of MySQL that you have installed. For example, if you
   install MySQL 5.1, the MySQL Installation Wizard creates a MySQL
   Server 5.1 section in the Start menu.

   The following entries are created within the new Start menu
   section:

     * MySQL Command Line Client: This is a shortcut to the mysql
       command-line client and is configured to connect as the root
       user. The shortcut prompts for a root user password when you
       connect.

     * MySQL Server Instance Config Wizard: This is a shortcut to the
       MySQL Configuration Wizard. Use this shortcut to configure a
       newly installed server, or to reconfigure an existing server.

     * MySQL Documentation: This is a link to the MySQL server
       documentation that is stored locally in the MySQL server
       installation directory. This option is not available when the
       MySQL server is installed using the Essentials installation
       package.

   Changes to the File System

   The MySQL Installation Wizard by default installs the MySQL 5.1
   server to C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1, where Program
   Files is the default location for applications in your system, and
   5.1 is the major version of your MySQL server. This is the
   recommended location for the MySQL server, replacing the former
   default location C:\mysql.

   By default, all MySQL applications are stored in a common
   directory at C:\Program Files\MySQL, where Program Files is the
   default location for applications in your Windows installation. A
   typical MySQL installation on a developer machine might look like
   this:
C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1
C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Workbench 5.1 OSS

   This approach makes it easier to manage and maintain all MySQL
   applications installed on a particular system.

   In MySQL 5.1.23 and earlier, the default location for the data
   files used by MySQL is located within the corresponding MySQL
   Server installation directory. For MySQL 5.1.24 and later, the
   default location of the data directory is the AppData directory
   configured for the user that installed the MySQL application.

2.3.3.6. Upgrading MySQL with the Installation Wizard

   The MySQL Installation Wizard can perform server upgrades
   automatically using the upgrade capabilities of MSI. That means
   you do not need to remove a previous installation manually before
   installing a new release. The installer automatically shuts down
   and removes the previous MySQL service before installing the new
   version.

   Automatic upgrades are available only when upgrading between
   installations that have the same major and minor version numbers.
   For example, you can upgrade automatically from MySQL 4.1.5 to
   MySQL 4.1.6, but not from MySQL 5.0 to MySQL 5.1.

   See Section 2.3.14, "Upgrading MySQL on Windows."

2.3.4. MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard

   The MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard helps automate the
   process of configuring your server. It creates a custom MySQL
   configuration file (my.ini or my.cnf) by asking you a series of
   questions and then applying your responses to a template to
   generate the configuration file that is tuned to your
   installation.

   The MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard is included with
   the MySQL 5.1 server. The MySQL Server Instance Configuration
   Wizard is only available for Windows.

2.3.4.1. Starting the MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard

   The MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard is normally started
   as part of the installation process. You should only need to run
   the MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard again when you need
   to change the configuration parameters of your server.

   If you chose not to open a port prior to installing MySQL on
   Windows Vista, you can choose to use the MySQL Server
   Configuration Wizard after installation. However, you must open a
   port in the Windows Firewall. To do this see the instructions
   given in Section 2.3.3.1, "Downloading and Starting the MySQL
   Installation Wizard." Rather than opening a port, you also have
   the option of adding MySQL as a program that bypasses the Windows
   Firewall. One or the other option is sufficient --- you need not
   do both. Additionally, when running the MySQL Server Configuration
   Wizard on Windows Vista ensure that you are logged in as a user
   with administrative rights.
   MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard

   You can launch the MySQL Configuration Wizard by clicking the
   MySQL Server Instance Config Wizard entry in the MySQL section of
   the Windows Start menu.

   Alternatively, you can navigate to the bin directory of your MySQL
   installation and launch the MySQLInstanceConfig.exe file directly.

   The MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard places the my.ini
   file in the installation directory for the MySQL server. This
   helps associate configuration files with particular server
   instances.

   To ensure that the MySQL server knows where to look for the my.ini
   file, an argument similar to this is passed to the MySQL server as
   part of the service installation:
--defaults-file="C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\my.ini"

   Here, C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1 is replaced with the
   installation path to the MySQL Server. The --defaults-file option
   instructs the MySQL server to read the specified file for
   configuration options when it starts.

   Apart from making changes to the my.ini file by running the MySQL
   Server Instance Configuration Wizard again, you can modify it by
   opening it with a text editor and making any necessary changes.
   You can also modify the server configuration with the MySQL
   Administrator (http://www.mysql.com/products/administrator/)
   utility. For more information about server configuration, see
   Section 5.1.2, "Server Command Options."

   MySQL clients and utilities such as the mysql and mysqldump
   command-line clients are not able to locate the my.ini file
   located in the server installation directory. To configure the
   client and utility applications, create a new my.ini file in the
   Windows installation directory (for example, C:\WINDOWS).

   Under Windows Server 2003, Windows Server 2000, Windows XP, and
   Windows Vista MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard will
   configure MySQL to work as a Windows service. To start and stop
   MySQL you use the Services application that is supplied as part of
   the Windows Administrator Tools.

2.3.4.2. Choosing a Maintenance Option

   If the MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard detects an
   existing configuration file, you have the option of either
   reconfiguring your existing server, or removing the server
   instance by deleting the configuration file and stopping and
   removing the MySQL service.

   To reconfigure an existing server, choose the Re-configure
   Instance option and click the Next button. Any existing
   configuration file is not overwritten, but renamed (within the
   same directory) using a timestamp (Windows) or sequential number
   (Linux). To remove the existing server instance, choose the Remove
   Instance option and click the Next button.

   If you choose the Remove Instance option, you advance to a
   confirmation window. Click the Execute button. The MySQL Server
   Configuration Wizard stops and removes the MySQL service, and then
   deletes the configuration file. The server installation and its
   data folder are not removed.

   If you choose the Re-configure Instance option, you advance to the
   Configuration Type dialog where you can choose the type of
   installation that you wish to configure.

2.3.4.3. Choosing a Configuration Type

   When you start the MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard for
   a new MySQL installation, or choose the Re-configure Instance
   option for an existing installation, you advance to the
   Configuration Type dialog.
   MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard: Configuration Type

   There are two configuration types available: Detailed
   Configuration and Standard Configuration. The Standard
   Configuration option is intended for new users who want to get
   started with MySQL quickly without having to make many decisions
   about server configuration. The Detailed Configuration option is
   intended for advanced users who want more fine-grained control
   over server configuration.

   If you are new to MySQL and need a server configured as a
   single-user developer machine, the Standard Configuration should
   suit your needs. Choosing the Standard Configuration option causes
   the MySQL Configuration Wizard to set all configuration options
   automatically with the exception of Service Options and Security
   Options.

   The Standard Configuration sets options that may be incompatible
   with systems where there are existing MySQL installations. If you
   have an existing MySQL installation on your system in addition to
   the installation you wish to configure, the Detailed Configuration
   option is recommended.

   To complete the Standard Configuration, please refer to the
   sections on Service Options and Security Options in Section
   2.3.4.10, "The Service Options Dialog," and Section 2.3.4.11, "The
   Security Options Dialog," respectively.

2.3.4.4. The Server Type Dialog

   There are three different server types available to choose from.
   The server type that you choose affects the decisions that the
   MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard makes with regard to
   memory, disk, and processor usage.
   MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard: Server Type

     * Developer Machine: Choose this option for a typical desktop
       workstation where MySQL is intended only for personal use. It
       is assumed that many other desktop applications are running.
       The MySQL server is configured to use minimal system
       resources.

     * Server Machine: Choose this option for a server machine where
       the MySQL server is running alongside other server
       applications such as FTP, email, and Web servers. The MySQL
       server is configured to use a moderate portion of the system
       resources.

     * Dedicated MySQL Server Machine: Choose this option for a
       server machine that is intended to run only the MySQL server.
       It is assumed that no other applications are running. The
       MySQL server is configured to use all available system
       resources.

Note

   By selecting one of the preconfigured configurations, the values
   and settings of various options in your my.cnf or my.ini will be
   altered accordingly. The default values and options as described
   in the reference manual may therefore be different to the options
   and values that were created during the execution of the
   configuration wizard.

2.3.4.5. The Database Usage Dialog

   The Database Usage dialog allows you to indicate the storage
   engines that you expect to use when creating MySQL tables. The
   option you choose determines whether the InnoDB storage engine is
   available and what percentage of the server resources are
   available to InnoDB.
   MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard: Usage Dialog

     * Multifunctional Database: This option enables both the InnoDB
       and MyISAM storage engines and divides resources evenly
       between the two. This option is recommended for users who use
       both storage engines on a regular basis.

     * Transactional Database Only: This option enables both the
       InnoDB and MyISAM storage engines, but dedicates most server
       resources to the InnoDB storage engine. This option is
       recommended for users who use InnoDB almost exclusively and
       make only minimal use of MyISAM.

     * Non-Transactional Database Only: This option disables the
       InnoDB storage engine completely and dedicates all server
       resources to the MyISAM storage engine. This option is
       recommended for users who do not use InnoDB.

   The Configuration Wizard uses a template to generate the server
   configuration file. The Database Usage dialog sets one of the
   following option strings:
Multifunctional Database:        MIXED
Transactional Database Only:     INNODB
Non-Transactional Database Only: MYISAM

   When these options are processed through the default template
   (my-template.ini) the result is:
Multifunctional Database:
default-storage-engine=InnoDB
_myisam_pct=50

Transactional Database Only:
default-storage-engine=InnoDB
_myisam_pct=5

Non-Transactional Database Only:
default-storage-engine=MyISAM
_myisam_pct=100
skip-innodb

   The _myisam_pct value is used to calculate the percentage of
   resources dedicated to MyISAM. The remaining resources are
   allocated to InnoDB.

2.3.4.6. The InnoDB Tablespace Dialog

   Some users may want to locate the InnoDB tablespace files in a
   different location than the MySQL server data directory. Placing
   the tablespace files in a separate location can be desirable if
   your system has a higher capacity or higher performance storage
   device available, such as a RAID storage system.
   MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard: InnoDB Data Tablespace

   To change the default location for the InnoDB tablespace files,
   choose a new drive from the drop-down list of drive letters and
   choose a new path from the drop-down list of paths. To create a
   custom path, click the ... button.

   If you are modifying the configuration of an existing server, you
   must click the Modify button before you change the path. In this
   situation you must move the existing tablespace files to the new
   location manually before starting the server.

2.3.4.7. The Concurrent Connections Dialog

   To prevent the server from running out of resources, it is
   important to limit the number of concurrent connections to the
   MySQL server that can be established. The Concurrent Connections
   dialog allows you to choose the expected usage of your server, and
   sets the limit for concurrent connections accordingly. It is also
   possible to set the concurrent connection limit manually.
   MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard: Connections

     * Decision Support (DSS)/OLAP: Choose this option if your server
       does not require a large number of concurrent connections. The
       maximum number of connections is set at 100, with an average
       of 20 concurrent connections assumed.

     * Online Transaction Processing (OLTP): Choose this option if
       your server requires a large number of concurrent connections.
       The maximum number of connections is set at 500.

     * Manual Setting: Choose this option to set the maximum number
       of concurrent connections to the server manually. Choose the
       number of concurrent connections from the drop-down box
       provided, or enter the maximum number of connections into the
       drop-down box if the number you desire is not listed.

2.3.4.8. The Networking and Strict Mode Options Dialog

   Use the Networking Options dialog to enable or disable TCP/IP
   networking and to configure the port number that is used to
   connect to the MySQL server.
   MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard: Network Configuration

   TCP/IP networking is enabled by default. To disable TCP/IP
   networking, uncheck the box next to the Enable TCP/IP Networking
   option.

   Port 3306 is used by default. To change the port used to access
   MySQL, choose a new port number from the drop-down box or type a
   new port number directly into the drop-down box. If the port
   number you choose is in use, you are prompted to confirm your
   choice of port number.

   Set the Server SQL Mode to either enable or disable strict mode.
   Enabling strict mode (default) makes MySQL behave more like other
   database management systems. If you run applications that rely on
   MySQL's old "forgiving" behavior, make sure to either adapt those
   applications or to disable strict mode. For more information about
   strict mode, see Section 5.1.8, "Server SQL Modes."

2.3.4.9. The Character Set Dialog

   The MySQL server supports multiple character sets and it is
   possible to set a default server character set that is applied to
   all tables, columns, and databases unless overridden. Use the
   Character Set dialog to change the default character set of the
   MySQL server.
   MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard: Character Set

     * Standard Character Set: Choose this option if you want to use
       latin1 as the default server character set. latin1 is used for
       English and many Western European languages.

     * Best Support For Multilingualism: Choose this option if you
       want to use utf8 as the default server character set. This is
       a Unicode character set that can store characters from many
       different languages.

     * Manual Selected Default Character Set / Collation: Choose this
       option if you want to pick the server's default character set
       manually. Choose the desired character set from the provided
       drop-down list.

2.3.4.10. The Service Options Dialog

   On Windows platforms, the MySQL server can be installed as a
   Windows service. When installed this way, the MySQL server can be
   started automatically during system startup, and even restarted
   automatically by Windows in the event of a service failure.

   The MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard installs the MySQL
   server as a service by default, using the service name MySQL. If
   you do not wish to install the service, uncheck the box next to
   the Install As Windows Service option. You can change the service
   name by picking a new service name from the drop-down box provided
   or by entering a new service name into the drop-down box.

Note

   Service names can include any legal character except forward (/)
   or backward (\) slashes, and must be less than 256 characters
   long.

Warning

   If you are installing multiple versions of MySQL onto the same
   machine, you must choose a different service name for each version
   that you install. If you do not choose a different service for
   each installed version then the service manager information will
   be inconsistent and this will cause problems when you try to
   uninstall a previous version.

   If you have already installed multiple versions using the same
   service name, you must manually edit the contents of the
   HKEY_LOCAL_MACHINE\SYSTEM\CurrentControlSet\Services parameters
   within the Windows registry to update the association of the
   service name with the correct server version.

   Typically, when installing multiple versions you create a service
   name based on the version information. For example, you might
   install MySQL 5.x as mysql5, or specific versions such as MySQL
   5.1.30 as mysql50130.

   To install the MySQL server as a service but not have it started
   automatically at startup, uncheck the box next to the Launch the
   MySQL Server Automatically option.

2.3.4.11. The Security Options Dialog

   It is strongly recommended that you set a root password for your
   MySQL server, and the MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard
   requires by default that you do so. If you do not wish to set a
   root password, uncheck the box next to the Modify Security
   Settings option.
   MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard: Security

   To set the root password, enter the desired password into both the
   New root password and Confirm boxes. If you are reconfiguring an
   existing server, you need to enter the existing root password into
   the Current root password box.

   To prevent root logins from across the network, check the box next
   to the Root may only connect from localhost option. This increases
   the security of your root account.

   To create an anonymous user account, check the box next to the
   Create An Anonymous Account option. Creating an anonymous account
   can decrease server security and cause login and permission
   difficulties. For this reason, it is not recommended.

2.3.4.12. The Confirmation Dialog

   The final dialog in the MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard
   is the Confirmation Dialog. To start the configuration process,
   click the Execute button. To return to a previous dialog, click
   the Back button. To exit the MySQL Server Instance Configuration
   Wizard without configuring the server, click the Cancel button.
   MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard: Confirmation

   After you click the Execute button, the MySQL Server Instance
   Configuration Wizard performs a series of tasks and displays the
   progress onscreen as the tasks are performed.

   The MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard first determines
   configuration file options based on your choices using a template
   prepared by MySQL developers and engineers. This template is named
   my-template.ini and is located in your server installation
   directory.

   The MySQL Configuration Wizard then writes these options to the
   corresponding configuration file.

   If you chose to create a service for the MySQL server, the MySQL
   Server Instance Configuration Wizard creates and starts the
   service. If you are reconfiguring an existing service, the MySQL
   Server Instance Configuration Wizard restarts the service to apply
   your configuration changes.

   If you chose to set a root password, the MySQL Configuration
   Wizard connects to the server, sets your new root password, and
   applies any other security settings you may have selected.

   After the MySQL Server Instance Configuration Wizard has completed
   its tasks, it displays a summary. Click the Finish button to exit
   the MySQL Server Configuration Wizard.

2.3.5. Installing MySQL from a Noinstall Zip Archive

   Users who are installing from the Noinstall package can use the
   instructions in this section to manually install MySQL. The
   process for installing MySQL from a Zip archive is as follows:

    1. Extract the archive to the desired install directory

    2. Create an option file

    3. Choose a MySQL server type

    4. Start the MySQL server

    5. Secure the default user accounts

   This process is described in the sections that follow.

2.3.6. Extracting the Install Archive

   To install MySQL manually, do the following:

    1. If you are upgrading from a previous version please refer to
       Section 2.3.14, "Upgrading MySQL on Windows," before beginning
       the upgrade process.

    2. Make sure that you are logged in as a user with administrator
       privileges.

    3. Choose an installation location. Traditionally, the MySQL
       server is installed in C:\mysql. The MySQL Installation Wizard
       installs MySQL under C:\Program Files\MySQL. If you do not
       install MySQL at C:\mysql, you must specify the path to the
       install directory during startup or in an option file. See
       Section 2.3.7, "Creating an Option File."

    4. Extract the install archive to the chosen installation
       location using your preferred Zip archive tool. Some tools may
       extract the archive to a folder within your chosen
       installation location. If this occurs, you can move the
       contents of the subfolder into the chosen installation
       location.

2.3.7. Creating an Option File

   If you need to specify startup options when you run the server,
   you can indicate them on the command line or place them in an
   option file. For options that are used every time the server
   starts, you may find it most convenient to use an option file to
   specify your MySQL configuration. This is particularly true under
   the following circumstances:

     * The installation or data directory locations are different
       from the default locations (C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL
       Server 5.1 and C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\data).

     * You need to tune the server settings, such as memory, cache,
       or InnoDB configuration information.

   When the MySQL server starts on Windows, it looks for options in
   two files: the my.ini file in the Windows directory, and the
   C:\my.cnf file. The Windows directory typically is named something
   like C:\WINDOWS. You can determine its exact location from the
   value of the WINDIR environment variable using the following
   command:
C:\> echo %WINDIR%

   MySQL looks for options first in the my.ini file, and then in the
   my.cnf file. However, to avoid confusion, it is best if you use
   only one file. If your PC uses a boot loader where C: is not the
   boot drive, your only option is to use the my.ini file. Whichever
   option file you use, it must be a plain text file.

   You can also make use of the example option files included with
   your MySQL distribution; see Section 4.2.3.3.2, "Preconfigured
   Option Files."

   An option file can be created and modified with any text editor,
   such as Notepad. For example, if MySQL is installed in E:\mysql
   and the data directory is in E:\mydata\data, you can create an
   option file containing a [mysqld] section to specify values for
   the basedir and datadir options:
[mysqld]
# set basedir to your installation path
basedir=E:/mysql
# set datadir to the location of your data directory
datadir=E:/mydata/data

   Note that Windows path names are specified in option files using
   (forward) slashes rather than backslashes. If you do use
   backslashes, you must double them:
[mysqld]
# set basedir to your installation path
basedir=E:\\mysql
# set datadir to the location of your data directory
datadir=E:\\mydata\\data

   MySQL Enterprise For expert advice on the start-up options
   appropriate to your circumstances, subscribe to the MySQL
   Enterprise Monitor. For more information, see
   http://www.mysql.com/products/enterprise/advisors.html.

   In MySQL 5.1.23 and earlier, the MySQL installer places the data
   directory directly under the directory where you install MySQL. On
   MySQL 5.1.24 and later, the data directory is located within the
   AppData directory for the user running MySQL.

   If you would like to use a data directory in a different location,
   you should copy the entire contents of the data directory to the
   new location. For example, if you want to use E:\mydata as the
   data directory instead, you must do two things:

    1. Move the entire data directory and all of its contents from
       the default location (for example C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL
       Server 5.1\data) to E:\mydata.

    2. Use a --datadir option to specify the new data directory
       location each time you start the server.

2.3.8. Selecting a MySQL Server Type

   The following table shows the available servers for Windows in
   MySQL 5.1.20 and earlier.
   Binary Description
   mysqld-nt Optimized binary with named-pipe support
   mysqld Optimized binary without named-pipe support
   mysqld-debug Like mysqld-nt, but compiled with full debugging and
   automatic memory allocation checking

   The following table shows the available servers for Windows in
   MySQL 5.1.21 and later.
   Binary Description
   mysqld Optimized binary with named-pipe support
   mysqld-debug Like mysqld, but compiled with full debugging and
   automatic memory allocation checking

   All of the preceding binaries are optimized for modern Intel
   processors, but should work on any Intel i386-class or higher
   processor.

   Each of the servers in a distribution support the same set of
   storage engines. The SHOW ENGINES statement displays which engines
   a given server supports.

   All Windows MySQL 5.1 servers have support for symbolic linking of
   database directories.

   MySQL supports TCP/IP on all Windows platforms. MySQL servers on
   Windows support named pipes as indicated in the following list.
   However, the default is to use TCP/IP regardless of platform.
   (Named pipes are slower than TCP/IP in many Windows
   configurations.)

   Use of named pipes is subject to these conditions:

     * Named pipes are enabled only if you start the server with the
       --enable-named-pipe option. It is necessary to use this option
       explicitly because some users have experienced problems with
       shutting down the MySQL server when named pipes were used.

     * For MySQL 5.1.20 and earlier, named-pipe connections are
       allowed only by the mysqld-nt and mysqld-debug servers. For
       MySQL 5.1.21 and later, the mysqld and mysqld-debug servers
       both contain support for named-pipe connections.

Note

   Most of the examples in this manual use mysqld as the server name.
   If you choose to use a different server, such as mysqld-nt or
   mysqld-debug, make the appropriate substitutions in the commands
   that are shown in the examples.

2.3.9. Starting the Server for the First Time

   This section gives a general overview of starting the MySQL
   server. The following sections provide more specific information
   for starting the MySQL server from the command line or as a
   Windows service.

   The information here applies primarily if you installed MySQL
   using the Noinstall version, or if you wish to configure and test
   MySQL manually rather than with the GUI tools.

   The examples in these sections assume that MySQL is installed
   under the default location of C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server
   5.1. Adjust the path names shown in the examples if you have MySQL
   installed in a different location.

   Clients have two options. They can use TCP/IP, or they can use a
   named pipe if the server supports named-pipe connections.

   MySQL for Windows also supports shared-memory connections if the
   server is started with the --shared-memory option. Clients can
   connect through shared memory by using the --protocol=MEMORY
   option.

   For information about which server binary to run, see Section
   2.3.8, "Selecting a MySQL Server Type."

   Testing is best done from a command prompt in a console window (or
   "DOS window"). In this way you can have the server display status
   messages in the window where they are easy to see. If something is
   wrong with your configuration, these messages make it easier for
   you to identify and fix any problems.

   To start the server, enter this command:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\bin\mysqld" --console

   For a server that includes InnoDB support, you should see the
   messages similar to those following as it starts (the path names
   and sizes may differ):
InnoDB: The first specified datafile c:\ibdata\ibdata1 did not exist:
InnoDB: a new database to be created!
InnoDB: Setting file c:\ibdata\ibdata1 size to 209715200
InnoDB: Database physically writes the file full: wait...
InnoDB: Log file c:\iblogs\ib_logfile0 did not exist: new to be creat
ed
InnoDB: Setting log file c:\iblogs\ib_logfile0 size to 31457280
InnoDB: Log file c:\iblogs\ib_logfile1 did not exist: new to be creat
ed
InnoDB: Setting log file c:\iblogs\ib_logfile1 size to 31457280
InnoDB: Log file c:\iblogs\ib_logfile2 did not exist: new to be creat
ed
InnoDB: Setting log file c:\iblogs\ib_logfile2 size to 31457280
InnoDB: Doublewrite buffer not found: creating new
InnoDB: Doublewrite buffer created
InnoDB: creating foreign key constraint system tables
InnoDB: foreign key constraint system tables created
011024 10:58:25  InnoDB: Started

   When the server finishes its startup sequence, you should see
   something like this, which indicates that the server is ready to
   service client connections:
mysqld: ready for connections
Version: '5.1.39'  socket: ''  port: 3306

   The server continues to write to the console any further
   diagnostic output it produces. You can open a new console window
   in which to run client programs.

   If you omit the --console option, the server writes diagnostic
   output to the error log in the data directory (C:\Program
   Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\data by default). The error log is
   the file with the .err extension.

Note

   The accounts that are listed in the MySQL grant tables initially
   have no passwords. After starting the server, you should set up
   passwords for them using the instructions in Section 2.11,
   "Post-Installation Setup and Testing."

2.3.10. Starting MySQL from the Windows Command Line

   The MySQL server can be started manually from the command line.
   This can be done on any version of Windows.

   To start the mysqld server from the command line, you should start
   a console window (or "DOS window") and enter this command:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\bin\mysqld"

   The path to mysqld may vary depending on the install location of
   MySQL on your system.

   You can stop the MySQL server by executing this command:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\bin\mysqladmin" -u root
 shutdown

Note

   If the MySQL root user account has a password, you need to invoke
   mysqladmin with the -p option and supply the password when
   prompted.

   This command invokes the MySQL administrative utility mysqladmin
   to connect to the server and tell it to shut down. The command
   connects as the MySQL root user, which is the default
   administrative account in the MySQL grant system. Note that users
   in the MySQL grant system are wholly independent from any login
   users under Windows.

   If mysqld doesn't start, check the error log to see whether the
   server wrote any messages there to indicate the cause of the
   problem. The error log is located in the C:\Program
   Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\data directory. It is the file with a
   suffix of .err. You can also try to start the server as mysqld
   --console; in this case, you may get some useful information on
   the screen that may help solve the problem.

   The last option is to start mysqld with the --standalone and
   --debug options. In this case, mysqld writes a log file
   C:\mysqld.trace that should contain the reason why mysqld doesn't
   start. See MySQL Internals: Porting
   (http://forge.mysql.com/wiki/MySQL_Internals_Porting).

   Use mysqld --verbose --help to display all the options that mysqld
   supports.

2.3.11. Starting MySQL as a Windows Service

   On Windows, the recommended way to run MySQL is to install it as a
   Windows service, whereby MySQL starts and stops automatically when
   Windows starts and stops. A MySQL server installed as a service
   can also be controlled from the command line using NET commands,
   or with the graphical Services utility. Generally, to install
   MySQL as a Windows service you should be logged in using an
   account that has administrator rights.

   The Services utility (the Windows Service Control Manager) can be
   found in the Windows Control Panel (under Administrative Tools on
   Windows 2000, XP, Vista and Server 2003). To avoid conflicts, it
   is advisable to close the Services utility while performing server
   installation or removal operations from the command line.

   Before installing MySQL as a Windows service, you should first
   stop the current server if it is running by using the following
   command:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\bin\mysqladmin"
          -u root shutdown

Note

   If the MySQL root user account has a password, you need to invoke
   mysqladmin with the -p option and supply the password when
   prompted.

   This command invokes the MySQL administrative utility mysqladmin
   to connect to the server and tell it to shut down. The command
   connects as the MySQL root user, which is the default
   administrative account in the MySQL grant system. Note that users
   in the MySQL grant system are wholly independent from any login
   users under Windows.

   Install the server as a service using this command:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\bin\mysqld" --install

   The service-installation command does not start the server.
   Instructions for that are given later in this section.

   To make it easier to invoke MySQL programs, you can add the path
   name of the MySQL bin directory to your Windows system PATH
   environment variable:

     * On the Windows desktop, right-click on the My Computer icon,
       and select Properties.

     * Next select the Advanced tab from the System Properties menu
       that appears, and click the Environment Variables button.

     * Under System Variables, select Path, and then click the Edit
       button. The Edit System Variable dialogue should appear.

     * Place your cursor at the end of the text appearing in the
       space marked Variable Value. (Use the End key to ensure that
       your cursor is positioned at the very end of the text in this
       space.) Then enter the complete path name of your MySQL bin
       directory (for example, C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server
       5.1\bin), Note that there should be a semicolon separating
       this path from any values present in this field. Dismiss this
       dialogue, and each dialogue in turn, by clicking OK until all
       of the dialogues that were opened have been dismissed. You
       should now be able to invoke any MySQL executable program by
       typing its name at the DOS prompt from any directory on the
       system, without having to supply the path. This includes the
       servers, the mysql client, and all MySQL command-line
       utilities such as mysqladmin and mysqldump.
       You should not add the MySQL bin directory to your Windows
       PATH if you are running multiple MySQL servers on the same
       machine.

Warning

   You must exercise great care when editing your system PATH by
   hand; accidental deletion or modification of any portion of the
   existing PATH value can leave you with a malfunctioning or even
   unusable system.

   The following additional arguments can be used in MySQL 5.1 when
   installing the service:

     * You can specify a service name immediately following the
       --install option. The default service name is MySQL.

     * If a service name is given, it can be followed by a single
       option. By convention, this should be
       --defaults-file=file_name to specify the name of an option
       file from which the server should read options when it starts.
       The use of a single option other than --defaults-file is
       possible but discouraged. --defaults-file is more flexible
       because it enables you to specify multiple startup options for
       the server by placing them in the named option file.

     * You can also specify a --local-service option following the
       service name. This causes the server to run using the
       LocalService Windows account that has limited system
       privileges. This account is available only for Windows XP or
       newer. If both --defaults-file and --local-service are given
       following the service name, they can be in any order.

   For a MySQL server that is installed as a Windows service, the
   following rules determine the service name and option files that
   the server uses:

     * If the service-installation command specifies no service name
       or the default service name (MySQL) following the --install
       option, the server uses the a service name of MySQL and reads
       options from the [mysqld] group in the standard option files.

     * If the service-installation command specifies a service name
       other than MySQL following the --install option, the server
       uses that service name. It reads options from the [mysqld]
       group and the group that has the same name as the service in
       the standard option files. This allows you to use the [mysqld]
       group for options that should be used by all MySQL services,
       and an option group with the service name for use by the
       server installed with that service name.

     * If the service-installation command specifies a
       --defaults-file option after the service name, the server
       reads options only from the [mysqld] group of the named file
       and ignores the standard option files.

   As a more complex example, consider the following command:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\bin\mysqld"
          --install MySQL --defaults-file=C:\my-opts.cnf

   Here, the default service name (MySQL) is given after the
   --install option. If no --defaults-file option had been given,
   this command would have the effect of causing the server to read
   the [mysqld] group from the standard option files. However,
   because the --defaults-file option is present, the server reads
   options from the [mysqld] option group, and only from the named
   file.

   You can also specify options as Start parameters in the Windows
   Services utility before you start the MySQL service.

   Once a MySQL server has been installed as a service, Windows
   starts the service automatically whenever Windows starts. The
   service also can be started immediately from the Services utility,
   or by using a NET START MySQL command. The NET command is not case
   sensitive.

   When run as a service, mysqld has no access to a console window,
   so no messages can be seen there. If mysqld does not start, check
   the error log to see whether the server wrote any messages there
   to indicate the cause of the problem. The error log is located in
   the MySQL data directory (for example, C:\Program
   Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\data). It is the file with a suffix
   of .err.

   When a MySQL server has been installed as a service, and the
   service is running, Windows stops the service automatically when
   Windows shuts down. The server also can be stopped manually by
   using the Services utility, the NET STOP MySQL command, or the
   mysqladmin shutdown command.

   You also have the choice of installing the server as a manual
   service if you do not wish for the service to be started
   automatically during the boot process. To do this, use the
   --install-manual option rather than the --install option:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\bin\mysqld" --install-m
anual

   To remove a server that is installed as a service, first stop it
   if it is running by executing NET STOP MySQL. Then use the
   --remove option to remove it:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\bin\mysqld" --remove

   If mysqld is not running as a service, you can start it from the
   command line. For instructions, see Section 2.3.10, "Starting
   MySQL from the Windows Command Line."

   Please see Section 2.3.13, "Troubleshooting a MySQL Installation
   Under Windows," if you encounter difficulties during installation.

2.3.12. Testing The MySQL Installation

   You can test whether the MySQL server is working by executing any
   of the following commands:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\bin\mysqlshow"
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\bin\mysqlshow" -u root
mysql
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\bin\mysqladmin" version
 status proc
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\bin\mysql" test

   If mysqld is slow to respond to TCP/IP connections from client
   programs, there is probably a problem with your DNS. In this case,
   start mysqld with the --skip-name-resolve option and use only
   localhost and IP numbers in the Host column of the MySQL grant
   tables.

   You can force a MySQL client to use a named-pipe connection rather
   than TCP/IP by specifying the --pipe or --protocol=PIPE option, or
   by specifying . (period) as the host name. Use the --socket option
   to specify the name of the pipe if you do not want to use the
   default pipe name.

   Note that if you have set a password for the root account, deleted
   the anonymous account, or created a new user account, then you
   must use the appropriate -u and -p options with the commands shown
   above in order to connect with the MySQL Server. See Section
   4.2.2, "Connecting to the MySQL Server."

   For more information about mysqlshow, see Section 4.5.6,
   "mysqlshow --- Display Database, Table, and Column Information."

2.3.13. Troubleshooting a MySQL Installation Under Windows

   When installing and running MySQL for the first time, you may
   encounter certain errors that prevent the MySQL server from
   starting. The purpose of this section is to help you diagnose and
   correct some of these errors.

   Your first resource when troubleshooting server issues is the
   error log. The MySQL server uses the error log to record
   information relevant to the error that prevents the server from
   starting. The error log is located in the data directory specified
   in your my.ini file. The default data directory location is
   C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\data. See Section 5.2.2,
   "The Error Log."

   Another source of information regarding possible errors is the
   console messages displayed when the MySQL service is starting. Use
   the NET START MySQL command from the command line after installing
   mysqld as a service to see any error messages regarding the
   starting of the MySQL server as a service. See Section 2.3.11,
   "Starting MySQL as a Windows Service."

   The following examples show other common error messages you may
   encounter when installing MySQL and starting the server for the
   first time:

     * If the MySQL server cannot find the mysql privileges database
       or other critical files, you may see these messages:
System error 1067 has occurred.
Fatal error: Can't open privilege tables: Table 'mysql.host' doesn't
exist
       These messages often occur when the MySQL base or data
       directories are installed in different locations than the
       default locations (C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1 and
       C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\data, respectively).
       This situation may occur when MySQL is upgraded and installed
       to a new location, but the configuration file is not updated
       to reflect the new location. In addition, there may be old and
       new configuration files that conflict. Be sure to delete or
       rename any old configuration files when upgrading MySQL.
       If you have installed MySQL to a directory other than
       C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1, you need to ensure
       that the MySQL server is aware of this through the use of a
       configuration (my.ini) file. The my.ini file needs to be
       located in your Windows directory, typically C:\WINDOWS. You
       can determine its exact location from the value of the WINDIR
       environment variable by issuing the following command from the
       command prompt:
C:\> echo %WINDIR%
       An option file can be created and modified with any text
       editor, such as Notepad. For example, if MySQL is installed in
       E:\mysql and the data directory is D:\MySQLdata, you can
       create the option file and set up a [mysqld] section to
       specify values for the basedir and datadir options:
[mysqld]
# set basedir to your installation path
basedir=E:/mysql
# set datadir to the location of your data directory
datadir=D:/MySQLdata
       Note that Windows path names are specified in option files
       using (forward) slashes rather than backslashes. If you do use
       backslashes, you must double them:
[mysqld]
# set basedir to your installation path
basedir=C:\\Program Files\\MySQL\\MySQL Server 5.1
# set datadir to the location of your data directory
datadir=D:\\MySQLdata
       If you change the datadir value in your MySQL configuration
       file, you must move the contents of the existing MySQL data
       directory before restarting the MySQL server.
       See Section 2.3.7, "Creating an Option File."

     * If you reinstall or upgrade MySQL without first stopping and
       removing the existing MySQL service and install MySQL using
       the MySQL Configuration Wizard, you may see this error:
Error: Cannot create Windows service for MySql. Error: 0
       This occurs when the Configuration Wizard tries to install the
       service and finds an existing service with the same name.
       One solution to this problem is to choose a service name other
       than mysql when using the configuration wizard. This allows
       the new service to be installed correctly, but leaves the
       outdated service in place. Although this is harmless, it is
       best to remove old services that are no longer in use.
       To permanently remove the old mysql service, execute the
       following command as a user with administrative privileges, on
       the command-line:
C:\> sc delete mysql
[SC] DeleteService SUCCESS
       If the sc utility is not available for your version of
       Windows, download the delsrv utility from
       http://www.microsoft.com/windows2000/techinfo/reskit/tools/exi
       sting/delsrv-o.asp and use the delsrv mysql syntax.

2.3.14. Upgrading MySQL on Windows

   This section lists some of the steps you should take when
   upgrading MySQL on Windows.

    1. Review Section 2.12.1, "Upgrading MySQL," for additional
       information on upgrading MySQL that is not specific to
       Windows.

    2. You should always back up your current MySQL installation
       before performing an upgrade. See Section 6.1, "Database
       Backups."

    3. Download the latest Windows distribution of MySQL from
       http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/.

    4. Before upgrading MySQL, you must stop the server. If the
       server is installed as a service, stop the service with the
       following command from the command prompt:
C:\> NET STOP MySQL
       If you are not running the MySQL server as a service, use the
       following command to stop it:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\bin\mysqladmin" -u root
 shutdown

Note
       If the MySQL root user account has a password, you need to
       invoke mysqladmin with the -p option and supply the password
       when prompted.

    5. When upgrading to MySQL 5.1 from a version previous to 4.1.5,
       or when upgrading from a version of MySQL installed from a Zip
       archive to a version of MySQL installed with the MySQL
       Installation Wizard, you must manually remove the previous
       installation and MySQL service (if the server is installed as
       a service).
       To remove the MySQL service, use the following command:
C:\> C:\mysql\bin\mysqld --remove
       If you do not remove the existing service, the MySQL
       Installation Wizard may fail to properly install the new MySQL
       service.

    6. When upgrading from MySQL 5.1.23 to MySQL 5.1.24, the change
       in the default location of the data directory from a directory
       within the MySQL installation to the AppData folder means that
       you must manually copy the data files from your old
       installation to the new location.

    7. If you are using the MySQL Installation Wizard, start the
       wizard as described in Section 2.3.3, "Using the MySQL
       Installation Wizard."

    8. If you are installing MySQL from a Zip archive, extract the
       archive. You may either overwrite your existing MySQL
       installation (usually located at C:\mysql), or install it into
       a different directory, such as C:\mysql5. Overwriting the
       existing installation is recommended.

    9. If you were running MySQL as a Windows service and you had to
       remove the service earlier in this procedure, reinstall the
       service. (See Section 2.3.11, "Starting MySQL as a Windows
       Service.")
   10. Restart the server. For example, use NET START MySQL if you
       run MySQL as a service, or invoke mysqld directly otherwise.
   11. If you encounter errors, see Section 2.3.13, "Troubleshooting
       a MySQL Installation Under Windows."

2.3.15. MySQL on Windows Compared to MySQL on Unix

   MySQL for Windows has proven itself to be very stable. The Windows
   version of MySQL has the same features as the corresponding Unix
   version, with the following exceptions:

     * Limited number of ports
       Windows systems have about 4,000 ports available for client
       connections, and after a connection on a port closes, it takes
       two to four minutes before the port can be reused. In
       situations where clients connect to and disconnect from the
       server at a high rate, it is possible for all available ports
       to be used up before closed ports become available again. If
       this happens, the MySQL server appears to be unresponsive even
       though it is running. Note that ports may be used by other
       applications running on the machine as well, in which case the
       number of ports available to MySQL is lower.
       For more information about this problem, see
       http://support.microsoft.com/default.aspx?scid=kb;en-us;196271
       .

     * Concurrent reads
       MySQL depends on the pread() and pwrite() system calls to be
       able to mix INSERT and SELECT. Currently, we use mutexes to
       emulate pread() and pwrite(). We intend to replace the file
       level interface with a virtual interface in the future so that
       we can use the readfile()/writefile() interface to get more
       speed. The current implementation limits the number of open
       files that MySQL 5.1 can use to 2,048, which means that you
       cannot run as many concurrent threads on Windows as on Unix.

     * Blocking read
       MySQL uses a blocking read for each connection. That has the
       following implications if named-pipe connections are enabled:

          + A connection is not disconnected automatically after
            eight hours, as happens with the Unix version of MySQL.

          + If a connection hangs, it is not possible to break it
            without killing MySQL.

          + mysqladmin kill does not work on a sleeping connection.

          + mysqladmin shutdown cannot abort as long as there are
            sleeping connections.
       We plan to fix this problem in the future.

     * ALTER TABLE
       While you are executing an ALTER TABLE statement, the table is
       locked from being used by other threads. This has to do with
       the fact that on Windows, you can't delete a file that is in
       use by another thread. In the future, we may find some way to
       work around this problem.

     * DROP TABLE
       DROP TABLE on a table that is in use by a MERGE table does not
       work on Windows because the MERGE handler does the table
       mapping hidden from the upper layer of MySQL. Because Windows
       does not allow dropping files that are open, you first must
       flush all MERGE tables (with FLUSH TABLES) or drop the MERGE
       table before dropping the table.

     * DATA DIRECTORY and INDEX DIRECTORY
       The DATA DIRECTORY and INDEX DIRECTORY options for CREATE
       TABLE are ignored on Windows, because Windows doesn't support
       symbolic links. These options also are ignored on systems that
       have a nonfunctional realpath() call.

     * DROP DATABASE
       You cannot drop a database that is in use by some thread.

     * Case-insensitive names
       File names are not case sensitive on Windows, so MySQL
       database and table names are also not case sensitive on
       Windows. The only restriction is that database and table names
       must be specified using the same case throughout a given
       statement. See Section 8.2.2, "Identifier Case Sensitivity."

     * Directory and file names
       On Windows, MySQL Server supports only directory and file
       names that are compatible with the current ANSI code pages.
       For example, the following Japanese directory name will not
       work in the Western locale (code page 1252):
datadir="C:/"
       The same limitation applies to directory and file names
       referred to in SQL statements, such as the data file path name
       in LOAD DATA INFILE.

     * The "\" path name separator character
       Path name components in Windows are separated by the "\"
       character, which is also the escape character in MySQL. If you
       are using LOAD DATA INFILE or SELECT ... INTO OUTFILE, use
       Unix-style file names with "/" characters:
mysql> LOAD DATA INFILE 'C:/tmp/skr.txt' INTO TABLE skr;
mysql> SELECT * INTO OUTFILE 'C:/tmp/skr.txt' FROM skr;
       Alternatively, you must double the "\" character:
mysql> LOAD DATA INFILE 'C:\\tmp\\skr.txt' INTO TABLE skr;
mysql> SELECT * INTO OUTFILE 'C:\\tmp\\skr.txt' FROM skr;

     * Problems with pipes
       Pipes do not work reliably from the Windows command-line
       prompt. If the pipe includes the character ^Z / CHAR(24),
       Windows thinks that it has encountered end-of-file and aborts
       the program.
       This is mainly a problem when you try to apply a binary log as
       follows:
C:\> mysqlbinlog binary_log_file | mysql --user=root
       If you have a problem applying the log and suspect that it is
       because of a ^Z / CHAR(24) character, you can use the
       following workaround:
C:\> mysqlbinlog binary_log_file --result-file=/tmp/bin.sql
C:\> mysql --user=root --execute "source /tmp/bin.sql"
       The latter command also can be used to reliably read in any
       SQL file that may contain binary data.

     * Access denied for user error
       If MySQL cannot resolve your host name properly, you may get
       the following error when you attempt to run a MySQL client
       program to connect to a server running on the same machine:
Access denied for user 'some_user'@'unknown'
to database 'mysql'
       To fix this problem, you should create a file named
       \windows\hosts containing the following information:
127.0.0.1       localhost

   Here are some open issues for anyone who might want to help us
   improve MySQL on Windows:

     * Add macros to use the faster thread-safe increment/decrement
       methods provided by Windows.

2.4. Installing MySQL from RPM Packages on Linux

   The recommended way to install MySQL on RPM-based Linux
   distributions is by using the RPM packages. The RPMs that we
   provide to the community should work on all versions of Linux that
   support RPM packages and use glibc 2.3. To obtain RPM packages,
   see Section 2.1.3, "How to Get MySQL."

   For non-RPM Linux distributions, you can install MySQL using a
   .tar.gz package. See Section 2.9, "Installing MySQL from tar.gz
   Packages on Other Unix-Like Systems."

   We do provide some platform-specific RPMs; the difference between
   a platform-specific RPM and a generic RPM is that a
   platform-specific RPM is built on the targeted platform and is
   linked dynamically whereas a generic RPM is linked statically with
   LinuxThreads.

Note

   RPM distributions of MySQL often are provided by other vendors. Be
   aware that they may differ in features and capabilities from those
   built by us, and that the instructions in this manual do not
   necessarily apply to installing them. The vendor's instructions
   should be consulted instead.

   If you have problems with an RPM file (for example, if you receive
   the error Sorry, the host 'xxxx' could not be looked up), see
   Section 2.13.1.2, "Linux Binary Distribution Notes."

   In most cases, you need to install only the MySQL-server and
   MySQL-client packages to get a functional MySQL installation. The
   other packages are not required for a standard installation.

   RPMs for MySQL Cluster.  Beginning with MySQL 5.1.24, standard
   MySQL server RPMs built by MySQL no longer provide support for the
   NDBCLUSTER storage engine. MySQL Cluster users wanting to upgrade
   MySQL 5.1.23 or earlier installations from RPMs built by MySQL
   should upgrade to MySQL Cluster NDB 6.2 or MySQL Cluster NDB 6.3;
   RPMs that should work with most Linux distributions are available
   for both of these release series.

Important

   When upgrading a MySQL Cluster RPM installation, you must upgrade
   all installed RPMs, including the Server and Client RPMs.

   For more information about installing MySQL Cluster from RPMs, see
   Section 17.2.2, "MySQL Cluster Multi-Computer Installation."

   For upgrades, if your installation was originally produced by
   installing multiple RPM packages, it is best to upgrade all the
   packages, not just some. For example, if you previously installed
   the server and client RPMs, do not upgrade just the server RPM.

   If you get a dependency failure when trying to install MySQL
   packages (for example, error: removing these packages would break
   dependencies: libmysqlclient.so.10 is needed by ...), you should
   also install the MySQL-shared-compat package, which includes both
   the shared libraries for backward compatibility
   (libmysqlclient.so.12 for MySQL 4.0 and libmysqlclient.so.10 for
   MySQL 3.23).

   Some Linux distributions still ship with MySQL 3.23 and they
   usually link applications dynamically to save disk space. If these
   shared libraries are in a separate package (for example,
   MySQL-shared), it is sufficient to simply leave this package
   installed and just upgrade the MySQL server and client packages
   (which are statically linked and do not depend on the shared
   libraries). For distributions that include the shared libraries in
   the same package as the MySQL server (for example, Red Hat Linux),
   you could either install our 3.23 MySQL-shared RPM, or use the
   MySQL-shared-compat package instead. (Do not install both.)

   The RPM packages shown in the following list are available. The
   names shown here use a suffix of .glibc23.i386.rpm, but particular
   packages can have different suffixes, as described later.

     * MySQL-server-VERSION.glibc23.i386.rpm
       The MySQL server. You need this unless you only want to
       connect to a MySQL server running on another machine.

     * MySQL-client-VERSION.glibc23.i386.rpm
       The standard MySQL client programs. You probably always want
       to install this package.

     * MySQL-devel-VERSION.glibc23.i386.rpm
       The libraries and include files that are needed if you want to
       compile other MySQL clients, such as the Perl modules.

     * MySQL-debuginfo-VERSION.glibc23.i386.rpm
       This package contains debugging information. debuginfo RPMs
       are never needed to use MySQL software; this is true both for
       the server and for client programs. However, they contain
       additional information that might be needed by a debugger to
       analyze a crash.

     * MySQL-shared-VERSION.glibc23.i386.rpm
       This package contains the shared libraries
       (libmysqlclient.so*) that certain languages and applications
       need to dynamically load and use MySQL. It contains
       single-threaded and thread-safe libraries. If you install this
       package, do not install the MySQL-shared-compat package.

     * MySQL-shared-compat-VERSION.glibc23.i386.rpm
       This package includes the shared libraries for MySQL 3.23,
       4.0, and so on, up to the current release. It contains
       single-threaded and thread-safe libraries. Install this
       package instead of MySQL-shared if you have applications
       installed that are dynamically linked against older versions
       of MySQL but you want to upgrade to the current version
       without breaking the library dependencies.

     * MySQL-embedded-VERSION.glibc23.i386.rpm
       The embedded MySQL server library.

     * MySQL-ndb-management-VERSION.glibc23.i386.rpm,
       MySQL-ndb-storage-VERSION.glibc23.i386.rpm,
       MySQL-ndb-tools-VERSION.glibc23.i386.rpm,
       MySQL-ndb-extra-VERSION.glibc23.i386.rpm
       Packages that contain additional files for MySQL Cluster
       installations.

Note
       The MySQL-ndb-tools RPM requires a working installation of
       perl. Prior to MySQL 5.1.18, the DBI and HTML::Template
       packages were also required. See Section 2.15, "Perl
       Installation Notes," and Section 17.6.21, "ndb_size.pl ---
       NDBCLUSTER Size Requirement Estimator," for more information.

     * MySQL-test-VERSION.glibc23.i386.rpm
       This package includes the MySQL test suite.

     * MySQL-VERSION.src.rpm
       This contains the source code for all of the previous
       packages. It can also be used to rebuild the RPMs on other
       architectures (for example, Alpha or SPARC).

   The suffix of RPM package names (following the VERSION value) has
   the following syntax:
.PLATFORM.CPU.rpm

   The PLATFORM and CPU values indicate the type of system for which
   the package is built. PLATFORM indicates the platform and CPU
   indicates the processor type or family.

   All packages are dynamically linked against glibc 2.3. The
   PLATFORM value indicates whether the package is platform
   independent or intended for a specific platform, as shown in the
   following table.
   glibc23 Platform independent, should run on any Linux distribution
   that supports glibc 2.3
   rhel3, rhel4 Red Hat Enterprise Linux 3 or 4
   sles9, sles10 SuSE Linux Enterprise Server 9 or 10

   In MySQL 5.1, only glibc23 packages are available currently.

   The CPU value indicates the processor type or family for which the
   package is built.
   i386   x86 processor, 386 and up
   i586   x86 processor, Pentium and up
   x86_64 64-bit x86 processor
   ia64   Itanium (IA-64) processor

   To see all files in an RPM package (for example, a MySQL-server
   RPM), run a command like this:
shell> rpm -qpl MySQL-server-VERSION.glibc23.i386.rpm

   To perform a standard minimal installation, install the server and
   client RPMs:
shell> rpm -i MySQL-server-VERSION.glibc23.i386.rpm
shell> rpm -i MySQL-client-VERSION.glibc23.i386.rpm

   To install only the client programs, install just the client RPM:
shell> rpm -i MySQL-client-VERSION.glibc23.i386.rpm

   RPM provides a feature to verify the integrity and authenticity of
   packages before installing them. If you would like to learn more
   about this feature, see Section 2.1.4, "Verifying Package
   Integrity Using MD5 Checksums or GnuPG."

   The server RPM places data under the /var/lib/mysql directory. The
   RPM also creates a login account for a user named mysql (if one
   does not exist) to use for running the MySQL server, and creates
   the appropriate entries in /etc/init.d/ to start the server
   automatically at boot time. (This means that if you have performed
   a previous installation and have made changes to its startup
   script, you may want to make a copy of the script so that you
   don't lose it when you install a newer RPM.) See Section 2.11.2.2,
   "Starting and Stopping MySQL Automatically," for more information
   on how MySQL can be started automatically on system startup.

   If you want to install the MySQL RPM on older Linux distributions
   that do not support initialization scripts in /etc/init.d
   (directly or via a symlink), you should create a symbolic link
   that points to the location where your initialization scripts
   actually are installed. For example, if that location is
   /etc/rc.d/init.d, use these commands before installing the RPM to
   create /etc/init.d as a symbolic link that points there:
shell> cd /etc
shell> ln -s rc.d/init.d .

   However, all current major Linux distributions should support the
   new directory layout that uses /etc/init.d, because it is required
   for LSB (Linux Standard Base) compliance.

   If the RPM files that you install include MySQL-server, the mysqld
   server should be up and running after installation. You should be
   able to start using MySQL.

   If something goes wrong, you can find more information in the
   binary installation section. See Section 2.9, "Installing MySQL
   from tar.gz Packages on Other Unix-Like Systems."

Note

   The accounts that are listed in the MySQL grant tables initially
   have no passwords. After starting the server, you should set up
   passwords for them using the instructions in Section 2.11,
   "Post-Installation Setup and Testing."

   During RPM installation, a user named mysql and a group named
   mysql are created on the system. This is done using the useradd,
   groupadd, and usermod commands. Those commands require appropriate
   administrative privileges, which is ensured for locally managed
   users and groups (as listed in the /etc/passwd and /etc/group
   files) by the RPM installation process being run by root.

   For nonlocal user management (LDAP, NIS, and so forth), the
   administrative tools may require additional authentication (such
   as a password), and will fail if the installing user does not
   provide this authentication. Even if they fail, the RPM
   installation will not abort but succeed, and this is intentional.
   If they failed, some of the intended transfer of ownership may be
   missing, and it is recommended that the system administrator then
   manually ensures some appropriate user andgroup exists and
   manually transfers ownership following the actions in the RPM spec
   file.

2.5. Installing MySQL on Mac OS X

   You can install MySQL on Mac OS X 10.3.x ("Panther") or newer
   using a Mac OS X binary package in PKG format instead of the
   binary tarball distribution. Please note that older versions of
   Mac OS X (for example, 10.1.x or 10.2.x) are not supported by this
   package.

   The package is located inside a disk image (.dmg) file that you
   first need to mount by double-clicking its icon in the Finder. It
   should then mount the image and display its contents.

   To obtain MySQL, see Section 2.1.3, "How to Get MySQL."

Note

   Before proceeding with the installation, be sure to shut down all
   running MySQL server instances by either using the MySQL Manager
   Application (on Mac OS X Server) or via mysqladmin shutdown on the
   command line.

   To actually install the MySQL PKG file, double-click on the
   package icon. This launches the Mac OS X Package Installer, which
   guides you through the installation of MySQL.

   Due to a bug in the Mac OS X package installer, you may see this
   error message in the destination disk selection dialog:
You cannot install this software on this disk. (null)

   If this error occurs, simply click the Go Back button once to
   return to the previous screen. Then click Continue to advance to
   the destination disk selection again, and you should be able to
   choose the destination disk correctly. We have reported this bug
   to Apple and it is investigating this problem.

   The Mac OS X PKG of MySQL installs itself into
   /usr/local/mysql-VERSION and also installs a symbolic link,
   /usr/local/mysql, that points to the new location. If a directory
   named /usr/local/mysql exists, it is renamed to
   /usr/local/mysql.bak first. Additionally, the installer creates
   the grant tables in the mysql database by executing
   mysql_install_db.

   The installation layout is similar to that of a tar file binary
   distribution; all MySQL binaries are located in the directory
   /usr/local/mysql/bin. The MySQL socket file is created as
   /tmp/mysql.sock by default. See Section 2.1.5, "Installation
   Layouts."

   MySQL installation requires a Mac OS X user account named mysql. A
   user account with this name should exist by default on Mac OS X
   10.2 and up.

   If you are running Mac OS X Server, a version of MySQL should
   already be installed. The following table shows the versions of
   MySQL that ship with Mac OS X Server versions.
   Mac OS X Server Version MySQL Version
   10.2-10.2.2             3.23.51
   10.2.3-10.2.6           3.23.53
   10.3                    4.0.14
   10.3.2                  4.0.16
   10.4.0                  4.1.10a

   This manual section covers the installation of the official MySQL
   Mac OS X PKG only. Make sure to read Apple's help information
   about installing MySQL: Run the "Help View" application, select
   "Mac OS X Server" help, do a search for "MySQL," and read the item
   entitled "Installing MySQL."

   If you previously used Marc Liyanage's MySQL packages for Mac OS X
   from http://www.entropy.ch, you can simply follow the update
   instructions for packages using the binary installation layout as
   given on his pages.

   If you are upgrading from Marc's 3.23.x versions or from the Mac
   OS X Server version of MySQL to the official MySQL PKG, you also
   need to convert the existing MySQL privilege tables to the current
   format, because some new security privileges have been added. See
   Section 4.4.8, "mysql_upgrade --- Check Tables for MySQL Upgrade."

   If you want MySQL to start automatically during system startup,
   you also need to install the MySQL Startup Item. It is part of the
   Mac OS X installation disk images as a separate installation
   package. Simply double-click the MySQLStartupItem.pkg icon and
   follow the instructions to install it. The Startup Item need be
   installed only once. There is no need to install it each time you
   upgrade the MySQL package later.

   The Startup Item for MySQL is installed into
   /Library/StartupItems/MySQLCOM. (Before MySQL 4.1.2, the location
   was /Library/StartupItems/MySQL, but that collided with the MySQL
   Startup Item installed by Mac OS X Server.) Startup Item
   installation adds a variable MYSQLCOM=-YES- to the system
   configuration file /etc/hostconfig. If you want to disable the
   automatic startup of MySQL, simply change this variable to
   MYSQLCOM=-NO-.

   On Mac OS X Server, the default MySQL installation uses the
   variable MYSQL in the /etc/hostconfig file. The MySQL Startup Item
   installer disables this variable by setting it to MYSQL=-NO-. This
   avoids boot time conflicts with the MYSQLCOM variable used by the
   MySQL Startup Item. However, it does not shut down a running MySQL
   server. You should do that yourself.

   After the installation, you can start up MySQL by running the
   following commands in a terminal window. You must have
   administrator privileges to perform this task.

   If you have installed the Startup Item, use this command:
shell> sudo /Library/StartupItems/MySQLCOM/MySQLCOM start
(Enter your password, if necessary)
(Press Control-D or enter "exit" to exit the shell)

   If you don't use the Startup Item, enter the following command
   sequence:
shell> cd /usr/local/mysql
shell> sudo ./bin/mysqld_safe
(Enter your password, if necessary)
(Press Control-Z)
shell> bg
(Press Control-D or enter "exit" to exit the shell)

   You should be able to connect to the MySQL server, for example, by
   running /usr/local/mysql/bin/mysql.

Note

   The accounts that are listed in the MySQL grant tables initially
   have no passwords. After starting the server, you should set up
   passwords for them using the instructions in Section 2.11,
   "Post-Installation Setup and Testing."

   You might want to add aliases to your shell's resource file to
   make it easier to access commonly used programs such as mysql and
   mysqladmin from the command line. The syntax for bash is:
alias mysql=/usr/local/mysql/bin/mysql
alias mysqladmin=/usr/local/mysql/bin/mysqladmin

   For tcsh, use:
alias mysql /usr/local/mysql/bin/mysql
alias mysqladmin /usr/local/mysql/bin/mysqladmin

   Even better, add /usr/local/mysql/bin to your PATH environment
   variable. You can do this by modifying the appropriate startup
   file for your shell. For more information, see Section 4.2.1,
   "Invoking MySQL Programs."

   If you are upgrading an existing installation, note that
   installing a new MySQL PKG does not remove the directory of an
   older installation. Unfortunately, the Mac OS X Installer does not
   yet offer the functionality required to properly upgrade
   previously installed packages.

   To use your existing databases with the new installation, you'll
   need to copy the contents of the old data directory to the new
   data directory. Make sure that neither the old server nor the new
   one is running when you do this. After you have copied over the
   MySQL database files from the previous installation and have
   successfully started the new server, you should consider removing
   the old installation files to save disk space. Additionally, you
   should also remove older versions of the Package Receipt
   directories located in /Library/Receipts/mysql-VERSION.pkg.

2.6. Installing MySQL on Solaris

   To obtain a binary MySQL distribution for Solaris in tarball or
   PKG format, http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/mysql/5.1.html.

   If you install MySQL using a binary tarball distribution on
   Solaris, you may run into trouble even before you get the MySQL
   distribution unpacked, as the Solaris tar cannot handle long file
   names. This means that you may see errors when you try to unpack
   MySQL.

   If this occurs, you must use GNU tar (gtar) to unpack the
   distribution.

   You can install MySQL on Solaris using a binary package in PKG
   format instead of the binary tarball distribution. Before
   installing using the binary PKG format, you should create the
   mysql user and group, for example:
groupadd mysql
useradd -g mysql mysql

   Some basic PKG-handling commands follow:

     * To add a package:
pkgadd -d package_name.pkg

     * To remove a package:
pkgrm package_name

     * To get a full list of installed packages:
pkginfo

     * To get detailed information for a package:
pkginfo -l package_name

     * To list the files belonging to a package:
pkgchk -v package_name

     * To get packaging information for an arbitrary file:
pkgchk -l -p file_name

   For additional information about installing MySQL on Solaris, see
   Section 2.13.3, "Solaris Notes."

2.7. Installing MySQL on i5/OS

   The i5/OS POWER MySQL package was created in cooperation with IBM.
   MySQL works within the Portable Application Solution Environment
   (PASE) on the System i series of hardware and will also provide
   database services for the Zend Core for i5/OS.

   MySQL for i5/OS is provided as a save file (.savf) package that
   can be downloaded and installed directly without any additional
   installation steps required.

   MySQL is only supported on i5/OS V5R4 or later releases. The i5/OS
   PASE must be installed for MySQL to operate. You must be able to
   login as a user in *SECOFR class.

   You should the installation notes and tips for i5/OS before
   starting installation. See i5/OS Installation Notes.

Note

   The installation package will use an existing configuration if you
   have previously installed MySQL (which is identified by looking
   for the file /etc/my.cnf). The values for the data directory
   (DATADIR) and owner of the MySQL files (USRPRF) specified during
   the installation will be ignored, and the values determined from
   the /etc/my.cnf will be used instead.

   If you want to change these parameters during a new install, you
   should temporarily rename /etc/my.cnf, install MySQL using the new
   parameters you want to use, and then merge your previous
   /etc/my.cnf configuration settings with the new /etc/my.cnf file
   that is created during installation.

   To install MySQL on i5/OS, follow these steps:

    1. Create a user profile MYSQL. The MYSQL user profile will own
       all the MySQL files and databases and be the active user used
       when the MySQL server is running. The profile should be
       disabled so that you cannot log in as the MySQL user. To
       create a user profile, use CRTUSRPRF:
CRTUSRPRF USRPRF(MYSQL) STATUS(*DISABLED) TEXT('MySQL user id')

    2. On the System i machine, create a save file that will be used
       to receive the downloaded installation save file. The file
       should be located within the General Purpose Library (QGPL):
CRTSAVF FILE(QGPL/MYSQLINST)

    3. Download the MySQL installation save file in 32-bit
       (mysql-5.0.42-i5os-power-32bit.savf) or 64-bit
       (mysql-5.0.42-i5os-power-64bit.savf) from MySQL Downloads
       (http://dev.mysql.com/downloads).

    4. You need to FTP the downloaded .savf file directly into the
       QGPL/MYSQLINST file on the System i server. You can do this
       through FTP using the following steps after logging in to the
       System i machine:
ftp> bin
ftp> cd qgpl
ftp> put mysql-5.0.42-i5os-power.savf mysqlinst

    5. Log into the System i server using a user in the *SECOFR
       class, such as the QSECOFR user ID.

    6. You need to restore the installation library stored in the
       .savf save file:
RSTLIB MYSQLINST DEV(*SAVF) SAVF(QGPL/MYSQLINST)

    7. You need to execute the installation command,
       MYSQLINST/INSMYSQL. You can specify three parameter settings
       during installation:

          + DIR('/opt/mysql') sets the installation location for the
            MySQL files. The directory will be created if it does not
            already exist.

          + DATADIR('/QOpenSys/mysal/data') sets the location of the
            directory that will be used to store the database files
            and binary logs. The default setting is
            /QOpenSys/mysql/data. Note that if the installer detects
            an existing installation (due to the existence of
            /etc/my.cnf), then this parameter will be ignored.

          + USRPRF(MYSQL) sets the user profile that will own the
            files that are installed. The profile will be created if
            it does not already exist.
       MySQL can be installed anywhere, for this example we will
       assume MySQL has been installed into /opt/mysql. The MYSQL
       user profile that was created earlier in this sequence should
       be used for the profile:
MYSQLINST/INSMYSQL DIR('/opt/mysql') DATADIR('/opt/mysqldata') USRPRF
(MYSQL)
       If you are updating an installation over an existing MySQL
       installation, you should use the same parameter values that
       were used when MySQL was originally installed.
       The installation copies all the necessary files into a
       directory matching the package version (for example
       mysql-5.0.42-i5os-power-32bit), sets the ownership on those
       files, sets up the MySQL environment and creates the MySQL
       configuration file (in /etc/my.cnf) completing all the steps
       in a typical binary installation process automatically. If
       this is a new installation of MySQL, or if the installer
       detects that this is a new version (because the /etc/my.cnf
       file does not exist), then the initial core MySQL databases
       will also be created during installation.

    8. Once the installation has completed, you can delete the
       installation file:
DLTLIB LIB(MYSQLINST)

   To start MySQL:

    1. Log into the System i server using a user within the *SECOFR
       class, such as the QSECOFR user ID.

Note
       You should start mysqld_safe using a user that in the PASE
       environment has the id=0 (the equivalent of the standard Unix
       root user). If you do not use a user with this ID then the
       system will be unable to change the user when executing mysqld
       as set using --user option. If this happens, mysqld may be
       unable to read the files located within the MySQL data
       directory and the execution will fail.

    2. Enter the PASE environment using call qp2term.

    3. Start the MySQL server by changing to the installation
       directory and running mysqld_safe, specifying the user name
       used to install the server. The installer conveniently
       installs a symbolic link to the installation directory
       (mysql-5.0.42-i5os-power-32bit) as /opt/mysql/mysql:
> cd /opt/mysql/mysql
> bin/mysqld_safe --user=mysql &
       You should see a message similar to the following:
Starting mysqld daemon with databases 
     from /opt/mysql/mysql-enterprise-5.0.42-i5os-power-32bit/data

   If you are having problems starting MySQL server, see Section
   2.11.2.3, "Starting and Troubleshooting the MySQL Server."

   To stop MySQL:

    1. Log into the System i server using the *SECOFR class, such as
       the QSECOFR user ID.

    2. Enter the PASE environment using call qp2term.

    3. Stop the MySQL server by changing into the installation
       directory and running mysqladmin, specifying the user name
       used to install the server:
> cd /opt/mysql/mysql
> bin/mysqladmin -u root shutdown
       If the session that you started and stopped MySQL are the
       same, you may get the log output from mysqld:
   STOPPING server from pid file 
     /opt/mysql/mysql-enterprise-5.0.42-i5os-power-32bit/data/I5DBX.R
CHLAND.IBM.COM.pid
   070718 10:34:20  mysqld ended
       If the sessions used to start and stop MySQL are different,
       you will not receive any confirmation of the shutdown.

   Note and tips

     * A problem has been identified with the installation process on
       DBCS systems. If you are having problems install MySQL on a
       DBCS system, you need to change your job's coded character set
       identifier (CSSID) to 37 (EBCDIC) before executing the install
       command, INSMYSQL. To do this, determine your existing CSSID
       (using DSPJOB and selecting option 2), execute CHGJOB
       CSSID(37), run INSMYSQL to install MySQL and then execute
       CHGJOB again with your original CSSID.

     * If you want to use the Perl scripts that are included with
       MySQL, you need to download the iSeries Tools for Developers
       (5799-PTL). See
       http://www-03.ibm.com/servers/enable/site/porting/tools/.

2.8. Installing MySQL on NetWare

   Porting MySQL to NetWare was an effort spearheaded by Novell.
   Novell customers should be pleased to note that NetWare 6.5 ships
   with bundled MySQL binaries, complete with an automatic commercial
   use license for all servers running that version of NetWare.

   MySQL for NetWare is compiled using a combination of Metrowerks
   CodeWarrior for NetWare and special cross-compilation versions of
   the GNU autotools.

   The latest binary packages for NetWare can be obtained at
   http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/. See Section 2.1.3, "How to Get
   MySQL."

   To host MySQL, the NetWare server must meet these requirements:

     * The latest Support Pack of NetWare 6.5
       (http://support.novell.com/filefinder/18197/index.html) must
       be installed.

     * The system must meet Novell's minimum requirements to run the
       respective version of NetWare.

     * MySQL data and the program binaries must be installed on an
       NSS volume; traditional volumes are not supported.

   To install MySQL for NetWare, use the following procedure:

    1. If you are upgrading from a prior installation, stop the MySQL
       server. This is done from the server console, using the
       following command:
SERVER:  mysqladmin -u root shutdown

Note
       If the MySQL root user account has a password, you need to
       invoke mysqladmin with the -p option and supply the password
       when prompted.

    2. Log on to the target server from a client machine with access
       to the location where you are installing MySQL.

    3. Extract the binary package Zip file onto the server. Be sure
       to allow the paths in the Zip file to be used. It is safe to
       simply extract the file to SYS:\.
       If you are upgrading from a prior installation, you may need
       to copy the data directory (for example, SYS:MYSQL\DATA), as
       well as my.cnf, if you have customized it. You can then delete
       the old copy of MySQL.

    4. You might want to rename the directory to something more
       consistent and easy to use. The examples in this manual use
       SYS:MYSQL to refer to the installation directory.
       Note that MySQL installation on NetWare does not detect if a
       version of MySQL is already installed outside the NetWare
       release. Therefore, if you have installed the latest MySQL
       version from the Web (for example, MySQL 4.1 or later) in
       SYS:\MYSQL, you must rename the folder before upgrading the
       NetWare server; otherwise, files in SYS:\MySQL are overwritten
       by the MySQL version present in NetWare Support Pack.

    5. At the server console, add a search path for the directory
       containing the MySQL NLMs. For example:
SERVER:  SEARCH ADD SYS:MYSQL\BIN

    6. Initialize the data directory and the grant tables, if
       necessary, by executing mysql_install_db at the server
       console.

    7. Start the MySQL server using mysqld_safe at the server
       console.

    8. To finish the installation, you should also add the following
       commands to autoexec.ncf. For example, if your MySQL
       installation is in SYS:MYSQL and you want MySQL to start
       automatically, you could add these lines:
#Starts the MySQL 5.1.x database server
SEARCH ADD SYS:MYSQL\BIN
MYSQLD_SAFE
       If you are running MySQL on NetWare 6.0, we strongly suggest
       that you use the --skip-external-locking option on the command
       line:
#Starts the MySQL 5.1.x database server
SEARCH ADD SYS:MYSQL\BIN
MYSQLD_SAFE --skip-external-locking
       It is also necessary to use CHECK TABLE and REPAIR TABLE
       instead of myisamchk, because myisamchk makes use of external
       locking. External locking is known to have problems on NetWare
       6.0; the problem has been eliminated in NetWare 6.5. Note that
       the use of MySQL on Netware 6.0 is not officially supported.
       mysqld_safe on NetWare provides a screen presence. When you
       unload (shut down) the mysqld_safe NLM, the screen does not go
       away by default. Instead, it prompts for user input:
*<NLM has terminated; Press any key to close the screen>*
       If you want NetWare to close the screen automatically instead,
       use the --autoclose option to mysqld_safe. For example:
#Starts the MySQL 5.1.x database server
SEARCH ADD SYS:MYSQL\BIN
MYSQLD_SAFE --autoclose
       The behavior of mysqld_safe on NetWare is described further in
       Section 4.3.2, "mysqld_safe --- MySQL Server Startup Script."

    9. When installing MySQL, either for the first time or upgrading
       from a previous version, download and install the latest and
       appropriate Perl module and PHP extensions for NetWare:

          + Perl:
            http://forge.novell.com/modules/xfcontent/downloads.php/p
            erl/Modules/

          + PHP:
            http://forge.novell.com/modules/xfcontent/downloads.php/p
            hp/Modules/

   If there was an existing installation of MySQL on the NetWare
   server, be sure to check for existing MySQL startup commands in
   autoexec.ncf, and edit or delete them as necessary.

Note

   The accounts that are listed in the MySQL grant tables initially
   have no passwords. After starting the server, you should set up
   passwords for them using the instructions in Section 2.11,
   "Post-Installation Setup and Testing."

2.9. Installing MySQL from tar.gz Packages on Other Unix-Like Systems

   This section covers the installation of MySQL binary distributions
   that are provided for various platforms in the form of compressed
   tar files (files with a .tar.gz extension). See Section 2.1.2.4,
   "MySQL Binaries Compiled by Sun Microsystems, Inc.," for a
   detailed list.

   To obtain MySQL, see Section 2.1.3, "How to Get MySQL."

   MySQL tar file binary distributions have names of the form
   mysql-VERSION-OS.tar.gz, where VERSION is a number (for example,
   5.1.39), and OS indicates the type of operating system for which
   the distribution is intended (for example, pc-linux-i686).

   In addition to these generic packages, we also offer binaries in
   platform-specific package formats for selected platforms. See
   Section 2.2, "Standard MySQL Installation Using a Binary
   Distribution," for more information on how to install these.

   You need the following tools to install a MySQL tar file binary
   distribution:

     * GNU gunzip to uncompress the distribution.

     * A reasonable tar to unpack the distribution. GNU tar is known
       to work. Some operating systems come with a preinstalled
       version of tar that is known to have problems. For example,
       the tar provided with early versions of Mac OS X, SunOS 4.x
       and Solaris 8 and earlier are known to have problems with long
       file names. On Mac OS X, you can use the preinstalled gnutar
       program. On other systems with a deficient tar, you should
       install GNU tar first.

   If you run into problems and need to file a bug report, please use
   the instructions in Section 1.6, "How to Report Bugs or Problems."

   The basic commands that you must execute to install and use a
   MySQL binary distribution are:
shell> groupadd mysql
shell> useradd -g mysql mysql
shell> cd /usr/local
shell> gunzip < /path/to/mysql-VERSION-OS.tar.gz | tar xvf -
shell> ln -s full-path-to-mysql-VERSION-OS mysql
shell> cd mysql
shell> chown -R mysql .
shell> chgrp -R mysql .
shell> scripts/mysql_install_db --user=mysql
shell> chown -R root .
shell> chown -R mysql data
shell> bin/mysqld_safe --user=mysql &

Note

   This procedure does not set up any passwords for MySQL accounts.
   After following the procedure, proceed to Section 2.11,
   "Post-Installation Setup and Testing."

   A more detailed version of the preceding description for
   installing a binary distribution follows:

    1. Add a login user and group for mysqld to run as:
shell> groupadd mysql
shell> useradd -g mysql mysql
       These commands add the mysql group and the mysql user. The
       syntax for useradd and groupadd may differ slightly on
       different versions of Unix, or they may have different names
       such as adduser and addgroup.
       You might want to call the user and group something else
       instead of mysql. If so, substitute the appropriate name in
       the following steps.

    2. Pick the directory under which you want to unpack the
       distribution and change location into it. In the following
       example, we unpack the distribution under /usr/local. (The
       instructions, therefore, assume that you have permission to
       create files and directories in /usr/local. If that directory
       is protected, you must perform the installation as root.)
shell> cd /usr/local

    3. Obtain a distribution file using the instructions in Section
       2.1.3, "How to Get MySQL." For a given release, binary
       distributions for all platforms are built from the same MySQL
       source distribution.

    4. Unpack the distribution, which creates the installation
       directory. Then create a symbolic link to that directory:
shell> gunzip < /path/to/mysql-VERSION-OS.tar.gz | tar xvf -
shell> ln -s full-path-to-mysql-VERSION-OS mysql
       The tar command creates a directory named mysql-VERSION-OS.
       The ln command makes a symbolic link to that directory. This
       lets you refer more easily to the installation directory as
       /usr/local/mysql.
       With GNU tar, no separate invocation of gunzip is necessary.
       You can replace the first line with the following alternative
       command to uncompress and extract the distribution:
shell> tar zxvf /path/to/mysql-VERSION-OS.tar.gz

    5. Change location into the installation directory:
shell> cd mysql
       You will find several files and subdirectories in the mysql
       directory. The most important for installation purposes are
       the bin and scripts subdirectories:

          + The bin directory contains client programs and the
            server. You should add the full path name of this
            directory to your PATH environment variable so that your
            shell finds the MySQL programs properly. See Section
            2.14, "Environment Variables."

          + The scripts directory contains the mysql_install_db
            script used to initialize the mysql database containing
            the grant tables that store the server access
            permissions.

    6. Ensure that the distribution contents are accessible to mysql.
       If you unpacked the distribution as mysql, no further action
       is required. If you unpacked the distribution as root, its
       contents will be owned by root. Change its ownership to mysql
       by executing the following commands as root in the
       installation directory:
shell> chown -R mysql .
shell> chgrp -R mysql .
       The first command changes the owner attribute of the files to
       the mysql user. The second changes the group attribute to the
       mysql group.

    7. If you have not installed MySQL before, you must create the
       MySQL data directory and initialize the grant tables:
shell> scripts/mysql_install_db --user=mysql
       If you run the command as root, include the --user option as
       shown. If you run the command while logged in as that user,
       you can omit the --user option.
       The command should create the data directory and its contents
       with mysql as the owner.
       After creating or updating the grant tables, you need to
       restart the server manually.

    8. Most of the MySQL installation can be owned by root if you
       like. The exception is that the data directory must be owned
       by mysql. To accomplish this, run the following commands as
       root in the installation directory:
shell> chown -R root .
shell> chown -R mysql data

    9. If you want MySQL to start automatically when you boot your
       machine, you can copy support-files/mysql.server to the
       location where your system has its startup files. More
       information can be found in the support-files/mysql.server
       script itself and in Section 2.11.2.2, "Starting and Stopping
       MySQL Automatically."
   10. You can set up new accounts using the bin/mysql_setpermission
       script if you install the DBI and DBD::mysql Perl modules. See
       Section 4.6.14, "mysql_setpermission --- Interactively Set
       Permissions in Grant Tables." For Perl module installation
       instructions, see Section 2.15, "Perl Installation Notes."
   11. If you would like to use mysqlaccess and have the MySQL
       distribution in some nonstandard location, you must change the
       location where mysqlaccess expects to find the mysql client.
       Edit the bin/mysqlaccess script at approximately line 18.
       Search for a line that looks like this:
$MYSQL     = '/usr/local/bin/mysql';    # path to mysql executable
       Change the path to reflect the location where mysql actually
       is stored on your system. If you do not do this, a Broken pipe
       error will occur when you run mysqlaccess.

   After everything has been unpacked and installed, you should test
   your distribution. To start the MySQL server, use the following
   command:
shell> bin/mysqld_safe --user=mysql &

   If you run the command as root, you must use the --user option as
   shown. The value of the option is the name of the login account
   that you created in the first step to use for running the server.
   If you run the command while logged in as mysql, you can omit the
   --user option.

   If the command fails immediately and prints mysqld ended, you can
   find some information in the host_name.err file in the data
   directory.

   More information about mysqld_safe is given in Section 4.3.2,
   "mysqld_safe --- MySQL Server Startup Script."

Note

   The accounts that are listed in the MySQL grant tables initially
   have no passwords. After starting the server, you should set up
   passwords for them using the instructions in Section 2.11,
   "Post-Installation Setup and Testing."

2.10. MySQL Installation Using a Source Distribution

   Before you proceed with an installation from source, first check
   whether our binary is available for your platform and whether it
   works for you. We put a great deal of effort into ensuring that
   our binaries are built with the best possible options.

   To obtain a source distribution for MySQL, Section 2.1.3, "How to
   Get MySQL." If you want to build MySQL from source on Windows, see
   Section 2.10.6, "Installing MySQL from Source on Windows."

   MySQL source distributions are provided as compressed tar archives
   and have names of the form mysql-VERSION.tar.gz, where VERSION is
   a number like 5.1.39.

   You need the following tools to build and install MySQL from
   source:

     * GNU gunzip to uncompress the distribution.

     * A reasonable tar to unpack the distribution. GNU tar is known
       to work. Some operating systems come with a preinstalled
       version of tar that is known to have problems. For example,
       the tar provided with early versions of Mac OS X, SunOS 4.x
       and Solaris 8 and earlier are known to have problems with long
       file names. On Mac OS X, you can use the preinstalled gnutar
       program. On other systems with a deficient tar, you should
       install GNU tar first.

     * A working ANSI C++ compiler. gcc 2.95.2 or later, SGI C++, and
       SunPro C++ are some of the compilers that are known to work.
       libg++ is not needed when using gcc. gcc 2.7.x has a bug that
       makes it impossible to compile some perfectly legal C++ files,
       such as sql/sql_base.cc. If you have only gcc 2.7.x, you must
       upgrade your gcc to be able to compile MySQL. gcc 2.8.1 is
       also known to have problems on some platforms, so it should be
       avoided if a newer compiler exists for the platform. gcc
       2.95.2 or later is recommended.

     * A good make program. GNU make is always recommended and is
       sometimes required. (BSD make fails, and vendor-provided make
       implementations may fail as well.) If you have problems, use
       GNU make 3.75 or newer.

     * libtool 1.5.24 or later is also recommended.

   If you are using a version of gcc recent enough to understand the
   -fno-exceptions option, it is very important that you use this
   option. Otherwise, you may compile a binary that crashes randomly.
   Also use -felide-constructors and -fno-rtti along with
   -fno-exceptions. When in doubt, do the following:
CFLAGS="-O3" CXX=gcc CXXFLAGS="-O3 -felide-constructors \
       -fno-exceptions -fno-rtti" ./configure \
       --prefix=/usr/local/mysql --enable-assembler \
       --with-mysqld-ldflags=-all-static

   On most systems, this gives you a fast and stable binary.

   If you run into problems and need to file a bug report, please use
   the instructions in Section 1.6, "How to Report Bugs or Problems."

2.10.1. Source Installation Overview

   The basic commands that you must execute to install a MySQL source
   distribution are:
shell> groupadd mysql
shell> useradd -g mysql mysql
shell> gunzip < mysql-VERSION.tar.gz | tar -xvf -
shell> cd mysql-VERSION
shell> ./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql
shell> make
shell> make install
shell> cp support-files/my-medium.cnf /etc/my.cnf
shell> cd /usr/local/mysql
shell> chown -R mysql .
shell> chgrp -R mysql .
shell> bin/mysql_install_db --user=mysql
shell> chown -R root .
shell> chown -R mysql var
shell> bin/mysqld_safe --user=mysql &

   If you start from a source RPM, do the following:
shell> rpmbuild --rebuild --clean MySQL-VERSION.src.rpm

   This makes a binary RPM that you can install. For older versions
   of RPM, you may have to replace the command rpmbuild with rpm
   instead.

Note

   This procedure does not set up any passwords for MySQL accounts.
   After following the procedure, proceed to Section 2.11,
   "Post-Installation Setup and Testing," for post-installation setup
   and testing.

   A more detailed version of the preceding description for
   installing MySQL from a source distribution follows:

    1. Add a login user and group for mysqld to run as:
shell> groupadd mysql
shell> useradd -g mysql mysql
       These commands add the mysql group and the mysql user. The
       syntax for useradd and groupadd may differ slightly on
       different versions of Unix, or they may have different names
       such as adduser and addgroup.
       You might want to call the user and group something else
       instead of mysql. If so, substitute the appropriate name in
       the following steps.

    2. Perform the following steps as the mysql user, except as
       noted.

    3. Pick the directory under which you want to unpack the
       distribution and change location into it.

    4. Obtain a distribution file using the instructions in Section
       2.1.3, "How to Get MySQL."

    5. Unpack the distribution into the current directory:
shell> gunzip < /path/to/mysql-VERSION.tar.gz | tar xvf -
       This command creates a directory named mysql-VERSION.
       With GNU tar, no separate invocation of gunzip is necessary.
       You can use the following alternative command to uncompress
       and extract the distribution:
shell> tar zxvf /path/to/mysql-VERSION-OS.tar.gz

    6. Change location into the top-level directory of the unpacked
       distribution:
shell> cd mysql-VERSION
       Note that currently you must configure and build MySQL from
       this top-level directory. You cannot build it in a different
       directory.

    7. Configure the release and compile everything:
shell> ./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql
shell> make
       When you run configure, you might want to specify other
       options. Run ./configure --help for a list of options. Section
       2.10.2, "Typical configure Options," discusses some of the
       more useful options.
       If configure fails and you are going to send mail to a MySQL
       mailing list to ask for assistance, please include any lines
       from config.log that you think can help solve the problem.
       Also include the last couple of lines of output from
       configure. To file a bug report, please use the instructions
       in Section 1.6, "How to Report Bugs or Problems."
       If the compile fails, see Section 2.10.4, "Dealing with
       Problems Compiling MySQL," for help.

    8. Install the distribution:
shell> make install
       You might need to run this command as root.
       If you want to set up an option file, use one of those present
       in the support-files directory as a template. For example:
shell> cp support-files/my-medium.cnf /etc/my.cnf
       You might need to run this command as root.
       If you want to configure support for InnoDB tables, you should
       edit the /etc/my.cnf file, remove the # character before the
       option lines that start with innodb_..., and modify the option
       values to be what you want. See Section 4.2.3.3, "Using Option
       Files," and Section 13.6.2, "InnoDB Configuration."

    9. Change location into the installation directory:
shell> cd /usr/local/mysql
   10. If you ran the make install command as root, the installed
       files will be owned by root. Ensure that the installation is
       accessible to mysql by executing the following commands as
       root in the installation directory:
shell> chown -R mysql .
shell> chgrp -R mysql .
       The first command changes the owner attribute of the files to
       the mysql user. The second changes the group attribute to the
       mysql group.
   11. If you have not installed MySQL before, you must create the
       MySQL data directory and initialize the grant tables:
shell> bin/mysql_install_db --user=mysql
       If you run the command as root, include the --user option as
       shown. If you run the command while logged in as mysql, you
       can omit the --user option.
       The command should create the data directory and its contents
       with mysql as the owner.
       After using mysql_install_db to create the grant tables for
       MySQL, you must restart the server manually. The mysqld_safe
       command to do this is shown in a later step.
   12. Most of the MySQL installation can be owned by root if you
       like. The exception is that the data directory must be owned
       by mysql. To accomplish this, run the following commands as
       root in the installation directory:
shell> chown -R root .
shell> chown -R mysql var
   13. If you want MySQL to start automatically when you boot your
       machine, you can copy support-files/mysql.server to the
       location where your system has its startup files. More
       information can be found in the support-files/mysql.server
       script itself; see also Section 2.11.2.2, "Starting and
       Stopping MySQL Automatically."
   14. You can set up new accounts using the bin/mysql_setpermission
       script if you install the DBI and DBD::mysql Perl modules. See
       Section 4.6.14, "mysql_setpermission --- Interactively Set
       Permissions in Grant Tables." For Perl module installation
       instructions, see Section 2.15, "Perl Installation Notes."

   After everything has been installed, you should test your
   distribution. To start the MySQL server, use the following
   command:
shell> /usr/local/mysql/bin/mysqld_safe --user=mysql &

   If you run the command as root, you should use the --user option
   as shown. The value of the option is the name of the login account
   that you created in the first step to use for running the server.
   If you run the command while logged in as that user, you can omit
   the --user option.

   If the command fails immediately and prints mysqld ended, you can
   find some information in the host_name.err file in the data
   directory.

   More information about mysqld_safe is given in Section 4.3.2,
   "mysqld_safe --- MySQL Server Startup Script."

Note

   The accounts that are listed in the MySQL grant tables initially
   have no passwords. After starting the server, you should set up
   passwords for them using the instructions in Section 2.11,
   "Post-Installation Setup and Testing."

2.10.2. Typical configure Options

   The configure script gives you a great deal of control over how
   you configure a MySQL source distribution. Typically you do this
   using options on the configure command line. You can also affect
   configure using certain environment variables. See Section 2.14,
   "Environment Variables." For a full list of options supported by
   configure, run this command:
shell> ./configure --help

   A list of the available configure options is provided in the table
   below.

   Table 2.1. Build (configure) Reference
   Formats Description Default Introduced Removed
   --bindir=DIR User executables EPREFIX/bin
   --build=BUILD Configure for building on BUILD guessed
   --cache-file=FILE Cache test results in FILE disabled
   -C Alias for `--cache-file=config.cache'
   --config-cache
   --datadir=DIR Read-only architecture-independent data PREFIX/share

   --disable-FEATURE Do not include FEATURE
   --disable-dependency-tracking Disable dependency tracking
   --disable-grant-options Disable GRANT options
   --disable-largefile Omit support for large files
   --disable-libtool-lock Disable libtool lock
   --disable-thread-safe-client Compile the client without threads
   5.1.7
   --enable-FEATURE Enable FEATURE
   --enable-assembler Use assembler versions of some string functions
   if available
   --enable-dependency-tracking Do not reject slow dependency
   extractors
   --enable-fast-install Optimize for fast installation yes
   --enable-local-infile Enable LOAD DATA LOCAL INFILE disabled
   --enable-shared Build shared libraries yes
   --enable-static Build static libraries yes
   --enable-thread-safe-client Compile the client with threads
   --exec-prefix=EPREFIX Install architecture-dependent files in
   EPREFIX
   -h Display this help and exit
   --help
   --help=short Display options specific to this package
   --help=recursive Display the short help of all the included
   packages
   --host=HOST Cross-compile to build programs to run on HOST
   --includedir=DIR C header files PREFIX/include
   --infodir=DIR Info documentation PREFIX/info
   --libdir=DIR Object code libraries EPREFIX/lib
   --libexecdir=DIR Program executables EPREFIX/libexec
   --localstatedir=DIR Modifiable single-machine data PREFIX/var
   --mandir=DIR man documentation PREFIX/man
   -n Do not create output files
   --no-create
   --oldincludedir=DIR C header files for non-gcc /usr/include
   --prefix=PREFIX Install architecture-independent files in PREFIX

   --program-prefix=PREFIX Prepend PREFIX to installed program names

   --program-suffix=SUFFIX Append SUFFIX to installed program names

   --program-transform-name=PROGRAM run sed PROGRAM on installed
   program names
   -q Do not print `checking...' messages
   --quiet
   --sbindir=DIR System admin executables EPREFIX/sbin
   --sharedstatedir=DIR Modifiable architecture-independent data
   PREFIX/com
   --srcdir=DIR Find the sources in DIR configure directory or ..
   --sysconfdir=DIR Read-only single-machine data PREFIX/etc
   --target=TARGET Configure for building compilers for TARGET
   -V Display version information and exit
   --version
   --with-PACKAGE Use PACKAGE
   --with-archive-storage-engine Enable the Archive Storage Engine no

   --with-atomic-ops Implement atomic operations using pthread
   rwlocks or atomic CPU instructions for multi-processor   5.1.12
   --with-berkeley-db Use BerkeleyDB located in DIR no
   --with-berkeley-db-includes Find Berkeley DB headers in DIR
   --with-berkeley-db-libs Find Berkeley DB libraries in DIR
   --with-big-tables Support tables with more than 4 G rows even on
   32 bit platforms
   --with-blackhole-storage-engine Enable the Blackhole Storage
   Engine no
   --with-charset Default character set
   --with-client-ldflags Extra linking arguments for clients
   --with-collation Default collation
   --with-comment Comment about compilation environment
   --with-csv-storage-engine Enable the CSV Storage Engine yes
   --with-darwin-mwcc Use Metrowerks CodeWarrior wrappers on OS
   X/Darwin
   --with-debug Add debug code   5.1.7
   --with-debug=full Add debug code (adds memory checker, very slow)

   --with-embedded-privilege-control Build parts to check user's
   privileges (only affects embedded library)
   --with-embedded-server Build the embedded server
   --with-error-inject Enable error injection in MySQL Server
   5.1.11
   --with-example-storage-engine Enable the Example Storage Engine no

   --with-extra-charsets Use charsets in addition to default
   --with-fast-mutexes Compile with fast mutexes enabled 5.1.5
   --with-federated-storage-engine Enable federated storage engine no
   5.1.3 5.1.9
   --with-gnu-ld Assume the C compiler uses GNU ld no
   --with-innodb Enable innobase storage engine no 5.1.3 5.1.9
   --with-lib-ccflags Extra CC options for libraries
   --with-libwrap=DIR Compile in libwrap (tcp_wrappers) support
   --with-low-memory Try to use less memory to compile to avoid
   memory limitations
   --with-machine-type Set the machine type, like "powerpc"
   --with-max-indexes=N Sets the maximum number of indexes per table
   64
   --with-mysqld-ldflags Extra linking arguments for mysqld
   --with-mysqld-libs Extra libraries to link with for mysqld
   --with-mysqld-user What user the mysqld daemon shall be run as

   --with-mysqlmanager Build the mysqlmanager binary Build if server
   is built
   --with-named-curses-libs Use specified curses libraries
   --with-named-thread-libs Use specified thread libraries
   --with-ndb-ccflags Extra CC options for ndb compile
   --with-ndb-docs Include the NDB Cluster ndbapi and mgmapi
   documentation
   --with-ndb-port Port for NDB Cluster management server
   --with-ndb-port-base Port for NDB Cluster management server
   --with-ndb-sci=DIR Provide MySQL with a custom location of sci
   library
   --with-ndb-test Include the NDB Cluster ndbapi test programs
   --with-ndbcluster Include the NDB Cluster table handler no
   --with-openssl=DIR Include the OpenSSL support
   --with-openssl-includes Find OpenSSL headers in DIR
   --with-openssl-libs Find OpenSSL libraries in DIR
   --with-other-libc=DIR Link against libc and other standard
   libraries installed in the specified nonstandard location
   --with-pic Try to use only PIC/non-PIC objects Use both
   --with-plugin-PLUGIN Forces the named plugin to be linked into
   mysqld statically   5.1.11
   --with-plugins Plugins to include in mysqld none 5.1.11
   --with-pstack Use the pstack backtrace library
   --with-pthread Force use of pthread library
   --with-row-based-replication Include row-based replication   5.1.5
   5.1.6
   --with-server-suffix Append value to the version string
   --with-ssl=DIR Include SSL support   5.1.11
   --with-system-type Set the system type, like "sun-solaris10"
   --with-tags Include additional configurations automatic
   --with-tcp-port Which port to use for MySQL services 3306
   --with-unix-socket-path Where to put the unix-domain socket
   --with-yassl Include the yaSSL support
   --with-zlib-dir=no|bundled|DIR Provide MySQL with a custom
   location of compression library
   --without-PACKAGE Do not use PACKAGE
   --without-bench Skip building of the benchmark suite
   --without-debug Build a production version without debugging code

   --without-docs Skip building of the documentation
   --without-extra-tools Skip building utilities in the tools
   directory
   --without-geometry Do not build geometry-related parts
   --without-libedit Use system libedit instead of bundled copy
   --without-man Skip building of the man pages
   --without-ndb-binlog Disable ndb binlog   5.1.6
   --without-ndb-debug Disable special ndb debug features
   --without-plugin-PLUGIN Exclude PLUGIN   5.1.11
   --without-query-cache Do not build query cache
   --without-readline Use system readline instead of bundled copy

   --without-row-based-replication Don't include row-based
   replication   5.1.7 5.1.14
   --without-server Only build the client
   --without-uca Skip building of the national Unicode collations

   Some of the configure options available are described here. For
   options that may be of use if you have difficulties building
   MySQL, see Section 2.10.4, "Dealing with Problems Compiling
   MySQL."

     * To compile just the MySQL client libraries and client programs
       and not the server, use the --without-server option:
shell> ./configure --without-server
       If you have no C++ compiler, some client programs such as
       mysql cannot be compiled because they require C++.. In this
       case, you can remove the code in configure that tests for the
       C++ compiler and then run ./configure with the
       --without-server option. The compile step should still try to
       build all clients, but you can ignore any warnings about files
       such as mysql.cc. (If make stops, try make -k to tell it to
       continue with the rest of the build even if errors occur.)

     * If you want to build the embedded MySQL library (libmysqld.a),
       use the --with-embedded-server option.

     * If you don't want your log files and database directories
       located under /usr/local/var, use a configure command
       something like one of these:
shell> ./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql
shell> ./configure --prefix=/usr/local \
           --localstatedir=/usr/local/mysql/data
       The first command changes the installation prefix so that
       everything is installed under /usr/local/mysql rather than the
       default of /usr/local. The second command preserves the
       default installation prefix, but overrides the default
       location for database directories (normally /usr/local/var)
       and changes it to /usr/local/mysql/data.
       You can also specify the installation directory and data
       directory locations at server startup time by using the
       --basedir and --datadir options. These can be given on the
       command line or in an MySQL option file, although it is more
       common to use an option file. See Section 4.2.3.3, "Using
       Option Files."

     * If you are using Unix and you want the MySQL socket file
       location to be somewhere other than the default location
       (normally in the directory /tmp or /var/run), use a configure
       command like this:
shell> ./configure \
           --with-unix-socket-path=/usr/local/mysql/tmp/mysql.sock
       The socket file name must be an absolute path name. You can
       also change the location of mysql.sock at server startup by
       using a MySQL option file. See Section B.1.4.5, "How to
       Protect or Change the MySQL Unix Socket File."

     * If you want to compile statically linked programs (for
       example, to make a binary distribution, to get better
       performance, or to work around problems with some Red Hat
       Linux distributions), run configure like this:
shell> ./configure --with-client-ldflags=-all-static \
           --with-mysqld-ldflags=-all-static

     * If you are using gcc and don't have libg++ or libstdc++
       installed, you can tell configure to use gcc as your C++
       compiler:
shell> CC=gcc CXX=gcc ./configure
       When you use gcc as your C++ compiler, it does not attempt to
       link in libg++ or libstdc++. This may be a good thing to do
       even if you have those libraries installed. Some versions of
       them have caused strange problems for MySQL users in the past.
       The following list indicates some compilers and environment
       variable settings that are commonly used with each one.

          + gcc 2.7.2:
CC=gcc CXX=gcc CXXFLAGS="-O3 -felide-constructors"

          + gcc 2.95.2:
CFLAGS="-O3 -mpentiumpro" CXX=gcc CXXFLAGS="-O3 -mpentiumpro \
-felide-constructors -fno-exceptions -fno-rtti"

          + pgcc 2.90.29 or newer:
CFLAGS="-O3 -mpentiumpro -mstack-align-double" CXX=gcc \
CXXFLAGS="-O3 -mpentiumpro -mstack-align-double \
-felide-constructors -fno-exceptions -fno-rtti"
       In most cases, you can get a reasonably optimized MySQL binary
       by using the options from the preceding list and adding the
       following options to the configure line:
--prefix=/usr/local/mysql --enable-assembler \
--with-mysqld-ldflags=-all-static
       The full configure line would, in other words, be something
       like the following for all recent gcc versions:
CFLAGS="-O3 -mpentiumpro" CXX=gcc CXXFLAGS="-O3 -mpentiumpro \
-felide-constructors -fno-exceptions -fno-rtti" ./configure \
--prefix=/usr/local/mysql --enable-assembler \
--with-mysqld-ldflags=-all-static
       The binaries we provide on the MySQL Web site at
       http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/ are all compiled with full
       optimization and should be perfect for most users. See Section
       2.1.2.4, "MySQL Binaries Compiled by Sun Microsystems, Inc.."
       There are some configuration settings you can tweak to build
       an even faster binary, but these are only for advanced users.
       See Section 7.5.1, "How Compiling and Linking Affects the
       Speed of MySQL."
       If the build fails and produces errors about your compiler or
       linker not being able to create the shared library
       libmysqlclient.so.N (where N is a version number), you can
       work around this problem by giving the --disable-shared option
       to configure. In this case, configure does not build a shared
       libmysqlclient.so.N library.

     * By default, MySQL uses the latin1 (cp1252 West European)
       character set. To change the default set, use the
       --with-charset option:
shell> ./configure --with-charset=CHARSET
       CHARSET may be one of binary, armscii8, ascii, big5, cp1250,
       cp1251, cp1256, cp1257, cp850, cp852, cp866, cp932, dec8,
       eucjpms, euckr, gb2312, gbk, geostd8, greek, hebrew, hp8,
       keybcs2, koi8r, koi8u, latin1, latin2, latin5, latin7, macce,
       macroman, sjis, swe7, tis620, ucs2, ujis, utf8. See Section
       9.2, "The Character Set Used for Data and Sorting."
       (Additional character sets might be available. Check the
       output from ./configure --help for the current list.)
       The default collation may also be specified. MySQL uses the
       latin1_swedish_ci collation by default. To change this, use
       the --with-collation option:
shell> ./configure --with-collation=COLLATION
       To change both the character set and the collation, use both
       the --with-charset and --with-collation options. The collation
       must be a legal collation for the character set. (Use the SHOW
       COLLATION statement to determine which collations are
       available for each character set.)
       With the configure option --with-extra-charsets=LIST, you can
       define which additional character sets should be compiled into
       the server. LIST is one of the following:

          + A list of character set names separated by spaces

          + complex to include all character sets that can't be
            dynamically loaded

          + all to include all character sets into the binaries
       Clients that want to convert characters between the server and
       the client should use the SET NAMES statement. See Section
       5.1.5, "Session System Variables," and Section 9.1.4,
       "Connection Character Sets and Collations."

     * To configure MySQL with debugging code, use the --with-debug
       option:
shell> ./configure --with-debug
       This causes a safe memory allocator to be included that can
       find some errors and that provides output about what is
       happening. See MySQL Internals: Porting
       (http://forge.mysql.com/wiki/MySQL_Internals_Porting).
       As of MySQL 5.1.12, using --with-debug to configure MySQL with
       debugging support enables you to use the
       --debug="d,parser_debug" option when you start the server.
       This causes the Bison parser that is used to process SQL
       statements to dump a parser trace to the server's standard
       error output. Typically, this output is written to the error
       log.

     * If your client programs are using threads, you must compile a
       thread-safe version of the MySQL client library with the
       --enable-thread-safe-client configure option. This creates a
       libmysqlclient_r library with which you should link your
       threaded applications. See Section 21.10.17, "How to Make a
       Threaded Client."

     * Some features require that the server be built with
       compression library support, such as the COMPRESS() and
       UNCOMPRESS() functions, and compression of the client/server
       protocol. The --with-zlib-dir=no|bundled|DIR option provides
       control for compression library support. The value no
       explicitly disables compression support. bundled causes the
       zlib library bundled in the MySQL sources to be used. A DIR
       path name specifies where to find the compression library
       sources.

     * It is possible to build MySQL with large table support using
       the --with-big-tables option.
       This option causes the variables that store table row counts
       to be declared as unsigned long long rather than unsigned
       long. This enables tables to hold up to approximately
       1.844E+19 ((2^32)^2) rows rather than 2^32 (~4.295E+09) rows.
       Previously it was necessary to pass -DBIG_TABLES to the
       compiler manually in order to enable this feature.

     * Run configure with the --disable-grant-options option to cause
       the --bootstrap, --skip-grant-tables, and --init-file options
       for mysqld to be disabled. For Windows, the configure.js
       script recognizes the DISABLE_GRANT_OPTIONS flag, which has
       the same effect. The capability is available as of MySQL
       5.1.15.

     * This option allows MySQL Community Server features to be
       enabled. Additional options may be required for individual
       features, such as --enable-profiling to enable statement
       profiling. This option was added in MySQL 5.1.24. It is
       enabled by default as of MySQL 5.1.28; to disable it, use
       --disable-community-features.

     * When given with --enable-community-features, the
       --enable-profiling option enables the statement profiling
       capability exposed by the SHOW PROFILE and SHOW PROFILES
       statements. (See Section 12.5.5.33, "SHOW PROFILES Syntax.")
       This option was added in MySQL 5.1.24. It is enabled by
       default as of MySQL 5.1.28; to disable it, use
       --disable-profiling.

     * See Section 2.13, "Operating System-Specific Notes," for
       options that pertain to particular operating systems.

     * See Section 5.5.7.2, "Using SSL Connections," for options that
       pertain to configuring MySQL to support secure (encrypted)
       connections.

     * Several configure options apply to plugin selection and
       building:
--with-plugins=PLUGIN[,PLUGIN]...
--with-plugins=GROUP
--with-plugin-PLUGIN
--without-plugin-PLUGIN
       PLUGIN is an individual plugin name such as csv or archive.
       As shorthand, GROUP is a configuration group name such as none
       (select no plugins) or all (select all plugins).
       You can build a plugin as static (compiled into the server) or
       dynamic (built as a dynamic library that must be installed
       using the INSTALL PLUGIN statement before it can be used).
       Some plugins might not support static or dynamic build.
       configure --help shows the following information pertaining to
       plugins:

          + The plugin-related options

          + The names of all available plugins

          + For each plugin, a description of its purpose, which
            build types it supports (static or dynamic), and which
            plugin groups it is a part of.
       --with-plugins can take a list of one or more plugin names
       separated by commas, or a plugin group name. The named plugins
       are configured to be built as static plugins.
       --with-plugin-PLUGIN configures the given plugin to be built
       as a static plugin.
       --without-plugin-PLUGIN disables the given plugin from being
       built.
       If a plugin is named both with a --with and --without option,
       the result is undefined.
       For any plugin that is not explicitly selected or disabled, it
       is selected to be built dynamically if it supports dynamic
       build, and not built if it does not support dynamic build.
       (Thus, in the case that no plugin options are given, all
       plugins that support dynamic build are selected to be built as
       dynamic plugins. Plugins that do not support dynamic build are
       not built.)

2.10.3. Installing from the Development Source Tree

Caution

   You should read this section only if you are interested in helping
   us test our new code. If you just want to get MySQL up and running
   on your system, you should use a standard release distribution
   (either a binary or source distribution).

   To obtain the most recent development source tree, you first need
   to download and install Bazaar. You can obtain Bazaar from the
   Bazaar VCS Website (http://bazaar-vcs.org). Bazaar is supported by
   any platform that supports Python, and is therefore compatible
   with any Linux, Unix, Windows or Mac OS X host. Instructions for
   downloading and installing Bazaar on the different platforms are
   available on the Bazaar website.

   All MySQL projects are hosted on Launchpad
   (http://launchpad.net/). MySQL projects, including MySQL server,
   MySQL Workbench and others are available from the Sun/MySQL
   Engineering (http://launchpad.net/~mysql) page. For the
   repositories related only to MySQL server, see the MySQL Server
   (http://launchpad.net/mysql-server) page.

   To build under Unix/Linux, you must have the following tools
   installed:

     * GNU make, available from http://www.gnu.org/software/make/.
       Although some platforms come with their own make
       implementations, it is highly recommended that you use GNU
       make. It may already be available on your system as gmake.

     * autoconf 2.58 (or newer), available from
       http://www.gnu.org/software/autoconf/.

     * automake 1.8.1, available from
       http://www.gnu.org/software/automake/.

     * libtool 1.5, available from
       http://www.gnu.org/software/libtool/.

     * m4, available from http://www.gnu.org/software/m4/.

     * bison, available from http://www.gnu.org/software/bison/. You
       should use the latest version of bison where possible. Version
       1.75 and version 2.1 are known to work. There have been
       reported problems with bison 1.875. If you experience
       problems, upgrade to a later, rather than earlier, version.
       Versions of bison older than 1.75 may report this error:
sql_yacc.yy:#####: fatal error: maximum table size (32767) exceeded
       The maximum table size is not actually exceeded; the error is
       caused by bugs in older versions of bison.

   To build under Windows you will need a copy of Microsoft Visual
   C++ 2005 Express Edition, Visual Studio .Net 2003 (7.1), or Visual
   Studio 2005 (8.0) compiler system.

   Once you have the necessary tools installed, you first need to
   create a local branch of the MySQL source code on your machine:

    1. To obtain a copy of the MySQL source code, you must create a
       new Bazaar branch. If you do not already have a Bazaar
       repository directory set up, you need to initialize a new
       directory:
shell> mkdir mysql-server
shell> bzr init-repo --trees mysql-server

    2. Once you have an initialized directory, you can branch from
       the public MySQL server repositories. To create a branch of a
       specific version:
shell> cd mysql-server
shell> bzr branch lp:mysql-server/5.1 mysql-5.1

    3. The initial download will take some time to complete,
       depending on the speed of your connection. Please be patient.
       Once you have downloaded the first tree, additional trees
       should take significantly less time to download.

    4. When building from the Bazaar branch, you may want to create a
       copy of your active branch so that you can make configuration
       and other changes without affecting the original branch
       contents. You can achieve this by branching from the original
       branch:
shell> bzr branch mysql-5.1 mysql-5.1-build

   Once you have the local branch, you can start to build MySQL
   server from the source code. On Windows, the build process is
   different from Unix/Linux. To continue building MySQL on Windows,
   see Section 2.10.6, "Installing MySQL from Source on Windows."

   On Unix/Linux you need to use the autoconf system to create the
   configure script so that you can configure the build environment
   before building.

    1. The following example shows the typical commands required to
       configure a source tree. The first cd command changes location
       into the top-level directory of the tree; replace mysql-5.1
       with the appropriate directory name.

Note
       For MySQL 5.1.12 and earlier, you must separately configure
       the INNODB storage engine. You can do this by running the
       following command from the main source directory:
shell> (cd storage/innobase; autoreconf --force --install)
shell> cd mysql-5.1
shell> autoreconf --force --install
shell> ./configure  # Add your favorite options here
shell> make
       Or you can use BUILD/autorun.sh as a shortcut for the
       following sequence of commands:
shell> aclocal; autoheader
shell> libtoolize --automake --force
shell> automake --force --add-missing; autoconf
       The command line that changes directory into the
       storage/innobase directory is used to configure the InnoDB
       storage engine. You can omit this lines if you do not require
       InnoDB support.

Note
       Beginning with MySQL 5.1, code specific to storage engines has
       been moved under a storage directory. For example, InnoDB code
       is now found in storage/innobase and NDBCLUSTER code is in
       storage/ndb.
       If you get some strange errors during this stage, verify that
       you have the correct version of the libtool installed.
       A collection of our standard configuration scripts is located
       in the BUILD/ subdirectory. For example, you may find it more
       convenient to use the BUILD/compile-pentium-debug script than
       the preceding set of shell commands. To compile on a different
       architecture, modify the script by removing flags that are
       Pentium-specific, or use another script that may be more
       appropriate. These scripts are provided on an "as-is" basis.
       They are not officially maintained and their contents may
       change from release to release.

    2. When the build is done, run make install. Be careful with this
       on a production machine; the command may overwrite your live
       release installation. If you have another installation of
       MySQL, run ./configure with different values for the --prefix,
       --with-tcp-port, and --with-unix-socket-path options than
       those used for your production server.

    3. Play hard with your new installation and try to make the new
       features crash. Start by running make test. See Section
       22.1.2, "MySQL Test Suite."

    4. If you have gotten to the make stage, but the distribution
       does not compile, please enter the problem into our bugs
       database using the instructions given in Section 1.6, "How to
       Report Bugs or Problems." If you have installed the latest
       versions of the required GNU tools, and they crash trying to
       process our configuration files, please report that also.
       However, if you execute aclocal and get a command not found
       error or a similar problem, do not report it. Instead, make
       sure that all the necessary tools are installed and that your
       PATH variable is set correctly so that your shell can find
       them.

    5. After initially copying the repository with bzr to obtain the
       source tree, you should use pull option to periodically update
       your local copy. To do this any time after you have set up the
       repository, use this command:
shell> bzr pull

    6. You can examine the changeset comments for the tree by using
       the log option to bzr:
shell> bzr log
       You can also browse changesets, comments, and source code
       online. To browse this information for MySQL 5.1, go to
       http://launchpad.net/mysql-server/.
       If you see diffs or code that you have a question about, do
       not hesitate to send email to the MySQL internals mailing
       list. See Section 1.5.1, "MySQL Mailing Lists." Also, if you
       think you have a better idea on how to do something, send an
       email message to the list with a patch.

2.10.4. Dealing with Problems Compiling MySQL

   All MySQL programs compile cleanly for us with no warnings on
   Solaris or Linux using gcc. On other systems, warnings may occur
   due to differences in system include files. See Section 2.10.5,
   "MIT-pthreads Notes," for warnings that may occur when using
   MIT-pthreads. For other problems, check the following list.

   The solution to many problems involves reconfiguring. If you do
   need to reconfigure, take note of the following:

     * If configure is run after it has previously been run, it may
       use information that was gathered during its previous
       invocation. This information is stored in config.cache. When
       configure starts up, it looks for that file and reads its
       contents if it exists, on the assumption that the information
       is still correct. That assumption is invalid when you
       reconfigure.

     * Each time you run configure, you must run make again to
       recompile. However, you may want to remove old object files
       from previous builds first because they were compiled using
       different configuration options.

   To prevent old configuration information or object files from
   being used, run these commands before re-running configure:
shell> rm config.cache
shell> make clean

   Alternatively, you can run make distclean.

   The following list describes some of the problems when compiling
   MySQL that have been found to occur most often:

     * If you get errors such as the ones shown here when compiling
       sql_yacc.cc, you probably have run out of memory or swap
       space:
Internal compiler error: program cc1plus got fatal signal 11
Out of virtual memory
Virtual memory exhausted
       The problem is that gcc requires a huge amount of memory to
       compile sql_yacc.cc with inline functions. Try running
       configure with the --with-low-memory option:
shell> ./configure --with-low-memory
       This option causes -fno-inline to be added to the compile line
       if you are using gcc and -O0 if you are using something else.
       You should try the --with-low-memory option even if you have
       so much memory and swap space that you think you can't
       possibly have run out. This problem has been observed to occur
       even on systems with generous hardware configurations, and the
       --with-low-memory option usually fixes it.

     * By default, configure picks c++ as the compiler name and GNU
       c++ links with -lg++. If you are using gcc, that behavior can
       cause problems during configuration such as this:
configure: error: installation or configuration problem:
C++ compiler cannot create executables.
       You might also observe problems during compilation related to
       g++, libg++, or libstdc++.
       One cause of these problems is that you may not have g++, or
       you may have g++ but not libg++, or libstdc++. Take a look at
       the config.log file. It should contain the exact reason why
       your C++ compiler didn't work. To work around these problems,
       you can use gcc as your C++ compiler. Try setting the
       environment variable CXX to "gcc -O3". For example:
shell> CXX="gcc -O3" ./configure
       This works because gcc compiles C++ source files as well as
       g++ does, but does not link in libg++ or libstdc++ by default.
       Another way to fix these problems is to install g++, libg++,
       and libstdc++. However, do not use libg++ or libstdc++ with
       MySQL because this only increases the binary size of mysqld
       without providing any benefits. Some versions of these
       libraries have also caused strange problems for MySQL users in
       the past.

     * If your compile fails with errors such as any of the
       following, you must upgrade your version of make to GNU make:
making all in mit-pthreads
make: Fatal error in reader: Makefile, line 18:
Badly formed macro assignment
       Or:
make: file `Makefile' line 18: Must be a separator (:
       Or:
pthread.h: No such file or directory
       Solaris and FreeBSD are known to have troublesome make
       programs.
       GNU make 3.75 is known to work.

     * If you want to define flags to be used by your C or C++
       compilers, do so by adding the flags to the CFLAGS and
       CXXFLAGS environment variables. You can also specify the
       compiler names this way using CC and CXX. For example:
shell> CC=gcc
shell> CFLAGS=-O3
shell> CXX=gcc
shell> CXXFLAGS=-O3
shell> export CC CFLAGS CXX CXXFLAGS
       See Section 2.1.2.4, "MySQL Binaries Compiled by Sun
       Microsystems, Inc.," for a list of flag definitions that have
       been found to be useful on various systems.

     * If you get errors such as those shown here when compiling
       mysqld, configure did not correctly detect the type of the
       last argument to accept(), getsockname(), or getpeername():
cxx: Error: mysqld.cc, line 645: In this statement, the referenced
     type of the pointer value ''length'' is ''unsigned long'',
     which is not compatible with ''int''.
new_sock = accept(sock, (struct sockaddr *)&cAddr, &length);
       To fix this, edit the config.h file (which is generated by
       configure). Look for these lines:
/* Define as the base type of the last arg to accept */
#define SOCKET_SIZE_TYPE XXX
       Change XXX to size_t or int, depending on your operating
       system. (You must do this each time you run configure because
       configure regenerates config.h.)

     * The sql_yacc.cc file is generated from sql_yacc.yy. Normally,
       the build process does not need to create sql_yacc.cc because
       MySQL comes with a pre-generated copy. However, if you do need
       to re-create it, you might encounter this error:
"sql_yacc.yy", line xxx fatal: default action causes potential...
       This is a sign that your version of yacc is deficient. You
       probably need to install bison (the GNU version of yacc) and
       use that instead.

     * On Debian Linux 3.0, you need to install gawk instead of the
       default mawk.

     * If you need to debug mysqld or a MySQL client, run configure
       with the --with-debug option, and then recompile and link your
       clients with the new client library. See MySQL Internals:
       Porting (http://forge.mysql.com/wiki/MySQL_Internals_Porting).

     * If you get a compilation error on Linux (for example, SuSE
       Linux 8.1 or Red Hat Linux 7.3) similar to the following one,
       you probably do not have g++ installed:
libmysql.c:1329: warning: passing arg 5 of `gethostbyname_r' from
incompatible pointer type
libmysql.c:1329: too few arguments to function `gethostbyname_r'
libmysql.c:1329: warning: assignment makes pointer from integer
without a cast
make[2]: *** [libmysql.lo] Error 1
       By default, the configure script attempts to determine the
       correct number of arguments by using g++ (the GNU C++
       compiler). This test yields incorrect results if g++ is not
       installed. There are two ways to work around this problem:

          + Make sure that the GNU C++ g++ is installed. On some
            Linux distributions, the required package is called gpp;
            on others, it is named gcc-c++.

          + Use gcc as your C++ compiler by setting the CXX
            environment variable to gcc:
export CXX="gcc"
       You must run configure again after making either of those
       changes.

2.10.5. MIT-pthreads Notes

   This section describes some of the issues involved in using
   MIT-pthreads.

   On Linux, you should not use MIT-pthreads. Use the installed
   LinuxThreads implementation instead. See Section 2.13.1, "Linux
   Notes."

   If your system does not provide native thread support, you should
   build MySQL using the MIT-pthreads package. This includes older
   FreeBSD systems, SunOS 4.x, Solaris 2.4 and earlier, and some
   others. See Section 2.1.1, "Operating Systems Supported by MySQL
   Community Server."

   MIT-pthreads is not part of the MySQL 5.1 source distribution. If
   you require this package, you need to download it separately from
   http://dev.mysql.com/Downloads/Contrib/pthreads-1_60_beta6-mysql.t
   ar.gz

   After downloading, extract this source archive into the top level
   of the MySQL source directory. It creates a new subdirectory named
   mit-pthreads.

     * On most systems, you can force MIT-pthreads to be used by
       running configure with the --with-mit-threads option:
shell> ./configure --with-mit-threads
       Building in a nonsource directory is not supported when using
       MIT-pthreads because we want to minimize our changes to this
       code.

     * The checks that determine whether to use MIT-pthreads occur
       only during the part of the configuration process that deals
       with the server code. If you have configured the distribution
       using --without-server to build only the client code, clients
       do not know whether MIT-pthreads is being used and use Unix
       socket file connections by default. Because Unix socket files
       do not work under MIT-pthreads on some platforms, this means
       you need to use -h or --host with a value other than localhost
       when you run client programs.

     * When MySQL is compiled using MIT-pthreads, system locking is
       disabled by default for performance reasons. You can tell the
       server to use system locking with the --external-locking
       option. This is needed only if you want to be able to run two
       MySQL servers against the same data files, but that is not
       recommended, anyway.

     * Sometimes the pthread bind() command fails to bind to a socket
       without any error message (at least on Solaris). The result is
       that all connections to the server fail. For example:
shell> mysqladmin version
mysqladmin: connect to server at '' failed;
error: 'Can't connect to mysql server on localhost (146)'
       The solution to this problem is to kill the mysqld server and
       restart it. This has happened to us only when we have forcibly
       stopped the server and restarted it immediately.

     * With MIT-pthreads, the sleep() system call isn't interruptible
       with SIGINT (break). This is noticeable only when you run
       mysqladmin --sleep. You must wait for the sleep() call to
       terminate before the interrupt is served and the process
       stops.

     * When linking, you might receive warning messages like these
       (at least on Solaris); they can be ignored:
ld: warning: symbol `_iob' has differing sizes:
    (file /my/local/pthreads/lib/libpthread.a(findfp.o) value=0x4;
file /usr/lib/libc.so value=0x140);
    /my/local/pthreads/lib/libpthread.a(findfp.o) definition taken
ld: warning: symbol `__iob' has differing sizes:
    (file /my/local/pthreads/lib/libpthread.a(findfp.o) value=0x4;
file /usr/lib/libc.so value=0x140);
    /my/local/pthreads/lib/libpthread.a(findfp.o) definition taken

     * Some other warnings also can be ignored:
implicit declaration of function `int strtoll(...)'
implicit declaration of function `int strtoul(...)'

     * We have not been able to make readline work with MIT-pthreads.
       (This is not necessary, but may be of interest to some.)

2.10.6. Installing MySQL from Source on Windows

   These instructions describe how to build binaries from source for
   MySQL 5.1 on Windows. Instructions are provided for building
   binaries from a standard source distribution or from the Bazaar
   tree that contains the latest development source.

Note

   The instructions here are strictly for users who want to test
   MySQL on Microsoft Windows from the latest source distribution or
   from the Bazaar tree. For production use, we do not advise using a
   MySQL server built by yourself from source. Normally, it is best
   to use precompiled binary distributions of MySQL that are built
   specifically for optimal performance on Windows by Sun
   Microsystems, Inc. Instructions for installing binary
   distributions are available in Section 2.3, "Installing MySQL on
   Windows."

   To build MySQL on Windows from source, you must satisfy the
   following system, compiler, and resource requirements:

     * Windows 2000, Windows XP, or newer version.
       Windows Vista is supported when using Visual Studio 2005
       provided you have installed the following updates:

          + Microsoft Visual Studio 2005 Professional Edition - ENU
            Service Pack 1 (KB926601)
            (http://support.microsoft.com/?kbid=926601)

          + Security Update for Microsoft Visual Studio 2005
            Professional Edition - ENU (KB937061)
            (http://support.microsoft.com/?kbid=937061)

          + Update for Microsoft Visual Studio 2005 Professional
            Edition - ENU (KB932232)
            (http://support.microsoft.com/?kbid=932232)

     * CMake, which can be downloaded from http://www.cmake.org.
       After installing, modify your path to include the cmake
       binary.

     * Microsoft Visual C++ 2005 Express Edition, Visual Studio .Net
       2003 (7.1), or Visual Studio 2005 (8.0) compiler system.

     * If you are using Visual C++ 2005 Express Edition, you must
       also install an appropriate Platform SDK. More information and
       links to downloads for various Windows platforms is available
       from
       http://www.microsoft.com/downloads/details.aspx?familyid=0baf2
       b35-c656-4969-ace8-e4c0c0716adb.

     * If you are compiling from a Bazaar tree or making changes to
       the parser, you need bison for Windows, which can be
       downloaded from
       http://gnuwin32.sourceforge.net/packages/bison.htm. Download
       the package labeled "Complete package, excluding sources".
       After installing the package, modify your path to include the
       bison binary and ensure that this binary is accessible from
       Visual Studio.

     * Cygwin might be necessary if you want to run the test script
       or package the compiled binaries and support files into a Zip
       archive. (Cygwin is needed only to test or package the
       distribution, not to build it.) Cygwin is available from
       http://cygwin.com.

     * 3GB to 5GB of disk space.

   The exact system requirements can be found here:
   http://msdn.microsoft.com/vstudio/Previous/2003/sysreqs/default.as
   px and
   http://msdn.microsoft.com/vstudio/products/sysreqs/default.aspx

   You also need a MySQL source distribution for Windows, which can
   be obtained two ways:

     * Obtain a source distribution packaged by Sun Microsystems,
       Inc. These are available from http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/.

     * Package a source distribution yourself from the latest Bazaar
       developer source tree. For instructions on pulling the latest
       source files, see Section 2.10.3, "Installing from the
       Development Source Tree."

   If you find something not working as expected, or you have
   suggestions about ways to improve the current build process on
   Windows, please send a message to the win32 mailing list. See
   Section 1.5.1, "MySQL Mailing Lists."

2.10.6.1. Building MySQL from Source Using CMake and Visual Studio

   You can build MySQL on Windows by using a combination of cmake and
   Microsoft Visual Studio .NET 2003 (7.1), Microsoft Visual Studio
   2005 (8.0) or Microsoft Visual C++ 2005 Express Edition. You must
   have the appropriate Microsoft Platform SDK installed.

Note

   To compile from the source code on Windows you must use the
   standard source distribution (for example, mysql-5.0.45.tar.gz).
   You build from the same distribution as used to build MySQL on
   Unix, Linux and other platforms. Do not use the Windows Source
   distributions as they do not contain the necessary configuration
   script and other files.

   Follow this procedure to build MySQL:

    1. If you are installing from a packaged source distribution,
       create a work directory (for example, C:\workdir), and unpack
       the source distribution there using WinZip or another Windows
       tool that can read .zip files. This directory is the work
       directory in the following instructions.

    2. Using a command shell, navigate to the work directory and run
       the following command:
C:\workdir>win\configure.js options
       If you have associated the .js file extension with an
       application such as a text editor, then you may need to use
       the following command to force configure.js to be executed as
       a script:
C:\workdir>cscript win\configure.js options
       These options are available for configure.js:

          + WITH_INNOBASE_STORAGE_ENGINE: Enable the InnoDB storage
            engine.

          + WITH_PARTITION_STORAGE_ENGINE: Enable user-defined
            partitioning.

          + WITH_ARCHIVE_STORAGE_ENGINE: Enable the ARCHIVE storage
            engine.

          + WITH_BLACKHOLE_STORAGE_ENGINE: Enable the BLACKHOLE
            storage engine.

          + WITH_EXAMPLE_STORAGE_ENGINE: Enable the EXAMPLE storage
            engine.

          + WITH_FEDERATED_STORAGE_ENGINE: Enable the FEDERATED
            storage engine.

          + WITH_NDBCLUSTER_STORAGE_ENGINE (experimental): Enable the
            NDBCLUSTER storage engine in the MySQL server; cause
            binaries for the MySQL Cluster management and data node,
            management client, and other programs to be built.
            This option is supported only in MySQL Cluster NDB 7.0
            (NDBCLUSTER storage engine versions 6.4.0 and later)
            using the MySQL Cluster sources. It cannot be used to
            enable clustering support in other MySQL source trees or
            distributions.

          + MYSQL_SERVER_SUFFIX=suffix: Server suffix, default none.

          + COMPILATION_COMMENT=comment: Server comment, default
            "Source distribution".

          + MYSQL_TCP_PORT=port: Server port, default 3306.

          + DISABLE_GRANT_OPTIONS: Disables the --bootstrap,
            --skip-grant-tables, and --init-file options for mysqld.
            This option is available as of MySQL 5.1.15.
       For example (type the command on one line):
C:\workdir>win\configure.js WITH_INNOBASE_STORAGE_ENGINE
             WITH_PARTITION_STORAGE_ENGINE MYSQL_SERVER_SUFFIX=-pro

    3. From the work directory, execute the win\build-vs8.bat or
       win\build-vs71.bat file, depending on the version of Visual
       Studio you have installed. The script invokes CMake, which
       generates the mysql.sln solution file.
       You can also use win\build-vs8_x64.bat to build the 64-bit
       version of MySQL. However, you cannot build the 64-bit version
       with Visual Studio Express Edition. You must use Visual Studio
       2005 (8.0) or higher.

    4. From the work directory, open the generated mysql.sln file
       with Visual Studio and select the proper configuration using
       the Configuration menu. The menu provides Debug, Release,
       RelwithDebInfo, MinRelInfo options. Then select Solution >
       Build to build the solution.
       Remember the configuration that you use in this step. It is
       important later when you run the test script because that
       script needs to know which configuration you used.

    5. Test the server. The server built using the preceding
       instructions expects that the MySQL base directory and data
       directory are C:\mysql and C:\mysql\data by default. If you
       want to test your server using the source tree root directory
       and its data directory as the base directory and data
       directory, you need to tell the server their path names. You
       can either do this on the command line with the --basedir and
       --datadir options, or by placing appropriate options in an
       option file. (See Section 4.2.3.3, "Using Option Files.") If
       you have an existing data directory elsewhere that you want to
       use, you can specify its path name instead.
       When the server is running in standalone fashion or as a
       service based on your configuration, try to connect to it from
       the mysql interactive command-line utility.
       You can also run the standard test script, mysql-test-run.pl.
       This script is written in Perl, so you'll need either Cygwin
       or ActiveState Perl to run it. You may also need to install
       the modules required by the script. To run the test script,
       change location into the mysql-test directory under the work
       directory, set the MTR_VS_CONFIG environment variable to the
       configuration you selected earlier (or use the --vs-config
       option), and invoke mysql-test-run.pl. For example (using
       Cygwin and the bash shell):
shell> cd mysql-test
shell> export MTR_VS_CONFIG=debug
shell> ./mysql-test-run.pl --force --timer
shell> ./mysql-test-run.pl --force --timer --ps-protocol

   When you are satisfied that the programs you have built are
   working correctly, stop the server. Now you can install the
   distribution. One way to do this is to use the make_win_bin_dist
   script in the scripts directory of the MySQL source distribution
   (see Section 4.4.2, "make_win_bin_dist --- Package MySQL
   Distribution as ZIP Archive"). This is a shell script, so you must
   have Cygwin installed if you want to use it. It creates a Zip
   archive of the built executables and support files that you can
   unpack in the location at which you want to install MySQL.

   It is also possible to install MySQL by copying directories and
   files directly:

    1. Create the directories where you want to install MySQL. For
       example, to install into C:\mysql, use these commands:
C:\> mkdir C:\mysql
C:\> mkdir C:\mysql\bin
C:\> mkdir C:\mysql\data
C:\> mkdir C:\mysql\share
C:\> mkdir C:\mysql\scripts
       If you want to compile other clients and link them to MySQL,
       you should also create several additional directories:
C:\> mkdir C:\mysql\include
C:\> mkdir C:\mysql\lib
C:\> mkdir C:\mysql\lib\debug
C:\> mkdir C:\mysql\lib\opt
       If you want to benchmark MySQL, create this directory:
C:\> mkdir C:\mysql\sql-bench
       Benchmarking requires Perl support. See Section 2.15, "Perl
       Installation Notes."

    2. From the work directory, copy into the C:\mysql directory the
       following directories:
C:\> cd \workdir
C:\workdir> copy client_release\*.exe C:\mysql\bin
C:\workdir> copy client_debug\mysqld.exe C:\mysql\bin\mysqld-debug.ex
e
C:\workdir> xcopy scripts\*.* C:\mysql\scripts /E
C:\workdir> xcopy share\*.* C:\mysql\share /E
       If you want to compile other clients and link them to MySQL,
       you should also copy several libraries and header files:
C:\workdir> copy lib_debug\mysqlclient.lib C:\mysql\lib\debug
C:\workdir> copy lib_debug\libmysql.* C:\mysql\lib\debug
C:\workdir> copy lib_debug\zlib.* C:\mysql\lib\debug
C:\workdir> copy lib_release\mysqlclient.lib C:\mysql\lib\opt
C:\workdir> copy lib_release\libmysql.* C:\mysql\lib\opt
C:\workdir> copy lib_release\zlib.* C:\mysql\lib\opt
C:\workdir> copy include\*.h C:\mysql\include
C:\workdir> copy libmysql\libmysql.def C:\mysql\include
       If you want to benchmark MySQL, you should also do this:
C:\workdir> xcopy sql-bench\*.* C:\mysql\bench /E

   After installation, set up and start the server in the same way as
   for binary Windows distributions. See Section 2.3, "Installing
   MySQL on Windows."

2.10.7. Compiling MySQL Clients on Windows

   In your source files, you should include my_global.h before
   mysql.h:
#include <my_global.h>
#include <mysql.h>

   my_global.h includes any other files needed for Windows
   compatibility (such as windows.h) if you compile your program on
   Windows.

   You can either link your code with the dynamic libmysql.lib
   library, which is just a wrapper to load in libmysql.dll on
   demand, or link with the static mysqlclient.lib library.

   The MySQL client libraries are compiled as threaded libraries, so
   you should also compile your code to be multi-threaded.

2.11. Post-Installation Setup and Testing

   After installing MySQL, there are some issues that you should
   address. For example, on Unix, you should initialize the data
   directory and create the MySQL grant tables. On all platforms, an
   important security concern is that the initial accounts in the
   grant tables have no passwords. You should assign passwords to
   prevent unauthorized access to the MySQL server. Optionally, you
   can create time zone tables to enable recognition of named time
   zones.

   The following sections include post-installation procedures that
   are specific to Windows systems and to Unix systems. Another
   section, Section 2.11.2.3, "Starting and Troubleshooting the MySQL
   Server," applies to all platforms; it describes what to do if you
   have trouble getting the server to start. Section 2.11.3,
   "Securing the Initial MySQL Accounts," also applies to all
   platforms. You should follow its instructions to make sure that
   you have properly protected your MySQL accounts by assigning
   passwords to them.

   When you are ready to create additional user accounts, you can
   find information on the MySQL access control system and account
   management in Section 5.4, "The MySQL Access Privilege System,"
   and Section 5.5, "MySQL User Account Management."

2.11.1. Windows Post-Installation Procedures

   On Windows, the data directory and the grant tables do not have to
   be created. MySQL Windows distributions include the grant tables
   with a set of preinitialized accounts in the mysql database under
   the data directory. It is unnecessary to run the mysql_install_db
   script that is used on Unix. Regarding passwords, if you installed
   MySQL using the Windows Installation Wizard, you may have already
   assigned passwords to the accounts. (See Section 2.3.3, "Using the
   MySQL Installation Wizard.") Otherwise, use the
   password-assignment procedure given in Section 2.11.3, "Securing
   the Initial MySQL Accounts."

   Before setting up passwords, you might want to try running some
   client programs to make sure that you can connect to the server
   and that it is operating properly. Make sure that the server is
   running (see Section 2.3.9, "Starting the Server for the First
   Time"), and then issue the following commands to verify that you
   can retrieve information from the server. The output should be
   similar to what is shown here:
C:\> C:\mysql\bin\mysqlshow
+--------------------+
|     Databases      |
+--------------------+
| information_schema |
| mysql              |
| test               |
+--------------------+

C:\> C:\mysql\bin\mysqlshow mysql
Database: mysql
+---------------------------+
|          Tables           |
+---------------------------+
| columns_priv              |
| db                        |
| event                     |
| func                      |
| general_log               |
| help_category             |
| help_keyword              |
| help_relation             |
| help_topic                |
| host                      |
| plugin                    |
| proc                      |
| procs_priv                |
| servers                   |
| slow_log                  |
| tables_priv               |
| time_zone                 |
| time_zone_leap_second     |
| time_zone_name            |
| time_zone_transition      |
| time_zone_transition_type |
| user                      |
+---------------------------+


C:\> C:\mysql\bin\mysql -e "SELECT Host,Db,User FROM db" mysql
+------+-------+------+
| host | db    | user |
+------+-------+------+
| %    | test% |      |
+------+-------+------+

   You may need to specify a different directory from the one shown;
   if you used the Windows Installation Wizard, then the default
   directory is C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1, and the
   mysql and mysqlshow client programs are in C:\Program
   Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\bin. See Section 2.3.3, "Using the
   MySQL Installation Wizard," for more information.

   If you have already secured the initial MySQL accounts, you may
   need to use the -u and -p options to supply a user name and
   password to the mysqlshow and mysql client programs; otherwise the
   programs may fail with an error, or you may not be able to view
   all databases. For example, if you have assigned the password
   "secretpass" to the MySQL root account, then you can invoke
   mysqlshow and mysql as shown here:
C:\> C:\mysql\bin\mysqlshow -uroot -psecretpass
+--------------------+
|     Databases      |
+--------------------+
| information_schema |
| mysql              |
| test               |
+--------------------+

C:\> C:\mysql\bin\mysqlshow -uroot -psecretpass mysql
Database: mysql
+---------------------------+
|          Tables           |
+---------------------------+
| columns_priv              |
| db                        |
| event                     |
| func                      |
| general_log               |
| help_category             |
| help_keyword              |
| help_relation             |
| help_topic                |
| host                      |
| plugin                    |
| proc                      |
| procs_priv                |
| servers                   |
| slow_log                  |
| tables_priv               |
| time_zone                 |
| time_zone_leap_second     |
| time_zone_name            |
| time_zone_transition      |
| time_zone_transition_type |
| user                      |
+---------------------------+


C:\> C:\mysql\bin\mysql -uroot -psecretpass -e "SELECT Host,Db,User F
ROM db" mysql
+------+-------+------+
| host | db    | user |
+------+-------+------+
| %    | test% |      |
+------+-------+------+

   For more information about these programs, see Section 4.5.6,
   "mysqlshow --- Display Database, Table, and Column Information,"
   and Section 4.5.1, "mysql --- The MySQL Command-Line Tool."

   If you are running a version of Windows that supports services and
   you want the MySQL server to run automatically when Windows
   starts, see Section 2.3.11, "Starting MySQL as a Windows Service."

2.11.2. Unix Post-Installation Procedures

   After installing MySQL on Unix, you need to initialize the grant
   tables, start the server, and make sure that the server works
   satisfactorily. You may also wish to arrange for the server to be
   started and stopped automatically when your system starts and
   stops. You should also assign passwords to the accounts in the
   grant tables.

   On Unix, the grant tables are set up by the mysql_install_db
   program. For some installation methods, this program is run for
   you automatically:

     * If you install MySQL on Linux using RPM distributions, the
       server RPM runs mysql_install_db.

     * If you install MySQL on Mac OS X using a PKG distribution, the
       installer runs mysql_install_db.

   Otherwise, you'll need to run mysql_install_db yourself.

   The following procedure describes how to initialize the grant
   tables (if that has not previously been done) and then start the
   server. It also suggests some commands that you can use to test
   whether the server is accessible and working properly. For
   information about starting and stopping the server automatically,
   see Section 2.11.2.2, "Starting and Stopping MySQL Automatically."

   After you complete the procedure and have the server running, you
   should assign passwords to the accounts created by
   mysql_install_db. Instructions for doing so are given in Section
   2.11.3, "Securing the Initial MySQL Accounts."

   In the examples shown here, the server runs under the user ID of
   the mysql login account. This assumes that such an account exists.
   Either create the account if it does not exist, or substitute the
   name of a different existing login account that you plan to use
   for running the server.

    1. Change location into the top-level directory of your MySQL
       installation, represented here by BASEDIR:
shell> cd BASEDIR
       BASEDIR is likely to be something like /usr/local/mysql or
       /usr/local. The following steps assume that you are located in
       this directory.

    2. If necessary, run the mysql_install_db program to set up the
       initial MySQL grant tables containing the privileges that
       determine how users are allowed to connect to the server.
       You'll need to do this if you used a distribution type for
       which the installation procedure doesn't run the program for
       you.
       Typically, mysql_install_db needs to be run only the first
       time you install MySQL, so you can skip this step if you are
       upgrading an existing installation, However, mysql_install_db
       does not overwrite any existing privilege tables, so it should
       be safe to run in any circumstances.
       To initialize the grant tables, use one of the following
       commands, depending on whether mysql_install_db is located in
       the bin or scripts directory:
shell> bin/mysql_install_db --user=mysql
shell> scripts/mysql_install_db --user=mysql
       It might be necessary to specify other options such as
       --basedir or --datadir if mysql_install_db does not use the
       correct locations for the installation directory or data
       directory. For example:
shell> bin/mysql_install_db --user=mysql \
         --basedir=/opt/mysql/mysql \
         --datadir=/opt/mysql/mysql/data
       The mysql_install_db script creates the server's data
       directory. Under the data directory, it creates directories
       for the mysql database that holds all database privileges and
       the test database that you can use to test MySQL. The script
       also creates privilege table entries for root and
       anonymous-user accounts. The accounts have no passwords
       initially. A description of their initial privileges is given
       in Section 2.11.3, "Securing the Initial MySQL Accounts."
       Briefly, these privileges allow the MySQL root user to do
       anything, and allow anybody to create or use databases with a
       name of test or starting with test_.
       It is important to make sure that the database directories and
       files are owned by the mysql login account so that the server
       has read and write access to them when you run it later. To
       ensure this, the --user option should be used as shown if you
       run mysql_install_db as root. Otherwise, you should execute
       the script while logged in as mysql, in which case you can
       omit the --user option from the command.
       mysql_install_db creates several tables in the mysql database,
       including user, db, host, tables_priv, columns_priv, func, and
       others. See Section 5.4, "The MySQL Access Privilege System,"
       for a complete listing and description of these tables.
       If you don't want to have the test database, you can remove it
       with mysqladmin -u root drop test after starting the server.
       If you have trouble with mysql_install_db at this point, see
       Section 2.11.2.1, "Problems Running mysql_install_db."

    3. Start the MySQL server:
shell> bin/mysqld_safe --user=mysql &
       It is important that the MySQL server be run using an
       unprivileged (non-root) login account. To ensure this, the
       --user option should be used as shown if you run mysqld_safe
       as system root. Otherwise, you should execute the script while
       logged in to the system as mysql, in which case you can omit
       the --user option from the command.
       Further instructions for running MySQL as an unprivileged user
       are given in Section 5.3.5, "How to Run MySQL as a Normal
       User."
       If you neglected to create the grant tables before proceeding
       to this step, the following message appears in the error log
       file when you start the server:
mysqld: Can't find file: 'host.frm'
       If you have other problems starting the server, see Section
       2.11.2.3, "Starting and Troubleshooting the MySQL Server."

    4. Use mysqladmin to verify that the server is running. The
       following commands provide simple tests to check whether the
       server is up and responding to connections:
shell> bin/mysqladmin version
shell> bin/mysqladmin variables
       The output from mysqladmin version varies slightly depending
       on your platform and version of MySQL, but should be similar
       to that shown here:
shell> bin/mysqladmin version
mysqladmin  Ver 14.12 Distrib 5.1.39, for pc-linux-gnu on i686
...

Server version          5.1.39
Protocol version        10
Connection              Localhost via UNIX socket
UNIX socket             /var/lib/mysql/mysql.sock
Uptime:                 14 days 5 hours 5 min 21 sec

Threads: 1  Questions: 366  Slow queries: 0
Opens: 0  Flush tables: 1  Open tables: 19
Queries per second avg: 0.000
       To see what else you can do with mysqladmin, invoke it with
       the --help option.

    5. Verify that you can shut down the server:
shell> bin/mysqladmin -u root shutdown

    6. Verify that you can start the server again. Do this by using
       mysqld_safe or by invoking mysqld directly. For example:
shell> bin/mysqld_safe --user=mysql --log &
       If mysqld_safe fails, see Section 2.11.2.3, "Starting and
       Troubleshooting the MySQL Server."

    7. Run some simple tests to verify that you can retrieve
       information from the server. The output should be similar to
       what is shown here:
shell> bin/mysqlshow
+-----------+
| Databases |
+-----------+
| mysql     |
| test      |
+-----------+

shell> bin/mysqlshow mysql
Database: mysql
+---------------------------+
|          Tables           |
+---------------------------+
| columns_priv              |
| db                        |
| func                      |
| help_category             |
| help_keyword              |
| help_relation             |
| help_topic                |
| host                      |
| proc                      |
| procs_priv                |
| tables_priv               |
| time_zone                 |
| time_zone_leap_second     |
| time_zone_name            |
| time_zone_transition      |
| time_zone_transition_type |
| user                      |
+---------------------------+

shell> bin/mysql -e "SELECT Host,Db,User FROM db" mysql
+------+--------+------+
| host | db     | user |
+------+--------+------+
| %    | test   |      |
| %    | test_% |      |
+------+--------+------+

    8. There is a benchmark suite in the sql-bench directory (under
       the MySQL installation directory) that you can use to compare
       how MySQL performs on different platforms. The benchmark suite
       is written in Perl. It requires the Perl DBI module that
       provides a database-independent interface to the various
       databases, and some other additional Perl modules:
DBI
DBD::mysql
Data::Dumper
Data::ShowTable
       These modules can be obtained from CPAN
       (http://www.cpan.org/). See also Section 2.15.1, "Installing
       Perl on Unix."
       The sql-bench/Results directory contains the results from many
       runs against different databases and platforms. To run all
       tests, execute these commands:
shell> cd sql-bench
shell> perl run-all-tests
       If you don't have the sql-bench directory, you probably
       installed MySQL using RPM files other than the source RPM.
       (The source RPM includes the sql-bench benchmark directory.)
       In this case, you must first install the benchmark suite
       before you can use it. There are separate benchmark RPM files
       named mysql-bench-VERSION.i386.rpm that contain benchmark code
       and data.
       If you have a source distribution, there are also tests in its
       tests subdirectory that you can run. For example, to run
       auto_increment.tst, execute this command from the top-level
       directory of your source distribution:
shell> mysql -vvf test < ./tests/auto_increment.tst
       The expected result of the test can be found in the
       ./tests/auto_increment.res file.

    9. At this point, you should have the server running. However,
       none of the initial MySQL accounts have a password, so you
       should assign passwords using the instructions found in
       Section 2.11.3, "Securing the Initial MySQL Accounts."

   The MySQL 5.1 installation procedure creates time zone tables in
   the mysql database. However, you must populate the tables manually
   using the instructions in Section 9.7, "MySQL Server Time Zone
   Support."

2.11.2.1. Problems Running mysql_install_db

   The purpose of the mysql_install_db script is to generate new
   MySQL privilege tables. It does not overwrite existing MySQL
   privilege tables, and it does not affect any other data.

   If you want to re-create your privilege tables, first stop the
   mysqld server if it is running. Then rename the mysql directory
   under the data directory to save it, and then run
   mysql_install_db. Suppose that your current directory is the MySQL
   installation directory and that mysql_install_db is located in the
   bin directory and the data directory is named data. To rename the
   mysql database and re-run mysql_install_db, use these commands.
shell> mv data/mysql data/mysql.old
shell> bin/mysql_install_db --user=mysql

   When you run mysql_install_db, you might encounter the following
   problems:

     * mysql_install_db fails to install the grant tables
       You may find that mysql_install_db fails to install the grant
       tables and terminates after displaying the following messages:
Starting mysqld daemon with databases from XXXXXX
mysqld ended
       In this case, you should examine the error log file very
       carefully. The log should be located in the directory XXXXXX
       named by the error message and should indicate why mysqld
       didn't start. If you do not understand what happened, include
       the log when you post a bug report. See Section 1.6, "How to
       Report Bugs or Problems."

     * There is a mysqld process running
       This indicates that the server is running, in which case the
       grant tables have probably been created already. If so, there
       is no need to run mysql_install_db at all because it needs to
       be run only once (when you install MySQL the first time).

     * Installing a second mysqld server does not work when one
       server is running
       This can happen when you have an existing MySQL installation,
       but want to put a new installation in a different location.
       For example, you might have a production installation, but you
       want to create a second installation for testing purposes.
       Generally the problem that occurs when you try to run a second
       server is that it tries to use a network interface that is in
       use by the first server. In this case, you should see one of
       the following error messages:
Can't start server: Bind on TCP/IP port:
Address already in use
Can't start server: Bind on unix socket...
       For instructions on setting up multiple servers, see Section
       5.6, "Running Multiple MySQL Servers on the Same Machine."

     * You do not have write access to the /tmp directory
       If you do not have write access to create temporary files or a
       Unix socket file in the default location (the /tmp directory),
       an error occurs when you run mysql_install_db or the mysqld
       server.
       You can specify different locations for the temporary
       directory and Unix socket file by executing these commands
       prior to starting mysql_install_db or mysqld, where
       some_tmp_dir is the full path name to some directory for which
       you have write permission:
shell> TMPDIR=/some_tmp_dir/
shell> MYSQL_UNIX_PORT=/some_tmp_dir/mysql.sock
shell> export TMPDIR MYSQL_UNIX_PORT
       Then you should be able to run mysql_install_db and start the
       server with these commands:
shell> bin/mysql_install_db --user=mysql
shell> bin/mysqld_safe --user=mysql &
       If mysql_install_db is located in the scripts directory,
       modify the first command to scripts/mysql_install_db.
       See Section B.1.4.5, "How to Protect or Change the MySQL Unix
       Socket File," and Section 2.14, "Environment Variables."

   There are some alternatives to running the mysql_install_db script
   provided in the MySQL distribution:

     * If you want the initial privileges to be different from the
       standard defaults, you can modify mysql_install_db before you
       run it. However, it is preferable to use GRANT and REVOKE to
       change the privileges after the grant tables have been set up.
       In other words, you can run mysql_install_db, and then use
       mysql -u root mysql to connect to the server as the MySQL root
       user so that you can issue the necessary GRANT and REVOKE
       statements.
       If you want to install MySQL on several machines with the same
       privileges, you can put the GRANT and REVOKE statements in a
       file and execute the file as a script using mysql after
       running mysql_install_db. For example:
shell> bin/mysql_install_db --user=mysql
shell> bin/mysql -u root < your_script_file
       By doing this, you can avoid having to issue the statements
       manually on each machine.

     * It is possible to re-create the grant tables completely after
       they have previously been created. You might want to do this
       if you're just learning how to use GRANT and REVOKE and have
       made so many modifications after running mysql_install_db that
       you want to wipe out the tables and start over.
       To re-create the grant tables, remove all the .frm, .MYI, and
       .MYD files in the mysql database directory. Then run the
       mysql_install_db script again.

     * You can start mysqld manually using the --skip-grant-tables
       option and add the privilege information yourself using mysql:
shell> bin/mysqld_safe --user=mysql --skip-grant-tables &
shell> bin/mysql mysql
       From mysql, manually execute the SQL commands contained in
       mysql_install_db. Make sure that you run mysqladmin
       flush-privileges or mysqladmin reload afterward to tell the
       server to reload the grant tables.
       Note that by not using mysql_install_db, you not only have to
       populate the grant tables manually, you also have to create
       them first.

2.11.2.2. Starting and Stopping MySQL Automatically

   Generally, you start the mysqld server in one of these ways:

     * Invoke mysqld directly. This works on any platform.

     * Run the MySQL server as a Windows service. The service can be
       set to start the server automatically when Windows starts, or
       as a manual service that you start on request. For
       instructions, see Section 2.3.11, "Starting MySQL as a Windows
       Service."

     * Invoke mysqld_safe, which tries to determine the proper
       options for mysqld and then runs it with those options. This
       script is used on Unix and Unix-like systems. See Section
       4.3.2, "mysqld_safe --- MySQL Server Startup Script."

     * Invoke mysql.server. This script is used primarily at system
       startup and shutdown on systems that use System V-style run
       directories, where it usually is installed under the name
       mysql. The mysql.server script starts the server by invoking
       mysqld_safe. See Section 4.3.3, "mysql.server --- MySQL Server
       Startup Script."

     * On Mac OS X, install a separate MySQL Startup Item package to
       enable the automatic startup of MySQL on system startup. The
       Startup Item starts the server by invoking mysql.server. See
       Section 2.5, "Installing MySQL on Mac OS X," for details.

   The mysqld_safe and mysql.server scripts and the Mac OS X Startup
   Item can be used to start the server manually, or automatically at
   system startup time. mysql.server and the Startup Item also can be
   used to stop the server.

   To start or stop the server manually using the mysql.server
   script, invoke it with start or stop arguments:
shell> mysql.server start
shell> mysql.server stop

   Before mysql.server starts the server, it changes location to the
   MySQL installation directory, and then invokes mysqld_safe. If you
   want the server to run as some specific user, add an appropriate
   user option to the [mysqld] group of the /etc/my.cnf option file,
   as shown later in this section. (It is possible that you will need
   to edit mysql.server if you've installed a binary distribution of
   MySQL in a nonstandard location. Modify it to change location into
   the proper directory before it runs mysqld_safe. If you do this,
   your modified version of mysql.server may be overwritten if you
   upgrade MySQL in the future, so you should make a copy of your
   edited version that you can reinstall.)

   mysql.server stop stops the server by sending a signal to it. You
   can also stop the server manually by executing mysqladmin
   shutdown.

   To start and stop MySQL automatically on your server, you need to
   add start and stop commands to the appropriate places in your
   /etc/rc* files.

   If you use the Linux server RPM package
   (MySQL-server-VERSION.rpm), the mysql.server script is installed
   in the /etc/init.d directory with the name mysql. You need not
   install it manually. See Section 2.4, "Installing MySQL from RPM
   Packages on Linux," for more information on the Linux RPM
   packages.

   Some vendors provide RPM packages that install a startup script
   under a different name such as mysqld.

   If you install MySQL from a source distribution or using a binary
   distribution format that does not install mysql.server
   automatically, you can install it manually. The script can be
   found in the support-files directory under the MySQL installation
   directory or in a MySQL source tree.

   To install mysql.server manually, copy it to the /etc/init.d
   directory with the name mysql, and then make it executable. Do
   this by changing location into the appropriate directory where
   mysql.server is located and executing these commands:
shell> cp mysql.server /etc/init.d/mysql
shell> chmod +x /etc/init.d/mysql

   Older Red Hat systems use the /etc/rc.d/init.d directory rather
   than /etc/init.d. Adjust the preceding commands accordingly.
   Alternatively, first create /etc/init.d as a symbolic link that
   points to /etc/rc.d/init.d:
shell> cd /etc
shell> ln -s rc.d/init.d .

   After installing the script, the commands needed to activate it to
   run at system startup depend on your operating system. On Linux,
   you can use chkconfig:
shell> chkconfig --add mysql

   On some Linux systems, the following command also seems to be
   necessary to fully enable the mysql script:
shell> chkconfig --level 345 mysql on

   On FreeBSD, startup scripts generally should go in
   /usr/local/etc/rc.d/. The rc(8) manual page states that scripts in
   this directory are executed only if their basename matches the
   *.sh shell file name pattern. Any other files or directories
   present within the directory are silently ignored. In other words,
   on FreeBSD, you should install the mysql.server script as
   /usr/local/etc/rc.d/mysql.server.sh to enable automatic startup.

   As an alternative to the preceding setup, some operating systems
   also use /etc/rc.local or /etc/init.d/boot.local to start
   additional services on startup. To start up MySQL using this
   method, you could append a command like the one following to the
   appropriate startup file:
/bin/sh -c 'cd /usr/local/mysql; ./bin/mysqld_safe --user=mysql &'

   For other systems, consult your operating system documentation to
   see how to install startup scripts.

   You can add options for mysql.server in a global /etc/my.cnf file.
   A typical /etc/my.cnf file might look like this:
[mysqld]
datadir=/usr/local/mysql/var
socket=/var/tmp/mysql.sock
port=3306
user=mysql

[mysql.server]
basedir=/usr/local/mysql

   The mysql.server script supports the following options: basedir,
   datadir, and pid-file. If specified, they must be placed in an
   option file, not on the command line. mysql.server supports only
   start and stop as command-line arguments.

   The following table shows which option groups the server and each
   startup script read from option files.
   Script       Option Groups
   mysqld       [mysqld], [server], [mysqld-major_version]
   mysqld_safe  [mysqld], [server], [mysqld_safe]
   mysql.server [mysqld], [mysql.server], [server]

   [mysqld-major_version] means that groups with names like
   [mysqld-5.0] and [mysqld-5.1] are read by servers having versions
   5.0.x, 5.1.x, and so forth. This feature can be used to specify
   options that can be read only by servers within a given release
   series.

   For backward compatibility, mysql.server also reads the
   [mysql_server] group and mysqld_safe also reads the [safe_mysqld]
   group. However, you should update your option files to use the
   [mysql.server] and [mysqld_safe] groups instead when using MySQL
   5.1.

   See Section 4.2.3.3, "Using Option Files."

2.11.2.3. Starting and Troubleshooting the MySQL Server

   This section provides troubleshooting suggestions for problems
   starting the server on Unix. If you are using Windows, see Section
   2.3.13, "Troubleshooting a MySQL Installation Under Windows."

   If you have problems starting the server, here are some things to
   try:

     * Check the error log to see why the server does not start.

     * Specify any special options needed by the storage engines you
       are using.

     * Make sure that the server knows where to find the data
       directory.

     * Make sure that the server can access the data directory. The
       ownership and permissions of the data directory and its
       contents must be set such that the server can read and modify
       them.

     * Verify that the network interfaces the server wants to use are
       available.

   Some storage engines have options that control their behavior. You
   can create a my.cnf file and specify startup options for the
   engines that you plan to use. If you are going to use storage
   engines that support transactional tables (InnoDB, NDB), be sure
   that you have them configured the way you want before starting the
   server:

     * If you are using InnoDB tables, see Section 13.6.2, "InnoDB
       Configuration."

     * If you are using MySQL Cluster, see Section 17.3, "MySQL
       Cluster Configuration."

   MySQL Enterprise For expert advice on start-up options appropriate
   to your circumstances, subscribe to The MySQL Enterprise Monitor.
   For more information, see
   http://www.mysql.com/products/enterprise/advisors.html.

   Storage engines will use default option values if you specify
   none, but it is recommended that you review the available options
   and specify explicit values for those for which the defaults are
   not appropriate for your installation.

   When the mysqld server starts, it changes location to the data
   directory. This is where it expects to find databases and where it
   expects to write log files. The server also writes the pid
   (process ID) file in the data directory.

   The data directory location is hardwired in when the server is
   compiled. This is where the server looks for the data directory by
   default. If the data directory is located somewhere else on your
   system, the server will not work properly. You can determine what
   the default path settings are by invoking mysqld with the
   --verbose and --help options.

   If the default locations don't match the MySQL installation layout
   on your system, you can override them by specifying options to
   mysqld or mysqld_safe on the command line or in an option file.

   To specify the location of the data directory explicitly, use the
   --datadir option. However, normally you can tell mysqld the
   location of the base directory under which MySQL is installed and
   it looks for the data directory there. You can do this with the
   --basedir option.

   To check the effect of specifying path options, invoke mysqld with
   those options followed by the --verbose and --help options. For
   example, if you change location into the directory where mysqld is
   installed and then run the following command, it shows the effect
   of starting the server with a base directory of /usr/local:
shell> ./mysqld --basedir=/usr/local --verbose --help

   You can specify other options such as --datadir as well, but
   --verbose and --help must be the last options.

   Once you determine the path settings you want, start the server
   without --verbose and --help.

   If mysqld is currently running, you can find out what path
   settings it is using by executing this command:
shell> mysqladmin variables

   Or:
shell> mysqladmin -h host_name variables

   host_name is the name of the MySQL server host.

   If you get Errcode 13 (which means Permission denied) when
   starting mysqld, this means that the privileges of the data
   directory or its contents do not allow the server access. In this
   case, you change the permissions for the involved files and
   directories so that the server has the right to use them. You can
   also start the server as root, but this raises security issues and
   should be avoided.

   On Unix, change location into the data directory and check the
   ownership of the data directory and its contents to make sure the
   server has access. For example, if the data directory is
   /usr/local/mysql/var, use this command:
shell> ls -la /usr/local/mysql/var

   If the data directory or its files or subdirectories are not owned
   by the login account that you use for running the server, change
   their ownership to that account. If the account is named mysql,
   use these commands:
shell> chown -R mysql /usr/local/mysql/var
shell> chgrp -R mysql /usr/local/mysql/var

   If the server fails to start up correctly, check the error log.
   Log files are located in the data directory (typically C:\Program
   Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.1\data on Windows,
   /usr/local/mysql/data for a Unix binary distribution, and
   /usr/local/var for a Unix source distribution). Look in the data
   directory for files with names of the form host_name.err and
   host_name.log, where host_name is the name of your server host.
   Then examine the last few lines of these files. On Unix, you can
   use tail to display them:
shell> tail host_name.err
shell> tail host_name.log

   The error log should contain information that indicates why the
   server couldn't start.

   If either of the following errors occur, it means that some other
   program (perhaps another mysqld server) is using the TCP/IP port
   or Unix socket file that mysqld is trying to use:
Can't start server: Bind on TCP/IP port: Address already in use
Can't start server: Bind on unix socket...

   Use ps to determine whether you have another mysqld server
   running. If so, shut down the server before starting mysqld again.
   (If another server is running, and you really want to run multiple
   servers, you can find information about how to do so in Section
   5.6, "Running Multiple MySQL Servers on the Same Machine.")

   If no other server is running, try to execute the command telnet
   your_host_name tcp_ip_port_number. (The default MySQL port number
   is 3306.) Then press Enter a couple of times. If you don't get an
   error message like telnet: Unable to connect to remote host:
   Connection refused, some other program is using the TCP/IP port
   that mysqld is trying to use. You'll need to track down what
   program this is and disable it, or else tell mysqld to listen to a
   different port with the --port option. In this case, you'll also
   need to specify the port number for client programs when
   connecting to the server via TCP/IP.

   Another reason the port might be inaccessible is that you have a
   firewall running that blocks connections to it. If so, modify the
   firewall settings to allow access to the port.

   If the server starts but you can't connect to it, you should make
   sure that you have an entry in /etc/hosts that looks like this:
127.0.0.1       localhost

   This problem occurs only on systems that do not have a working
   thread library and for which MySQL must be configured to use
   MIT-pthreads.

   If you cannot get mysqld to start, you can try to make a trace
   file to find the problem by using the --debug option. See MySQL
   Internals: Porting
   (http://forge.mysql.com/wiki/MySQL_Internals_Porting).

2.11.3. Securing the Initial MySQL Accounts

   Part of the MySQL installation process is to set up the mysql
   database that contains the grant tables:

     * Windows distributions contain preinitialized grant tables that
       are installed automatically.

     * On Unix, the grant tables are populated by the
       mysql_install_db program. Some installation methods run this
       program for you. Others require that you execute it manually.
       For details, see Section 2.11.2, "Unix Post-Installation
       Procedures."

   The grant tables define the initial MySQL user accounts and their
   access privileges. These accounts are set up as follows:

     * Accounts with the user name root are created. These are
       superuser accounts that can do anything. The initial root
       account passwords are empty, so anyone can connect to the
       MySQL server as root --- without a password --- and be granted
       all privileges.

          + On Windows, one root account is created; this account
            allows connecting from the local host only. The Windows
            installer will optionally create an account allowing for
            connections from any host only if the user selects the
            Enable root access from remote machines option during
            installation.

          + On Unix, both root accounts are for connections from the
            local host. Connections must be made from the local host
            by specifying a host name of localhost for one of the
            accounts, or the actual host name or IP number for the
            other.

     * Two anonymous-user accounts are created, each with an empty
       user name. The anonymous accounts have no password, so anyone
       can use them to connect to the MySQL server.

          + On Windows, one anonymous account is for connections from
            the local host. It has no global privileges. (Before
            MySQL 5.1.16, it has all global privileges, just like the
            root accounts.) The other is for connections from any
            host and has all privileges for the test database and for
            other databases with names that start with test.

          + On Unix, both anonymous accounts are for connections from
            the local host. Connections must be made from the local
            host by specifying a host name of localhost for one of
            the accounts, or the actual host name or IP number for
            the other. These accounts have all privileges for the
            test database and for other databases with names that
            start with test_.

   As noted, none of the initial accounts have passwords. This means
   that your MySQL installation is unprotected until you do something
   about it:

     * If you want to prevent clients from connecting as anonymous
       users without a password, you should either assign a password
       to each anonymous account or else remove the accounts.

     * You should assign a password to each MySQL root account.

   The following instructions describe how to set up passwords for
   the initial MySQL accounts, first for the anonymous accounts and
   then for the root accounts. Replace "newpwd" in the examples with
   the actual password that you want to use. The instructions also
   cover how to remove the anonymous accounts, should you prefer not
   to allow anonymous access at all.

   You might want to defer setting the passwords until later, so that
   you don't need to specify them while you perform additional setup
   or testing. However, be sure to set them before using your
   installation for production purposes.

   Anonymous Account Password Assignment

   To assign passwords to the anonymous accounts, connect to the
   server as root and then use either SET PASSWORD or UPDATE. In
   either case, be sure to encrypt the password using the PASSWORD()
   function.

   To use SET PASSWORD on Windows, do this:
shell> mysql -u root
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR ''@'localhost' = PASSWORD('newpwd');
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR ''@'%' = PASSWORD('newpwd');

   To use SET PASSWORD on Unix, do this:
shell> mysql -u root
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR ''@'localhost' = PASSWORD('newpwd');
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR ''@'host_name' = PASSWORD('newpwd');

   In the second SET PASSWORD statement, replace host_name with the
   name of the server host. This is the name that is specified in the
   Host column of the non-localhost record for root in the user
   table. If you don't know what host name this is, issue the
   following statement before using SET PASSWORD:
mysql> SELECT Host, User FROM mysql.user;

   Look for the record that has root in the User column and something
   other than localhost in the Host column. Then use that Host value
   in the second SET PASSWORD statement.

   Anonymous Account Removal

   If you prefer to remove the anonymous accounts instead, do so as
   follows:
shell> mysql -u root
mysql> DROP USER '';

   The DROP statement applies both to Windows and to Unix. On
   Windows, if you want to remove only the anonymous account that has
   the same privileges as root, do this instead:
shell> mysql -u root
mysql> DROP USER ''@'localhost';

   That account allows anonymous access but has full privileges, so
   removing it improves security.

   root Account Password Assignment

   You can assign passwords to the root accounts in several ways. The
   following discussion demonstrates three methods:

     * Use the SET PASSWORD statement

     * Use the mysqladmin command-line client program

     * Use the UPDATE statement

   To assign passwords using SET PASSWORD, connect to the server as
   root and issue SET PASSWORD statements. Be sure to encrypt the
   password using the PASSWORD() function.

   For Windows, do this:
shell> mysql -u root
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR 'root'@'localhost' = PASSWORD('newpwd');
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR 'root'@'%' = PASSWORD('newpwd');

   For Unix, do this:
shell> mysql -u root
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR 'root'@'localhost' = PASSWORD('newpwd');
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR 'root'@'host_name' = PASSWORD('newpwd');

   In the second SET PASSWORD statement, replace host_name with the
   name of the server host. This is the same host name that you used
   when you assigned the anonymous account passwords.

   If the user table contains an account with User and Host values of
   'root' and '127.0.0.1', use an additional SET PASSWORD statement
   to set that account's password:
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR 'root'@'127.0.0.1' = PASSWORD('newpwd');

   To assign passwords to the root accounts using mysqladmin, execute
   the following commands:
shell> mysqladmin -u root password "newpwd"
shell> mysqladmin -u root -h host_name password "newpwd"

   These commands apply both to Windows and to Unix. In the second
   command, replace host_name with the name of the server host. The
   double quotes around the password are not always necessary, but
   you should use them if the password contains spaces or other
   characters that are special to your command interpreter.

   The mysqladmin method of setting the root account passwords does
   not set the password for the 'root'@'127.0.0.1' account. To do so,
   use SET PASSWORD as shown earlier.

   You can also use UPDATE to modify the user table directly. The
   following UPDATE statement assigns a password to all root
   accounts:
shell> mysql -u root
mysql> UPDATE mysql.user SET Password = PASSWORD('newpwd')
    ->     WHERE User = 'root';
mysql> FLUSH PRIVILEGES;

   The UPDATE statement applies both to Windows and to Unix.

   After the passwords have been set, you must supply the appropriate
   password whenever you connect to the server. For example, if you
   want to use mysqladmin to shut down the server, you can do so
   using this command:
shell> mysqladmin -u root -p shutdown
Enter password: (enter root password here)

Note

   If you forget your root password after setting it up, Section
   B.1.4.1, "How to Reset the Root Password," covers the procedure
   for resetting it.

   To set up additional accounts, you can use the GRANT statement.
   For instructions, see Section 5.5.2, "Adding User Accounts."

2.12. Upgrading or Downgrading MySQL

2.12.1. Upgrading MySQL

   As a general rule, to upgrade from one release series to another,
   you should go to the next series rather than skipping a series. To
   upgrade from a release series previous to MySQL 5.0, upgrade to
   each successive release series in turn until you have reached
   MySQL 5.0, and then proceed with the upgrade to MySQL 5.1. For
   example, if you currently are running MySQL 4.0 and wish to
   upgrade to a newer series, upgrade to MySQL 4.1 first before
   upgrading to 5.0, and so forth. For information on upgrading to
   MySQL 5.0, see the MySQL 5.0 Reference Manual; for earlier
   releases, see the MySQL 3.23, 4.0, 4.1 Reference Manual.

   To upgrade from MySQL 5.0 to 5.1, use the items in the following
   checklist as a guide:

     * Before any upgrade, back up your databases, including the
       mysql database that contains the grant tables. See Section
       6.1, "Database Backups."

     * Read all the notes in Section 2.12.1.1, "Upgrading from MySQL
       5.0 to 5.1." These notes enable you to identify upgrade issues
       that apply to your current MySQL installation. Some
       incompatibilities discussed in that section require your
       attention before upgrading. Others should be dealt with after
       upgrading.

     * Read Appendix C, "MySQL Change History" as well, which
       provides information about features that are new in MySQL 5.1
       or differ from those found in MySQL 5.0.

     * After you upgrade to a new version of MySQL, run mysql_upgrade
       (see Section 4.4.8, "mysql_upgrade --- Check Tables for MySQL
       Upgrade"). This program checks your tables, and attempts to
       repair them if necessary. It also updates your grant tables to
       make sure that they have the current structure so that you can
       take advantage of any new capabilities. (Some releases of
       MySQL introduce changes to the structure of the grant tables
       to add new privileges or features.)

     * If you are running MySQL Server on Windows, see Section
       2.3.14, "Upgrading MySQL on Windows."

     * If you are using replication, see Section 16.3.3, "Upgrading a
       Replication Setup," for information on upgrading your
       replication setup.

     * If you are upgrading an installation originally produced by
       installing multiple RPM packages, it is best to upgrade all
       the packages, not just some. For example, if you previously
       installed the server and client RPMs, do not upgrade just the
       server RPM.

     * As of MySQL 5.1.9, the mysqld-max server is included in binary
       distributions. There is no separate MySQL-Max distribution. As
       of MySQL 5.1.12, there is no mysqld-max server at all in
       binary distributions. They contain a server that includes the
       features previously included in mysqld-max.

     * If you have created a user-defined function (UDF) with a given
       name and upgrade MySQL to a version that implements a new
       built-in function with the same name, the UDF becomes
       inaccessible. To correct this, use DROP FUNCTION to drop the
       UDF, and then use CREATE FUNCTION to re-create the UDF with a
       different nonconflicting name. The same is true if the new
       version of MySQL implements a built-in function with the same
       name as an existing stored function. See Section 8.2.4,
       "Function Name Parsing and Resolution," for the rules
       describing how the server interprets references to different
       kinds of functions.

   You can always move the MySQL format files and data files between
   different versions on systems with the same architecture as long
   as you stay within versions for the same release series of MySQL.

   If you are cautious about using new versions, you can always
   rename your old mysqld before installing a newer one. For example,
   if you are using MySQL 5.0.13 and want to upgrade to 5.1.10,
   rename your current server from mysqld to mysqld-5.0.13. If your
   new mysqld then does something unexpected, you can simply shut it
   down and restart with your old mysqld.

   If, after an upgrade, you experience problems with recompiled
   client programs, such as Commands out of sync or unexpected core
   dumps, you probably have used old header or library files when
   compiling your programs. In this case, you should check the date
   for your mysql.h file and libmysqlclient.a library to verify that
   they are from the new MySQL distribution. If not, recompile your
   programs with the new headers and libraries.

   If problems occur, such as that the new mysqld server does not
   start or that you cannot connect without a password, verify that
   you do not have an old my.cnf file from your previous
   installation. You can check this with the --print-defaults option
   (for example, mysqld --print-defaults). If this command displays
   anything other than the program name, you have an active my.cnf
   file that affects server or client operation.

   If your MySQL installation contains a large amount of data that
   might take a long time to convert after an in-place upgrade, you
   might find it useful to create a "dummy" database instance for
   assessing what conversions might be needed and the work involved
   to perform them. Make a copy of your MySQL instance that contains
   a full copy of the mysql database, plus all other databases
   without data. Run your upgrade procedure on this dummy instance to
   see what actions might be needed so that you can better evaluate
   the work involved when performing actual data conversion on your
   original database instance.

   It is a good idea to rebuild and reinstall the Perl DBD::mysql
   module whenever you install a new release of MySQL. The same
   applies to other MySQL interfaces as well, such as PHP mysql
   extensions and the Python MySQLdb module.

2.12.1.1. Upgrading from MySQL 5.0 to 5.1

   After upgrading a 5.0 installation to 5.0.10 or above, it is
   necessary to upgrade your grant tables. Otherwise, creating stored
   procedures and functions might not work. To perform this upgrade,
   run mysql_upgrade.

Note

   It is good practice to back up your data before installing any new
   version of software. Although MySQL works very hard to ensure a
   high level of quality, you should protect your data by making a
   backup.

   To upgrade to 5.1 from any previous version, MySQL recommends that
   you dump your tables with mysqldump before upgrading and reload
   the dump file after upgrading.

   In general, you should do the following when upgrading from MySQL
   5.0 to 5.1:

     * Read all the items in the following sections to see whether
       any of them might affect your applications:

          + Section 2.12.1, "Upgrading MySQL," has general update
            information.

          + The items in the change lists found later in this section
            enable you to identify upgrade issues that apply to your
            current MySQL installation.

          + The MySQL 5.1 change history describes significant new
            features you can use in 5.1 or that differ from those
            found in MySQL 5.0. Some of these changes may result in
            incompatibilities. See Section C.1, "Changes in Release
            5.1.x (Production)."

     * Note particularly any changes that are marked Known issue or
       Incompatible change. These incompatibilities with earlier
       versions of MySQL may require your attention before you
       upgrade.
       Our aim is to avoid these changes, but occasionally they are
       necessary to correct problems that would be worse than an
       incompatibility between releases. If any upgrade issue
       applicable to your installation involves an incompatibility
       that requires special handling, follow the instructions given
       in the incompatibility description. Often this will involve a
       dump and reload, or use of a statement such as CHECK TABLE or
       REPAIR TABLE.
       For dump and reload instructions, see Section 2.12.4,
       "Rebuilding or Repairing Tables or Indexes." Any procedure
       that involves REPAIR TABLE with the USE_FRM option must be
       done before upgrading. Use of this statement with a version of
       MySQL different from the one used to create the table (that
       is, using it after upgrading) may damage the table. See
       Section 12.5.2.6, "REPAIR TABLE Syntax."

     * After you upgrade to a new version of MySQL, run mysql_upgrade
       (see Section 4.4.8, "mysql_upgrade --- Check Tables for MySQL
       Upgrade"). This program checks your tables, and attempts to
       repair them if necessary. It also updates your grant tables to
       make sure that they have the current structure so that you can
       take advantage of any new capabilities. (Some releases of
       MySQL introduce changes to the structure of the grant tables
       to add new privileges or features.)

     * Check Section 2.12.3, "Checking Whether Table Indexes Must Be
       Rebuilt," to see whether changes to character sets or
       collations were made that affect your table indexes. If so,
       you will need to rebuild the affected indexes using the
       instructions in Section 2.12.4, "Rebuilding or Repairing
       Tables or Indexes."

     * If you are running MySQL Server on Windows, see Section
       2.3.14, "Upgrading MySQL on Windows."

     * If you are using replication, see Section 16.3.3, "Upgrading a
       Replication Setup," for information on upgrading your
       replication setup.

   If your MySQL installation contains a large amount of data that
   might take a long time to convert after an in-place upgrade, you
   might find it useful to create a "dummy" database instance for
   assessing what conversions might be needed and the work involved
   to perform them. Make a copy of your MySQL instance that contains
   a full copy of the mysql database, plus all other databases
   without data. Run your upgrade procedure on this dummy instance to
   see what actions might be needed so that you can better evaluate
   the work involved when performing actual data conversion on your
   original database instance.

   MySQL Enterprise MySQL Enterprise subscribers will find more
   information about upgrading in the Knowledge Base articles found
   at Upgrading
   (https://kb.mysql.com/search.php?cat=search&category=41). Access
   to the MySQL Knowledge Base collection of articles is one of the
   advantages of subscribing to MySQL Enterprise. For more
   information, see
   http://www.mysql.com/products/enterprise/advisors.html.

   The following lists describe changes that may affect applications
   and that you should watch out for when upgrading to MySQL 5.1.

   Configuration Changes:

     * Before MySQL 5.1.11, to build MySQL from source with SSL
       support enabled, you would invoke configure with either the
       --with-openssl or --with-yassl option. In MySQL 5.1.11, those
       options both have been replaced by the --with-ssl option. By
       default, --with-ssl causes the bundled yaSSL library to be
       used. To select OpenSSL instead, give the option as
       --with-ssl=path, where path is the directory where the OpenSSL
       header files and libraries are located.

   Server Changes:

     * Known issue: Dumps performed by using mysqldump to generate a
       dump file before the upgrade and reloading the file after
       upgrading are subject to the following problem:
       Before MySQL 5.0.40, mysqldump displays SPATIAL index
       definitions using prefix lengths for the indexed columns.
       These prefix lengths are accepted in MySQL 5.0, but not as of
       MySQL 5.1. If you use mysqldump from versions of MySQL older
       than 5.0.40, any table containing SPATIAL indexes will cause
       an error when the dump file is reloaded into MySQL 5.1 or
       higher.
       For example, a table definition might look like this when
       dumped in MySQL 5.0:
CREATE TABLE `t` (
 `g` geometry NOT NULL,
 SPATIAL KEY `g` (`g`(32))
) ENGINE=MyISAM DEFAULT CHARSET=latin1
       The SPATIAL index definition will not be accepted in MySQL
       5.1. To work around this, edit the dump file to remove the
       prefix:
CREATE TABLE `t` (
 `g` geometry NOT NULL,
 SPATIAL KEY `g` (`g`)
) ENGINE=MyISAM DEFAULT CHARSET=latin1
       Dump files can be large, so it may be preferable to dump table
       definitions and data separately to make it easier to edit the
       definitions:
shell> mysqldump --no-data other_args > definitions.sql
shell> mysqldump --no-create-info other_args > data.sql
       Then edit definitions.sql before reloading definitions.sql and
       data.sql, in that order.
       If you upgrade to a version of MySQL 5.0 higher than 5.0.40
       before upgrading to MySQL 5.1, this problem does not occur.

     * Known issue: Before MySQL 5.1.30, the CHECK TABLE ... FOR
       UPGRADE statement did not check for incompatible collation
       changes made in MySQL 5.1.24. (This also affects mysqlcheck
       and mysql_upgrade, which cause that statement to be executed.)
       Prior to the fix made in 5.1.30, a binary upgrade (performed
       without dumping tables with mysqldump before the upgrade and
       reloading the dump file after the upgrade) would corrupt
       tables. After the fix, CHECK TABLE ... FOR UPGRADE properly
       detects the problem and warns about tables that need repair.
       However, the fix is not backward compatible and can result in
       a downgrading problem under these circumstances:

         1. Perform a binary upgrade to a version of MySQL that
            includes the fix.

         2. Run CHECK TABLE ... FOR UPGRADE (or mysqlcheck or
            mysql_upgrade) to upgrade tables.

         3. Perform a binary downgrade to a version of MySQL that
            does not include the fix.
       The solution is to dump tables with mysqldump before the
       downgrade and reload the dump file after the downgrade.
       Alternatively, drop and recreate affected indexes.

     * Known issue: MySQL introduces encoding for table names that
       have non-ASCII characters (see Section 8.2.3, "Mapping of
       Identifiers to File Names"). After a binary upgrade from MySQL
       5.0 to 5.1 or higher, the server recognizes names that have
       non-ASCII characters and adds a #mysql50# prefix to them.
       As of MySQL 5.1.31, mysql_upgrade encodes these names by
       executing the following command:
mysqlcheck --all-databases --check-upgrade --fix-db-names --fix-table
-names
       Prior to MySQL 5.1.31, mysql_upgrade does not execute this
       command, so you should execute it manually if you have
       database or table names that contain nonalphanumeric
       characters.
       Prior to MySQL 5.1.23, the mysqlcheck command does not perform
       the name encoding for views. To work around this problem, drop
       each affected view and recreate it.
       mysqlcheck cannot fix names that contain literal instances of
       the @ character that is used for encoding special characters.
       If you have databases or tables that contain this character,
       use mysqldump to dump them before upgrading to MySQL 5.1, and
       then reload the dump file after upgrading.

     * Known issue: When upgrading from MySQL 5.0 to versions of 5.1
       prior to 5.1.23, running mysqlcheck (or mysql_upgrade, which
       runs mysqlcheck) to upgrade tables fails for names that must
       be written as quoted identifiers. To work around this problem,
       rename each affected table to a name that does not require
       quoting:
RENAME TABLE `tab``le_a` TO table_a;
RENAME TABLE `table b` TO table_b;
       After renaming the tables, run the mysql_upgrade program. Then
       rename the tables back to their original names:
RENAME TABLE table_a TO `tab``le_a`;
RENAME TABLE table_b TO `table b`;

     * Known issue: In connection with view creation, the server
       created arc directories inside database directories and
       maintained useless copies of .frm files there. Creation and
       renaming procedures of those copies as well as creation of arc
       directories has been discontinued in MySQL 5.1.29.
       This change does cause a problem when downgrading to older
       server versions which manifests itself under these
       circumstances:

         1. Create a view v_orig in MySQL 5.1.29 or higher.

         2. Rename the view to v_new and then back to v_orig.

         3. Downgrade to an older 5.1.x server and run mysql_upgrade.

         4. Try to rename v_orig to v_new again. This operation
            fails.
       As a workaround to avoid this problem, use either of these
       approaches:

          + Dump your data using mysqldump before downgrading and
            reload the dump file after downgrading.

          + Instead of renaming a view after the downgrade, drop it
            and recreate it.

     * Incompatible change: Character set or collation changes were
       made in MySQL 5.1.21, 5.1.23, and 5.1.24 that may require
       table indexes to be rebuilt. For details, see Section 2.12.3,
       "Checking Whether Table Indexes Must Be Rebuilt."

     * Incompatible change: In MySQL 5.1.36, options for loading
       plugins such as pluggable storage engines were changed from
       boolean to tristate format. The implementations overlap, but
       if you previously used options of the form --plugin_name=0 or
       --plugin_name=1, you should instead use --plugin_name=OFF or
       --plugin_name=ON, respectively. For details, see Section
       5.1.3, "Server Options for Loading Plugins."

     * Incompatible change: From MySQL 5.1.24 to 5.1.31, the UPDATE
       statement was changed such that assigning NULL to a NOT NULL
       column caused an error even when strict SQL mode was not
       enabled. The original behavior before MySQL 5.1.24 was that
       such assignments caused an error only in strict SQL mode, and
       otherwise set the column to the implicit default value for the
       column data type and generated a warning. (For information
       about implicit default values, see Section 10.1.4, "Data Type
       Default Values.")
       The change caused compatibility problems for applications that
       relied on the original behavior. It also caused replication
       problems between servers that had the original behavior and
       those that did not, for applications that assigned NULL to NOT
       NULL columns in UPDATE statements without strict SQL mode
       enabled. The change was reverted in MySQL 5.1.32 so that
       UPDATE again had the original behavior. Problems can still
       occur if you replicate between servers that have the modified
       UPDATE behavior and those that do not.

     * Incompatible change: As of MySQL 5.1.29, the default binary
       logging mode has been changed from MIXED to STATEMENT for
       compatibility with MySQL 5.0.

     * Incompatible change: In MySQL 5.1.25, a change was made to the
       way that the server handles prepared statements. This affects
       prepared statements processed at the SQL level (using the
       PREPARE statement) and those processed using the binary
       client-server protocol (using the mysql_stmt_prepare() C API
       function).
       Previously, changes to metadata of tables or views referred to
       in a prepared statement could cause a server crash when the
       statement was next executed, or perhaps an error at execute
       time with a crash occurring later. For example, this could
       happen after dropping a table and recreating it with a
       different definition.
       Now metadata changes to tables or views referred to by
       prepared statements are detected and cause automatic
       repreparation of the statement when it is next executed.
       Metadata changes occur for DDL statements such as those that
       create, drop, alter, rename, or truncate tables, or that
       analyze, optimize, or repair tables. Repreparation also occurs
       after referenced tables or views are flushed from the table
       definition cache, either implicitly to make room for new
       entries in the cache, or explicitly due to FLUSH TABLES.
       Repreparation is automatic, but to the extent that it occurs,
       performance of prepared statements is diminished.
       Table content changes (for example, with INSERT or UPDATE) do
       not cause repreparation, nor do SELECT statements.
       An incompatibility with previous versions of MySQL is that a
       prepared statement may now return a different set of columns
       or different column types from one execution to the next. For
       example, if the prepared statement is SELECT * FROM t1,
       altering t1 to contain a different number of columns causes
       the next execution to return a number of columns different
       from the previous execution.
       Older versions of the client library cannot handle this change
       in behavior. For applications that use prepared statements
       with the new server, an upgrade to the new client library is
       strongly recommended.
       Along with this change to statement repreparation, the default
       value of the table_definition_cache system variable has been
       increased from 128 to 256. The purpose of this increase is to
       lessen the chance that prepared statements will need
       repreparation due to referred-to tables/views having been
       flushed from the cache to make room for new entries.
       A new status variable, Com_stmt_reprepare, has been introduced
       to track the number of repreparations.

     * Incompatible change: As of MySQL 5.1.23, within a stored
       routine, it is no longer allowable to declare a cursor for a
       SHOW or DESCRIBE statement. This happened to work in some
       instances, but is no longer supported. In many cases, a
       workaround for this change is to use the cursor with a SELECT
       query to read from an INFORMATION_SCHEMA table that produces
       the same information as the SHOW statement.

     * Incompatible change: SHOW CREATE VIEW displays view
       definitions using an AS alias_name clause for each column. If
       a column is created from an expression, the default alias is
       the expression text, which can be quite long. As of MySQL
       5.1.23, aliases for column names in CREATE VIEW statements are
       checked against the maximum column length of 64 characters
       (not the maximum alias length of 256 characters). As a result,
       views created from the output of SHOW CREATE VIEW fail if any
       column alias exceeds 64 characters. This can cause problems
       for replication or loading dump files. For additional
       information and workarounds, see Section D.4, "Restrictions on
       Views."

     * Incompatible change: MySQL 5.1 implements support for a plugin
       API that allows the loading and unloading of components at
       runtime, without restarting the server. Section 22.2, "The
       MySQL Plugin Interface." The plugin API requires the
       mysql.plugin table. After upgrading from an older version of
       MySQL, you should run the mysql_upgrade command to create this
       table. See Section 4.4.8, "mysql_upgrade --- Check Tables for
       MySQL Upgrade."
       Plugins are installed in the directory named by the plugin_dir
       system variable. This variable also controls the location from
       which the server loads user-defined functions (UDFs), which is
       a change from earlier versions of MySQL. That is, all UDF
       library files now must be installed in the plugin directory.
       When upgrading from an older version of MySQL, you must
       migrate your UDF files to the plugin directory.

     * Incompatible change: The table_cache system variable has been
       renamed to table_open_cache. Any scripts that refer to
       table_cache must be updated to use the new name.

     * Incompatible change: Several issues were identified for stored
       programs (stored procedures and functions, triggers, and
       events) and views containing non-ASCII symbols. These issues
       involved conversion errors due to incomplete character set
       information when translating these objects to and from stored
       format.
       To address these problems, the representation for these
       objects was changed in MySQL 5.1.21. However, the fixes affect
       all stored programs and views. (For example, you will see
       warnings about "no creation context.") To avoid warnings from
       the server about the use of old definitions from any release
       prior to 5.1.21, you should dump stored programs and views
       with mysqldump after upgrading to 5.1.21 or higher, and then
       reload them to recreate them with new definitions. Invoke
       mysqldump with a --default-character-set option that names the
       non-ASCII character set that was used for the definitions when
       the objects were originally defined.

     * Incompatible change: As of MySQL 5.1.20, mysqld_safe supports
       error logging to syslog on systems that support the logger
       command. The new --syslog and --skip-syslog options can be
       used instead of the --log-error option to control logging
       behavior, as described in Section 4.3.2, "mysqld_safe ---
       MySQL Server Startup Script."
       In 5.1.21 and up, the default is --skip-syslog, which is
       compatible with the default behavior of writing an error log
       file for releases prior to 5.1.20.
       In 5.1.20 only, the following conditions apply: 1) The default
       is to use syslog, which is not compatible with releases prior
       to 5.1.20. 2) Logging to syslog may fail to operate correctly
       in some cases. For these reasons, avoid using MySQL 5.1.20.

     * Incompatible change: As of MySQL 5.1.15, InnoDB rolls back
       only the last statement on a transaction timeout. A new
       option, --innodb_rollback_on_timeout, causes InnoDB to abort
       and roll back the entire transaction if a transaction timeout
       occurs (the same behavior as in MySQL 4.1).

     * Incompatible change: As of MySQL 5.1.15, the following
       conditions apply to enabling the read_only system variable:

          + If you attempt to enable read_only while you have any
            explicit locks (acquired with LOCK TABLES or have a
            pending transaction, an error will occur.

          + If other clients hold explicit table locks or have
            pending transactions, the attempt to enable read_only
            blocks until the locks are released and the transactions
            end. While the attempt to enable read_only is pending,
            requests by other clients for table locks or to begin
            transactions also block until read_only has been set.

          + read_only can be enabled while you hold a global read
            lock (acquired with FLUSH TABLES WITH READ LOCK) because
            that does not involve table locks.
       Previously, the attempt to enable read_only would return
       immediately even if explicit locks or transactions were
       pending, so some data changes could occur for statements
       executing in the server at the same time.

     * Incompatible change: The number of function names affected by
       IGNORE_SPACE was reduced significantly in MySQL 5.1.13, from
       about 200 to about 30. (For details about IGNORE_SPACE, see
       Section 8.2.4, "Function Name Parsing and Resolution.") This
       change improves the consistency of parser operation. However,
       it also introduces the possibility of incompatibility for old
       SQL code that relies on the following conditions:

          + IGNORE_SPACE is disabled.

          + The presence or absence of whitespace following a
            function name is used to distinguish between a built-in
            function and stored function that have the same name (for
            example, PI() versus PI ()).
       For functions that are no longer affected by IGNORE_SPACE as
       of MySQL 5.1.13, that strategy no longer works. Either of the
       following approaches can be used if you have code that is
       subject to the preceding incompatibility:

          + If a stored function has a name that conflicts with a
            built-in function, refer to the stored function with a
            schema name qualifier, regardless of whether whitespace
            is present. For example, write schema_name.PI() or
            schema_name.PI ().

          + Alternatively, rename the stored function to use a
            nonconflicting name and change invocations of the
            function to use the new name.

     * Incompatible change: For utf8 columns, the full-text parser
       incorrectly considered several nonword punctuation and
       whitespace characters as word characters, causing some
       searches to return incorrect results. The fix involves a
       change to the full-text parser in MySQL 5.1.12, so as of
       5.1.12, any tables that have FULLTEXT indexes on utf8 columns
       must be repaired with REPAIR TABLE:
REPAIR TABLE tbl_name QUICK;

     * Incompatible change: Storage engines can be pluggable at
       runtime, so the distinction between disabled and invalid
       storage engines no longer applies. As of MySQL 5.1.12, this
       affects the NO_ENGINE_SUBSTITUTION SQL mode, as described in
       Section 5.1.8, "Server SQL Modes."

     * Incompatible change: The structure of FULLTEXT indexes has
       been changed in MySQL 5.1.6. After upgrading to MySQL 5.1.6 or
       greater, any tables that have FULLTEXT indexes must be
       repaired with REPAIR TABLE:
REPAIR TABLE tbl_name QUICK;

     * Incompatible change: In MySQL 5.1.6, when log tables were
       implemented, the default log destination for the general query
       and slow query log was TABLE. As of MySQL 5.1.21, this default
       has been changed to FILE, which is compatible with MySQL 5.0,
       but incompatible with earlier releases of MySQL 5.1. If you
       are upgrading from MySQL 5.0 to 5.1.21 or higher, no logging
       option changes should be necessary. However, if you are
       upgrading from 5.1.6 through 5.1.20 to 5.1.21 or higher and
       were using TABLE logging, use the --log-output=TABLE option
       explicitly to preserve your server's table-logging behavior.

     * Incompatible change: For ENUM columns that had enumeration
       values containing commas, the commas were mapped to 0xff
       internally. However, this rendered the commas
       indistinguishable from true 0xff characters in the values.
       This no longer occurs. However, the fix requires that you dump
       and reload any tables that have ENUM columns containing true
       0xff in their values: Dump the tables using mysqldump with the
       current server before upgrading from a version of MySQL 5.1
       older than 5.1.15 to version 5.1.15 or newer.

     * As of MySQL 5.1.12, the lc_time_names system variable
       specifies the locale that controls the language used to
       display day and month names and abbreviations. This variable
       affects the output from the DATE_FORMAT(), DAYNAME() and
       MONTHNAME() functions. See Section 9.8, "MySQL Server Locale
       Support."

     * As of MySQL 5.1.9, mysqld_safe no longer implicitly invokes
       mysqld-max if it exists. Instead, it invokes mysqld unless a
       --mysqld or --mysqld-version option is given to specify
       another server explicitly. If you previously relied on the
       implicit invocation of mysqld-max, you should use an
       appropriate option now. As of MySQL 5.1.12, there is no longer
       any separate mysqld-max server, so no change should be
       necessary.

   SQL Changes:

     * Known issue: Prior to MySQL 5.1.17, the parser accepted
       invalid code in SQL condition handlers, leading to server
       crashes or unexpected execution behavior in stored programs.
       Specifically, the parser allowed a condition handler to refer
       to labels for blocks that enclose the handler declaration.
       This was incorrect because block label scope does not include
       the code for handlers declared within the labeled block.
       As of 5.1.17, the parser rejects this invalid construct, but
       if you perform a binary upgrade (without dumping and reloading
       your databases), existing handlers that contain the construct
       still are invalid and should be rewritten even if they appear
       to function as you expect.
       To find affected handlers, use mysqldump to dump all stored
       procedures and functions, triggers, and events. Then attempt
       to reload them into an upgraded server. Handlers that contain
       illegal label references will be rejected.
       For more information about condition handlers and writing them
       to avoid invalid jumps, see Section 12.8.4.2, "DECLARE for
       Handlers."

     * Incompatible change: The parser accepted statements that
       contained /* ... */ that were not properly closed with */,
       such as SELECT 1 /* + 2. As of MySQL 5.1.23, statements that
       contain unclosed /*-comments now are rejected with a syntax
       error.
       This fix has the potential to cause incompatibilities. Because
       of Bug#26302: http://bugs.mysql.com/26302, which caused the
       trailing */ to be truncated from comments in views, stored
       routines, triggers, and events, it is possible that objects of
       those types may have been stored with definitions that now
       will be rejected as syntactically invalid. Such objects should
       be dropped and re-created so that their definitions do not
       contain truncated comments.

     * Incompatible change: Multiple-table DELETE statements
       containing ambiguous aliases could have unintended side
       effects such as deleting rows from the wrong table. Example:
DELETE FROM t1 AS a2 USING t1 AS a1 INNER JOIN t2 AS a2;
       As of MySQL 5.1.23, alias declarations can be declared only in
       the table_references part. Elsewhere in the statement, alias
       references are allowed but not alias declarations. Statements
       containing aliases that are no longer allowed must be
       rewritten.

     * Incompatible change: As of MySQL 5.1.8, TYPE = engine_name is
       still accepted as a synonym for the ENGINE = engine_name table
       option but generates a warning. You should note that this
       option is not available in MySQL 5.1.7, and is removed
       altogether as of MySQL 6.0 and produces a syntax error.
       TYPE has been deprecated since MySQL 4.0.

     * Incompatible change: The namespace for triggers changed in
       MySQL 5.0.10. Previously, trigger names had to be unique per
       table. Now they must be unique within the schema (database).
       An implication of this change is that DROP TRIGGER syntax now
       uses a schema name instead of a table name (schema name is
       optional and, if omitted, the current schema will be used).
       When upgrading from a version of MySQL 5 older than 5.0.10 to
       MySQL 5.0.10 or newer, you must drop all triggers and
       re-create them or DROP TRIGGER will not work after the
       upgrade. Here is a suggested procedure for doing this:

         1. Upgrade to MySQL 5.0.10 or later to be able to access
            trigger information in the INFORMATION_SCHEMA.TRIGGERS
            table. (This should work even for pre-5.0.10 triggers.)

         2. Dump all trigger definitions using the following SELECT
            statement:
SELECT CONCAT('CREATE TRIGGER ', t.TRIGGER_SCHEMA, '.', t.TRIGGER_NAM
E,
              ' ', t.ACTION_TIMING, ' ', t.EVENT_MANIPULATION, ' ON '
,
              t.EVENT_OBJECT_SCHEMA, '.', t.EVENT_OBJECT_TABLE,
              ' FOR EACH ROW ', t.ACTION_STATEMENT, '//' )
INTO OUTFILE '/tmp/triggers.sql'
FROM INFORMATION_SCHEMA.TRIGGERS AS t;
            The statement uses INTO OUTFILE, so you must have the
            FILE privilege. The file will be created on the server
            host. Use a different file name if you like. To be 100%
            safe, inspect the trigger definitions in the triggers.sql
            file, and perhaps make a backup of the file.

         3. Stop the server and drop all triggers by removing all
            .TRG files in your database directories. Change location
            to your data directory and issue this command:
shell> rm */*.TRG

         4. Start the server and re-create all triggers using the
            triggers.sql file:
mysql> delimiter // ;
mysql> source /tmp/triggers.sql //

         5. Check that all triggers were successfully created using
            the SHOW TRIGGERS statement.

     * Incompatible change: MySQL 5.1.6 introduces the TRIGGER
       privilege. Previously, the SUPER privilege was needed to
       create or drop triggers. Now those operations require the
       TRIGGER privilege. This is a security improvement because you
       no longer need to grant users the SUPER privilege to enable
       them to create triggers. However, the requirement that the
       account named in a trigger's DEFINER clause must have the
       SUPER privilege has changed to a requirement for the TRIGGER
       privilege. When upgrading from a previous version of MySQL 5.0
       or 5.1 to MySQL 5.1.6 or newer, be sure to update your grant
       tables by running mysql_upgrade. This will assign the TRIGGER
       privilege to all accounts that had the SUPER privilege. If you
       fail to update the grant tables, triggers may fail when
       activated. After updating the grant tables, you can revoke the
       SUPER privilege from those accounts that no longer otherwise
       require it.

     * Some keywords are reserved in MySQL 5.1 that were not reserved
       in MySQL 5.0. See Section 8.3, "Reserved Words."

     * The LOAD DATA FROM MASTER and LOAD TABLE FROM MASTER
       statements are deprecated. See Section 12.6.2.2, "LOAD DATA
       FROM MASTER Syntax," for recommended alternatives.

     * The INSTALL PLUGIN and UNINSTALL PLUGIN statements that are
       used for the plugin API are new. So is the WITH PARSER clause
       for FULLTEXT index creation that associates a parser plugin
       with a full-text index. Section 22.2, "The MySQL Plugin
       Interface."

   C API Changes:

     * Incompatible change: As of MySQL 5.1.7, the
       mysql_stmt_attr_get() C API function returns a boolean rather
       than an unsigned int for STMT_ATTR_UPDATE_MAX_LENGTH.
       (Bug#16144: http://bugs.mysql.com/16144)

2.12.2. Downgrading MySQL

   This section describes what you should do to downgrade to an older
   MySQL version in the unlikely case that the previous version
   worked better than the new one.

   If you are downgrading within the same release series (for
   example, from 5.0.13 to 5.0.12) the general rule is that you just
   have to install the new binaries on top of the old ones. There is
   no need to do anything with the databases. As always, however, it
   is always a good idea to make a backup.

   The following items form a checklist of things you should do
   whenever you perform a downgrade:

     * Read the upgrading section for the release series from which
       you are downgrading to be sure that it does not have any
       features you really need. See Section 2.12.1, "Upgrading
       MySQL."

     * If there is a downgrading section for that version, you should
       read that as well.

     * To see which new features were added between the version to
       which you are downgrading and your current version, see the
       change logs (Appendix C, "MySQL Change History").

     * Check Section 2.12.3, "Checking Whether Table Indexes Must Be
       Rebuilt," to see whether changes to character sets or
       collations were made between your current version of MySQL and
       the version to which you are downgrading. If so and these
       changes affect your table indexes, you will need to rebuild
       the affected indexes using the instructions in Section 2.12.4,
       "Rebuilding or Repairing Tables or Indexes."

   In most cases, you can move the MySQL format files and data files
   between different versions on the same architecture as long as you
   stay within versions for the same release series of MySQL.

   If you downgrade from one release series to another, there may be
   incompatibilities in table storage formats. In this case, use
   mysqldump to dump your tables before downgrading. After
   downgrading, reload the dump file using mysql or mysqlimport to
   re-create your tables. For examples, see Section 2.12.5, "Copying
   MySQL Databases to Another Machine."

   A typical symptom of a downward-incompatible table format change
   when you downgrade is that you cannot open tables. In that case,
   use the following procedure:

    1. Stop the older MySQL server that you are downgrading to.

    2. Restart the newer MySQL server you are downgrading from.

    3. Dump any tables that were inaccessible to the older server by
       using mysqldump to create a dump file.

    4. Stop the newer MySQL server and restart the older one.

    5. Reload the dump file into the older server. Your tables should
       be accessible.

   It might also be the case that the structure of the system tables
   in the mysql database has changed and that downgrading introduces
   some loss of functionality or requires some adjustments. Here are
   some examples:

     * Trigger creation requires the TRIGGER privilege as of MySQL
       5.1. In MySQL 5.0, there is no TRIGGER privilege and SUPER is
       required instead. If you downgrade from MySQL 5.1 to 5.0, you
       will need to give the SUPER privilege to those accounts that
       had the TRIGGER privilege in 5.1.

     * Triggers were added in MySQL 5.0, so if you downgrade from 5.0
       to 4.1, you cannot use triggers at all.

2.12.2.1. Downgrading to MySQL 5.0

   When downgrading to MySQL 5.0 from MySQL 5.1 or a later version,
   you should keep in mind the following issues relating to features
   found in MySQL 5.1 and later, but not in MySQL 5.0:

     * Partitioning.  MySQL 5.0 does not support user-defined
       partitioning. If a table was created as a partitioned table in
       5.1 (or if an table created in a previous version of MySQL was
       altered to include partitions after an upgrade to 5.1), the
       table is accessible after downgrade only if you do one of the
       following:

          + Export the table using mysqldump and then drop it in
            MySQL 5.1; import the table again following the downgrade
            to MySQL 5.0.

          + Prior to the downgrade, remove the table's partitioning
            using ALTER TABLE table_name REMOVE PARTITIONING.

     * Event Scheduler.  MySQL 5.0 does not support scheduled events.
       If your databases contain scheduled event definitions, you
       should prevent them from being dumped when you use mysqldump
       by using the --skip-events option. (See Section 4.5.4,
       "mysqldump --- A Database Backup Program.")

     * Stored routines.  MySQL 5.1.21 added a number of new columns
       to the mysql.proc table in which stored routine definitions
       are stored. If you are downgrading from MySQL 5.1.21 or later
       to MySQL 5.0, you cannot import the MySQL 5.1 routine
       definitions into MySQL 5.0.46 or earlier using the dump of
       mysql.proc created by mysqldump (such as when using the
       --all-databases option). Instead, you should run mysqldump
       --routines prior to performing the downgrade and run the
       stored routines DDL statements following the downgrade.
       See Bug#11986: http://bugs.mysql.com/11986,
       Bug#30029: http://bugs.mysql.com/30029, and
       Bug#30660: http://bugs.mysql.com/30660, for more information.

     * Triggers.  Trigger creation requires the TRIGGER privilege as
       of MySQL 5.1. In MySQL 5.0, there is no TRIGGER privilege and
       SUPER is required instead. If you downgrade from MySQL 5.1 to
       5.0, you will need to give the SUPER privilege to those
       accounts that had the TRIGGER privilege in 5.1.

2.12.3. Checking Whether Table Indexes Must Be Rebuilt

   A binary upgrade or downgrade is one that installs one version of
   MySQL "in place" over an existing version, without dumping and
   reloading tables:

    1. Stop the server for the existing version if it is running.

    2. Install a different version of MySQL. This is an upgrade if
       the new version is higher than the original version, a
       downgrade if the version is lower.

    3. Start the server for the new version.

   In many cases, the tables from the previous version of MySQL can
   be used without change by the new version. However, sometimes
   modifications are made to the handling of character sets or
   collations that change the character sort order, which causes the
   ordering of entries in any index that uses an affected character
   set or collation to be incorrect. Such changes result in several
   possible problems:

     * Comparison results that differ from previous results

     * Inability to find some index values due to misordered index
       entries

     * Misordered ORDER BY results

     * Tables that CHECK TABLE reports as being in need of repair

   The solution to these problems is to rebuild any indexes that use
   an affected character set or collation, either by dropping and
   re-creating the indexes, or by dumping and reloading the entire
   table. For information about rebuilding indexes, see Section
   2.12.4, "Rebuilding or Repairing Tables or Indexes."

   To check whether a table has indexes that must be rebuilt, consult
   the following list. It indicates which versions of MySQL
   introduced character set or collation changes that require indexes
   to be rebuilt. Each entry indicates the version in which the
   change occurred and the character sets or collations that the
   change affects. If the change is associated with a particular bug
   report, the bug number is given.

   The list applies both for binary upgrades and downgrades. For
   example, Bug#29461: http://bugs.mysql.com/29461 was fixed in MySQL
   5.0.48, so it applies to upgrades from versions older than 5.0.48
   to 5.0.48 or newer, and also to downgrades from 5.0.48 or newer to
   versions older than 5.0.48.

   If you have tables with indexes that are affected, rebuild the
   indexes using the instructions given in Section 2.12.4,
   "Rebuilding or Repairing Tables or Indexes."

   In many cases, you can use CHECK TABLE ... FOR UPGRADE to identify
   tables for which index rebuilding is required. (It will report:
   Table upgrade required. Please do "REPAIR TABLE `tbl_name`" or
   dump/reload to fix it!) In these cases, you can also use
   mysqlcheck --check-upgrade or mysql_upgrade, which execute CHECK
   TABLE. However, the use of CHECK TABLE applies only after
   upgrades, not downgrades. Also, CHECK TABLE is not applicable to
   all storage engines. For details about which storage engines CHECK
   TABLE supports, see Section 12.5.2.3, "CHECK TABLE Syntax."

   Changes that cause index rebuilding to be necessary:

     * MySQL 5.0.48 (Bug#29461: http://bugs.mysql.com/29461)
       Affects indexes for columns that use any of these character
       sets: eucjpms, euc_kr, gb2312, latin7, macce, ujis
       Affected tables can be detected by CHECK TABLE ... FOR UPGRADE
       as of MySQL 5.1.29, 6.0.8 (see
       Bug#39585: http://bugs.mysql.com/39585).

     * MySQL 5.0.48 (Bug#27562: http://bugs.mysql.com/27562)
       Affects indexes that use the ascii_general_ci collation for
       columns that contain any of these characters: '`' GRAVE
       ACCENT, '[' LEFT SQUARE BRACKET, '\' REVERSE SOLIDUS, ']'
       RIGHT SQUARE BRACKET, '~' TILDE
       Affected tables can be detected by CHECK TABLE ... FOR UPGRADE
       as of MySQL 5.1.29, 6.0.8 (see
       Bug#39585: http://bugs.mysql.com/39585).

     * MySQL 5.1.21 (Bug#29461: http://bugs.mysql.com/29461)
       Affects indexes for columns that use any of these character
       sets: eucjpms, euc_kr, gb2312, latin7, macce, ujis
       Affected tables can be detected by CHECK TABLE ... FOR UPGRADE
       as of MySQL 5.1.29, 6.0.8 (see
       Bug#39585: http://bugs.mysql.com/39585).

     * MySQL 5.1.23 (Bug#27562: http://bugs.mysql.com/27562)
       Affects indexes that use the ascii_general_ci collation for
       columns that contain any of these characters: '`' GRAVE
       ACCENT, '[' LEFT SQUARE BRACKET, '\' REVERSE SOLIDUS, ']'
       RIGHT SQUARE BRACKET, '~' TILDE
       Affected tables can be detected by CHECK TABLE ... FOR UPGRADE
       as of MySQL 5.1.29, 6.0.8 (see
       Bug#39585: http://bugs.mysql.com/39585).

     * MySQL 5.1.24 (Bug#27877: http://bugs.mysql.com/27877)
       Affects indexes that use the utf8_general_ci or
       ucs2_general_ci collation for columns that contain '' LATIN
       SMALL LETTER SHARP S (German).
       Affected tables can be detected by CHECK TABLE ... FOR UPGRADE
       as of MySQL 5.1.30, 6.0.8 (see
       Bug#40053: http://bugs.mysql.com/40053).

     * * MySQL 6.0.1 (WL#3664)
       Affects indexes that use the latin2_czech_cs collation.
       Affected tables can be detected by CHECK TABLE ... FOR UPGRADE
       as of MySQL 5.4.4, 6.0.9 (see
       Bug#40054: http://bugs.mysql.com/40054).
       MySQL 6.0.5 (Bug#33452: http://bugs.mysql.com/33452)
       Affects indexes that use the latin2_czech_cs collation.
       Affected tables can be detected by CHECK TABLE ... FOR UPGRADE
       as of MySQL 5.4.4, 6.0.9 (see
       Bug#40054: http://bugs.mysql.com/40054).

     * MySQL 6.0.5 (Bug#27877: http://bugs.mysql.com/27877)
       Affects indexes that use the utf8_general_ci or
       ucs2_general_ci collation for columns that contain '' LATIN
       SMALL LETTER SHARP S (German).
       Affected tables can be detected by CHECK TABLE ... FOR UPGRADE
       as of MySQL 6.0.8 (see
       Bug#40053: http://bugs.mysql.com/40053).

     * MySQL 6.0.6 (Bug#25420: http://bugs.mysql.com/25420)
       Affects indexes for columns that use the following collations,
       if the columns contain the indicated characters:
       big5_chinese_ci: '~' TILDE or '`' GRAVE ACCENT;
       cp866_general_ci: j LATIN SMALL LETTER J; gb2312_chinese_ci:
       '~' TILDE; gbk_chinese_ci: '~' TILDE
       Affected tables can be detected by CHECK TABLE ... FOR UPGRADE
       as of MySQL 5.4.4, 6.0.9 (see
       Bug#40054: http://bugs.mysql.com/40054).

2.12.4. Rebuilding or Repairing Tables or Indexes

   This section describes how to rebuild a table. This can be
   necessitated by changes to MySQL such as how data types are
   handled or changes to character set handling. For example, an
   error in a collation might have been corrected, necessitating a
   table rebuild to rebuild the indexes for character columns that
   use the collation. It might also be that a table repair or upgrade
   should be done as indicated by a table check operation such as
   that performed by CHECK TABLE, mysqlcheck, or mysql_upgrade.

   Methods for rebuilding a table include dumping and reloading it,
   or using ALTER TABLE or REPAIR TABLE.

Note

   If you are rebuilding tables because a different version of MySQL
   will not handle them after a binary upgrade or downgrade, you must
   use the dump-and-reload method. Dump the tables before upgrading
   or downgrading (using your original version of MySQL), and reload
   the tables after upgrading or downgrading (after installing the
   new version).

   If you use the dump-and-reload method of rebuilding tables only
   for the purpose of rebuilding indexes, you can perform the dump
   either before or after upgrading or downgrading. Reloading still
   must be done afterward.

   To re-create a table by dumping and reloading it, use mysqldump to
   create a dump file and mysql to reload the file:
shell> mysqldump db_name t1 > dump.sql
shell> mysql db_name < dump.sql

   To recreate all the tables in a single database, specify the
   database name without any following table name:
shell> mysqldump db_name > dump.sql
shell> mysql db_name < dump.sql

   To recreate all tables in all databases, use the --all-databases
   option:
shell> mysqldump --all-databases > dump.sql
shell> mysql < dump.sql

   To rebuild a table with ALTER TABLE, use a statement that
   "changes" the table to use the storage engine that it already has.
   For example, if t1 is a MyISAM table, use this statement:
mysql> ALTER TABLE t1 ENGINE = MyISAM;

   If you are not sure which storage engine to specify in the ALTER
   TABLE statement, use SHOW CREATE TABLE to display the table
   definition.

   If you must rebuild a table because a table checking operation
   indicates that the table is corrupt or needs an upgrade, you can
   use REPAIR TABLE if that statement supports the table's storage
   engine. For example, to repair a MyISAM table, use this statement:
mysql> REPAIR TABLE t1;

   For storage engines such as InnoDB that REPAIR TABLE does not
   support, use mysqldump to create a dump file and mysql to reload
   the file, as described earlier.

   For specifics about which storage engines REPAIR TABLE supports,
   see Section 12.5.2.6, "REPAIR TABLE Syntax."

2.12.5. Copying MySQL Databases to Another Machine

   You can copy the .frm, .MYI, and .MYD files for MyISAM tables
   between different architectures that support the same
   floating-point format. (MySQL takes care of any byte-swapping
   issues.) See Section 13.5, "The MyISAM Storage Engine."

   In cases where you need to transfer databases between different
   architectures, you can use mysqldump to create a file containing
   SQL statements. You can then transfer the file to the other
   machine and feed it as input to the mysql client.

   Use mysqldump --help to see what options are available.

   The easiest (although not the fastest) way to move a database
   between two machines is to run the following commands on the
   machine on which the database is located:
shell> mysqladmin -h 'other_hostname' create db_name
shell> mysqldump db_name | mysql -h 'other_hostname' db_name

   If you want to copy a database from a remote machine over a slow
   network, you can use these commands:
shell> mysqladmin create db_name
shell> mysqldump -h 'other_hostname' --compress db_name | mysql db_na
me

   You can also store the dump in a file, transfer the file to the
   target machine, and then load the file into the database there.
   For example, you can dump a database to a compressed file on the
   source machine like this:
shell> mysqldump --quick db_name | gzip > db_name.gz

   Transfer the file containing the database contents to the target
   machine and run these commands there:
shell> mysqladmin create db_name
shell> gunzip < db_name.gz | mysql db_name

   You can also use mysqldump and mysqlimport to transfer the
   database. For large tables, this is much faster than simply using
   mysqldump. In the following commands, DUMPDIR represents the full
   path name of the directory you use to store the output from
   mysqldump.

   First, create the directory for the output files and dump the
   database:
shell> mkdir DUMPDIR
shell> mysqldump --tab=DUMPDIR db_name

   Then transfer the files in the DUMPDIR directory to some
   corresponding directory on the target machine and load the files
   into MySQL there:
shell> mysqladmin create db_name           # create database
shell> cat DUMPDIR/*.sql | mysql db_name   # create tables in databas
e
shell> mysqlimport db_name DUMPDIR/*.txt   # load data into tables

   Do not forget to copy the mysql database because that is where the
   grant tables are stored. You might have to run commands as the
   MySQL root user on the new machine until you have the mysql
   database in place.

   After you import the mysql database on the new machine, execute
   mysqladmin flush-privileges so that the server reloads the grant
   table information.

2.13. Operating System-Specific Notes

2.13.1. Linux Notes

   This section discusses issues that have been found to occur on
   Linux. The first few subsections describe general operating
   system-related issues, problems that can occur when using binary
   or source distributions, and post-installation issues. The
   remaining subsections discuss problems that occur with Linux on
   specific platforms.

   Note that most of these problems occur on older versions of Linux.
   If you are running a recent version, you may see none of them.

2.13.1.1. Linux Operating System Notes

   MySQL needs at least Linux version 2.0.

Warning

   We have seen some strange problems with Linux 2.2.14 and MySQL on
   SMP systems. We also have reports from some MySQL users that they
   have encountered serious stability problems using MySQL with
   kernel 2.2.14. If you are using this kernel, you should upgrade to
   2.2.19 (or newer) or to a 2.4 kernel. If you have a multiple-CPU
   box, you should seriously consider using 2.4 because it gives you
   a significant speed boost. Your system should be more stable.

   When using LinuxThreads, you should see a minimum of three mysqld
   processes running. These are in fact threads. There is one thread
   for the LinuxThreads manager, one thread to handle connections,
   and one thread to handle alarms and signals.

2.13.1.2. Linux Binary Distribution Notes

   The Linux-Intel binary and RPM releases of MySQL are configured
   for the highest possible speed. We are always trying to use the
   fastest stable compiler available.

   The binary release is linked with -static, which means you do not
   normally need to worry about which version of the system libraries
   you have. You need not install LinuxThreads, either. A program
   linked with -static is slightly larger than a dynamically linked
   program, but also slightly faster (3-5%). However, one problem
   with a statically linked program is that you can't use
   user-defined functions (UDFs). If you are going to write or use
   UDFs (this is something for C or C++ programmers only), you must
   compile MySQL yourself using dynamic linking.

   A known issue with binary distributions is that on older Linux
   systems that use libc (such as Red Hat 4.x or Slackware), you get
   some (nonfatal) issues with host name resolution. If your system
   uses libc rather than glibc2, you probably will encounter some
   difficulties with host name resolution and getpwnam(). This
   happens because glibc (unfortunately) depends on some external
   libraries to implement host name resolution and getpwent(), even
   when compiled with -static. These problems manifest themselves in
   two ways:

     * You may see the following error message when you run
       mysql_install_db:
Sorry, the host 'xxxx' could not be looked up
       You can deal with this by executing mysql_install_db --force,
       which does not execute the resolveip test in mysql_install_db.
       The downside is that you cannot use host names in the grant
       tables: except for localhost, you must use IP numbers instead.
       If you are using an old version of MySQL that does not support
       --force, you must manually remove the resolveip test in
       mysql_install_db using a text editor.

     * You also may see the following error when you try to run
       mysqld with the --user option:
getpwnam: No such file or directory
       To work around this problem, start mysqld by using the su
       command rather than by specifying the --user option. This
       causes the system itself to change the user ID of the mysqld
       process so that mysqld need not do so.

   Another solution, which solves both problems, is not to use a
   binary distribution. Obtain a MySQL source distribution (in RPM or
   tar.gz format) and install that instead.

   On some Linux 2.2 versions, you may get the error Resource
   temporarily unavailable when clients make a great many new
   connections to a mysqld server over TCP/IP. The problem is that
   Linux has a delay between the time that you close a TCP/IP socket
   and the time that the system actually frees it. There is room for
   only a finite number of TCP/IP slots, so you encounter the
   resource-unavailable error if clients attempt too many new TCP/IP
   connections over a short period of time. For example, you may see
   the error when you run the MySQL test-connect benchmark over
   TCP/IP.

   We have inquired about this problem a few times on different Linux
   mailing lists but have never been able to find a suitable
   resolution. The only known "fix" is for clients to use persistent
   connections, or, if you are running the database server and
   clients on the same machine, to use Unix socket file connections
   rather than TCP/IP connections.

2.13.1.3. Linux Source Distribution Notes

   The following notes regarding glibc apply only to the situation
   when you build MySQL yourself. If you are running Linux on an x86
   machine, in most cases it is much better for you to use our
   binary. We link our binaries against the best patched version of
   glibc we can find and with the best compiler options, in an
   attempt to make it suitable for a high-load server. For a typical
   user, even for setups with a lot of concurrent connections or
   tables exceeding the 2GB limit, our binary is the best choice in
   most cases. After reading the following text, if you are in doubt
   about what to do, try our binary first to determine whether it
   meets your needs. If you discover that it is not good enough, you
   may want to try your own build. In that case, we would appreciate
   a note about it so that we can build a better binary next time.

   MySQL uses LinuxThreads on Linux. If you are using an old Linux
   version that doesn't have glibc2, you must install LinuxThreads
   before trying to compile MySQL. You can obtain LinuxThreads from
   http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/os-linux.html.

   Note that glibc versions before and including version 2.1.1 have a
   fatal bug in pthread_mutex_timedwait() handling, which is used
   when INSERT DELAYED statements are issued. Do not use INSERT
   DELAYED before upgrading glibc.

   Note that Linux kernel and the LinuxThread library can by default
   handle a maximum of 1,024 threads. If you plan to have more than
   1,000 concurrent connections, you need to make some changes to
   LinuxThreads, as follows:

     * Increase PTHREAD_THREADS_MAX in
       sysdeps/unix/sysv/linux/bits/local_lim.h to 4096 and decrease
       STACK_SIZE in linuxthreads/internals.h to 256KB. The paths are
       relative to the root of glibc. (Note that MySQL is not stable
       with 600-1000 connections if STACK_SIZE is the default of
       2MB.)

     * Recompile LinuxThreads to produce a new libpthread.a library,
       and relink MySQL against it.

   There is another issue that greatly hurts MySQL performance,
   especially on SMP systems. The mutex implementation in
   LinuxThreads in glibc 2.1 is very poor for programs with many
   threads that hold the mutex only for a short time. This produces a
   paradoxical result: If you link MySQL against an unmodified
   LinuxThreads, removing processors from an SMP actually improves
   MySQL performance in many cases. We have made a patch available
   for glibc 2.1.3 to correct this behavior
   (http://dev.mysql.com/Downloads/Linux/linuxthreads-2.1-patch).

   With glibc 2.2.2, MySQL uses the adaptive mutex, which is much
   better than even the patched one in glibc 2.1.3. Be warned,
   however, that under some conditions, the current mutex code in
   glibc 2.2.2 overspins, which hurts MySQL performance. The
   likelihood that this condition occurs can be reduced by re-nicing
   the mysqld process to the highest priority. We have also been able
   to correct the overspin behavior with a patch, available at
   http://dev.mysql.com/Downloads/Linux/linuxthreads-2.2.2.patch. It
   combines the correction of overspin, maximum number of threads,
   and stack spacing all in one. You need to apply it in the
   linuxthreads directory with patch -p0
   </tmp/linuxthreads-2.2.2.patch. We hope it is included in some
   form in future releases of glibc 2.2. In any case, if you link
   against glibc 2.2.2, you still need to correct STACK_SIZE and
   PTHREAD_THREADS_MAX. We hope that the defaults is corrected to
   some more acceptable values for high-load MySQL setup in the
   future, so that the commands needed to produce your own build can
   be reduced to ./configure; make; make install.

   If you use these patches to build a special static version of
   libpthread.a, use it only for statically linking against MySQL. We
   know that these patches are safe for MySQL and significantly
   improve its performance, but we cannot say anything about their
   effects on other applications. If you link other applications that
   require LinuxThreads against the patched static version of the
   library, or build a patched shared version and install it on your
   system, you do so at your own risk.

   If you experience any strange problems during the installation of
   MySQL, or with some common utilities hanging, it is very likely
   that they are either library or compiler related. If this is the
   case, using our binary resolves them.

   If you link your own MySQL client programs, you may see the
   following error at runtime:
ld.so.1: fatal: libmysqlclient.so.#:
open failed: No such file or directory

   This problem can be avoided by one of the following methods:

     * Link clients with the -Wl,r/full/path/to/libmysqlclient.so
       flag rather than with -Lpath).

     * Copy libmysqclient.so to /usr/lib.

     * Add the path name of the directory where libmysqlclient.so is
       located to the LD_RUN_PATH environment variable before running
       your client.

   If you are using the Fujitsu compiler (fcc/FCC), you may have some
   problems compiling MySQL because the Linux header files are very
   gcc oriented. The following configure line should work with
   fcc/FCC:
CC=fcc CFLAGS="-O -K fast -K lib -K omitfp -Kpreex -D_GNU_SOURCE \
    -DCONST=const -DNO_STRTOLL_PROTO" \
CXX=FCC CXXFLAGS="-O -K fast -K lib \
    -K omitfp -K preex --no_exceptions --no_rtti -D_GNU_SOURCE \
    -DCONST=const -Dalloca=__builtin_alloca -DNO_STRTOLL_PROTO \
    '-D_EXTERN_INLINE=static __inline'" \
./configure \
    --prefix=/usr/local/mysql --enable-assembler \
    --with-mysqld-ldflags=-all-static --disable-shared \
    --with-low-memory

2.13.1.4. Linux Post-Installation Notes

   mysql.server can be found in the support-files directory under the
   MySQL installation directory or in a MySQL source tree. You can
   install it as /etc/init.d/mysql for automatic MySQL startup and
   shutdown. See Section 2.11.2.2, "Starting and Stopping MySQL
   Automatically."

   If MySQL cannot open enough files or connections, it may be that
   you have not configured Linux to handle enough files.

   In Linux 2.2 and onward, you can check the number of allocated
   file handles as follows:
shell> cat /proc/sys/fs/file-max
shell> cat /proc/sys/fs/dquot-max
shell> cat /proc/sys/fs/super-max

   If you have more than 16MB of memory, you should add something
   like the following to your init scripts (for example,
   /etc/init.d/boot.local on SuSE Linux):
echo 65536 > /proc/sys/fs/file-max
echo 8192 > /proc/sys/fs/dquot-max
echo 1024 > /proc/sys/fs/super-max

   You can also run the echo commands from the command line as root,
   but these settings are lost the next time your computer restarts.

   Alternatively, you can set these parameters on startup by using
   the sysctl tool, which is used by many Linux distributions
   (including SuSE Linux 8.0 and later). Put the following values
   into a file named /etc/sysctl.conf:
# Increase some values for MySQL
fs.file-max = 65536
fs.dquot-max = 8192
fs.super-max = 1024

   You should also add the following to /etc/my.cnf:
[mysqld_safe]
open-files-limit=8192

   This should allow the server a limit of 8,192 for the combined
   number of connections and open files.

   The STACK_SIZE constant in LinuxThreads controls the spacing of
   thread stacks in the address space. It needs to be large enough so
   that there is plenty of room for each individual thread stack, but
   small enough to keep the stack of some threads from running into
   the global mysqld data. Unfortunately, as we have experimentally
   discovered, the Linux implementation of mmap() successfully unmaps
   a mapped region if you ask it to map out an address currently in
   use, zeroing out the data on the entire page instead of returning
   an error. So, the safety of mysqld or any other threaded
   application depends on the "gentlemanly" behavior of the code that
   creates threads. The user must take measures to make sure that the
   number of running threads at any given time is sufficiently low
   for thread stacks to stay away from the global heap. With mysqld,
   you should enforce this behavior by setting a reasonable value for
   the max_connections variable.

   If you build MySQL yourself, you can patch LinuxThreads for better
   stack use. See Section 2.13.1.3, "Linux Source Distribution
   Notes." If you do not want to patch LinuxThreads, you should set
   max_connections to a value no higher than 500. It should be even
   less if you have a large key buffer, large heap tables, or some
   other things that make mysqld allocate a lot of memory, or if you
   are running a 2.2 kernel with a 2GB patch. If you are using our
   binary or RPM version, you can safely set max_connections at 1500,
   assuming no large key buffer or heap tables with lots of data. The
   more you reduce STACK_SIZE in LinuxThreads the more threads you
   can safely create. Values between 128KB and 256KB are recommended.

   If you use a lot of concurrent connections, you may suffer from a
   "feature" in the 2.2 kernel that attempts to prevent fork bomb
   attacks by penalizing a process for forking or cloning a child.
   This causes MySQL not to scale well as you increase the number of
   concurrent clients. On single-CPU systems, we have seen this
   manifest as very slow thread creation; it may take a long time to
   connect to MySQL (as long as one minute), and it may take just as
   long to shut it down. On multiple-CPU systems, we have observed a
   gradual drop in query speed as the number of clients increases. In
   the process of trying to find a solution, we have received a
   kernel patch from one of our users who claimed it helped for his
   site. This patch is available at
   http://dev.mysql.com/Downloads/Patches/linux-fork.patch. We have
   done rather extensive testing of this patch on both development
   and production systems. It has significantly improved MySQL
   performance without causing any problems and is recommended for
   users who still run high-load servers on 2.2 kernels.

   This issue has been fixed in the 2.4 kernel, so if you are not
   satisfied with the current performance of your system, rather than
   patching your 2.2 kernel, it might be easier to upgrade to 2.4. On
   SMP systems, upgrading also gives you a nice SMP boost in addition
   to fixing the fairness bug.

   We have tested MySQL on the 2.4 kernel on a two-CPU machine and
   found MySQL scales much better. There was virtually no slowdown on
   query throughput all the way up to 1,000 clients, and the MySQL
   scaling factor (computed as the ratio of maximum throughput to the
   throughput for one client) was 180%. We have observed similar
   results on a four-CPU system: Virtually no slowdown as the number
   of clients was increased up to 1,000, and a 300% scaling factor.
   Based on these results, for a high-load SMP server using a 2.2
   kernel, it is definitely recommended to upgrade to the 2.4 kernel
   at this point.

   We have discovered that it is essential to run the mysqld process
   with the highest possible priority on the 2.4 kernel to achieve
   maximum performance. This can be done by adding a renice -20 $$
   command to mysqld_safe. In our testing on a four-CPU machine,
   increasing the priority resulted in a 60% throughput increase with
   400 clients.

   We are currently also trying to collect more information on how
   well MySQL performs with a 2.4 kernel on four-way and eight-way
   systems. If you have access such a system and have done some
   benchmarks, please send an email message to benchmarks@mysql.com
   with the results. We will review them for inclusion in the manual.

   If you see a dead mysqld server process with ps, this usually
   means that you have found a bug in MySQL or you have a corrupted
   table. See Section B.1.4.2, "What to Do If MySQL Keeps Crashing."

   To get a core dump on Linux if mysqld dies with a SIGSEGV signal,
   you can start mysqld with the --core-file option. Note that you
   also probably need to raise the core file size by adding ulimit -c
   1000000 to mysqld_safe or starting mysqld_safe with
   --core-file-size=1000000. See Section 4.3.2, "mysqld_safe ---
   MySQL Server Startup Script."

2.13.1.5. Linux x86 Notes

   MySQL requires libc 5.4.12 or newer. It is known to work with libc
   5.4.46. glibc 2.0.6 and later should also work. There have been
   some problems with the glibc RPMs from Red Hat, so if you have
   problems, check whether there are any updates. The glibc 2.0.7-19
   and 2.0.7-29 RPMs are known to work.

   If you are using Red Hat 8.0 or a new glibc 2.2.x library, you may
   see mysqld die in gethostbyaddr(). This happens because the new
   glibc library requires a stack size greater than 128KB for this
   call. To fix the problem, start mysqld with the
   --thread-stack=192K option. (Use -O thread_stack=192K before MySQL
   4.) This stack size is the default on MySQL 4.0.10 and above, so
   you should not see the problem.

   If you are using gcc 3.0 and above to compile MySQL, you must
   install the libstdc++v3 library before compiling MySQL; if you
   don't do this, you get an error about a missing __cxa_pure_virtual
   symbol during linking.

   On some older Linux distributions, configure may produce an error
   like this:
Syntax error in sched.h. Change _P to __P in the
/usr/include/sched.h file.
See the Installation chapter in the Reference Manual.

   Just do what the error message says. Add an extra underscore to
   the _P macro name that has only one underscore, and then try
   again.

   You may get some warnings when compiling. Those shown here can be
   ignored:
mysqld.cc -o objs-thread/mysqld.o
mysqld.cc: In function `void init_signals()':
mysqld.cc:315: warning: assignment of negative value `-1' to
`long unsigned int'
mysqld.cc: In function `void * signal_hand(void *)':
mysqld.cc:346: warning: assignment of negative value `-1' to
`long unsigned int'

   If mysqld always dumps core when it starts, the problem may be
   that you have an old /lib/libc.a. Try renaming it, and then remove
   sql/mysqld and do a new make install and try again. This problem
   has been reported on some Slackware installations.

   If you get the following error when linking mysqld, it means that
   your libg++.a is not installed correctly:
/usr/lib/libc.a(putc.o): In function `_IO_putc':
putc.o(.text+0x0): multiple definition of `_IO_putc'

   You can avoid using libg++.a by running configure like this:
shell> CXX=gcc ./configure

2.13.1.6. Linux SPARC Notes

   In some implementations, readdir_r() is broken. The symptom is
   that the SHOW DATABASES statement always returns an empty set.
   This can be fixed by removing HAVE_READDIR_R from config.h after
   configuring and before compiling.

2.13.1.7. Linux Alpha Notes

   We have tested MySQL 5.1 on Alpha with our benchmarks and test
   suite, and it appears to work well.

   We currently build the MySQL binary packages on SuSE Linux 7.0 for
   AXP, kernel 2.4.4-SMP, Compaq C compiler (V6.2-505) and Compaq C++
   compiler (V6.3-006) on a Compaq DS20 machine with an Alpha EV6
   processor.

   You can find the preceding compilers at
   http://www.support.compaq.com/alpha-tools/. By using these
   compilers rather than gcc, we get about 9-14% better MySQL
   performance.

   For MySQL on Alpha, we use the -arch generic flag to our compile
   options, which ensures that the binary runs on all Alpha
   processors. We also compile statically to avoid library problems.
   The configure command looks like this:
CC=ccc CFLAGS="-fast -arch generic" CXX=cxx \
CXXFLAGS="-fast -arch generic -noexceptions -nortti" \
./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql --disable-shared \
    --with-extra-charsets=complex --enable-thread-safe-client \
    --with-mysqld-ldflags=-non_shared --with-client-ldflags=-non_shar
ed

   Some known problems when running MySQL on Linux-Alpha:

     * Debugging threaded applications like MySQL does not work with
       gdb 4.18. You should use gdb 5.1 instead.

     * If you try linking mysqld statically when using gcc, the
       resulting image dumps core at startup time. In other words, do
       not use --with-mysqld-ldflags=-all-static with gcc.

2.13.1.8. Linux PowerPC Notes

   MySQL should work on MkLinux with the newest glibc package (tested
   with glibc 2.0.7).

2.13.1.9. Linux MIPS Notes

   To get MySQL to work on Qube2 (Linux Mips), you need the newest
   glibc libraries. glibc-2.0.7-29C2 is known to work. You must also
   use gcc 2.95.2 or newer).

2.13.1.10. Linux IA-64 Notes

   To get MySQL to compile on Linux IA-64, we use the following
   configure command for building with gcc 2.96:
CC=gcc \
CFLAGS="-O3 -fno-omit-frame-pointer" \
CXX=gcc \
CXXFLAGS="-O3 -fno-omit-frame-pointer -felide-constructors \
    -fno-exceptions -fno-rtti" \
    ./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql \
    "--with-comment=Official MySQL binary" \
    --with-extra-charsets=complex

   On IA-64, the MySQL client binaries use shared libraries. This
   means that if you install our binary distribution at a location
   other than /usr/local/mysql, you need to add the path of the
   directory where you have libmysqlclient.so installed either to the
   /etc/ld.so.conf file or to the value of your LD_LIBRARY_PATH
   environment variable.

   See Section B.1.3.1, "Problems Linking to the MySQL Client
   Library."

2.13.1.11. SELinux Notes

   RHEL4 comes with SELinux, which supports tighter access control
   for processes. If SELinux is enabled (SELINUX in
   /etc/selinux/config is set to enforcing, SELINUXTYPE is set to
   either targeted or strict), you might encounter problems
   installing Sun Microsystems, Inc. RPM packages.

   Red Hat has an update that solves this. It involves an update of
   the "security policy" specification to handle the install
   structure of the RPMs provided by Sun Microsystems, Inc. For
   further information, see
   https://bugzilla.redhat.com/bugzilla/show_bug.cgi?id=167551 and
   http://rhn.redhat.com/errata/RHBA-2006-0049.html.

   The preceding discussion applies only to RHEL4. The patch is
   unnecessary for RHEL5.

2.13.2. Mac OS X Notes

   On Mac OS X, tar cannot handle long file names. If you need to
   unpack a .tar.gz distribution, use gnutar instead.

2.13.2.1. Mac OS X 10.x (Darwin)

   MySQL should work without major problems on Mac OS X 10.x
   (Darwin).

   Known issues:

     * If you have problems with performance under heavy load, try
       using the --skip-thread-priority option to mysqld. This runs
       all threads with the same priority. On Mac OS X, this gives
       better performance, at least until Apple fixes its thread
       scheduler.

     * The connection times (wait_timeout, interactive_timeout and
       net_read_timeout) values are not honored.
       This is probably a signal handling problem in the thread
       library where the signal doesn't break a pending read and we
       hope that a future update to the thread libraries will fix
       this.

   Our binary for Mac OS X is compiled on Darwin 6.3 with the
   following configure line:
CC=gcc CFLAGS="-O3 -fno-omit-frame-pointer" CXX=gcc \
CXXFLAGS="-O3 -fno-omit-frame-pointer -felide-constructors \
    -fno-exceptions -fno-rtti" \
    ./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql \
    --with-extra-charsets=complex --enable-thread-safe-client \
    --enable-local-infile --disable-shared

   See Section 2.5, "Installing MySQL on Mac OS X."

2.13.2.2. Mac OS X Server 1.2 (Rhapsody)

   For current versions of Mac OS X Server, no operating system
   changes are necessary before compiling MySQL. Compiling for the
   Server platform is the same as for the client version of Mac OS X.

   For older versions (Mac OS X Server 1.2, a.k.a. Rhapsody), you
   must first install a pthread package before trying to configure
   MySQL.

   See Section 2.5, "Installing MySQL on Mac OS X."

2.13.3. Solaris Notes

   For information about installing MySQL on Solaris using PKG
   distributions, see Section 2.6, "Installing MySQL on Solaris."

   On Solaris, you may run into trouble even before you get the MySQL
   distribution unpacked, as the Solaris tar cannot handle long file
   names. This means that you may see errors when you try to unpack
   MySQL.

   If this occurs, you must use GNU tar (gtar) to unpack the
   distribution.

   Sun native threads work only on Solaris 2.5 and higher. For
   Solaris 2.4 and earlier, MySQL automatically uses MIT-pthreads.
   See Section 2.10.5, "MIT-pthreads Notes."

   If you get the following error from configure, it means that you
   have something wrong with your compiler installation:
checking for restartable system calls... configure: error can not
run test programs while cross compiling

   In this case, you should upgrade your compiler to a newer version.
   You may also be able to solve this problem by inserting the
   following row into the config.cache file:
ac_cv_sys_restartable_syscalls=${ac_cv_sys_restartable_syscalls='no'}

   If you are using Solaris on a SPARC, the recommended compiler is
   gcc 2.95.2 or 3.2. You can find this at http://gcc.gnu.org/. Note
   that gcc 2.8.1 does not work reliably on SPARC.

   The recommended configure line when using gcc 2.95.2 is:
CC=gcc CFLAGS="-O3" \
CXX=gcc CXXFLAGS="-O3 -felide-constructors -fno-exceptions -fno-rtti"
 \
./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql --with-low-memory \
    --enable-assembler

   If you have an UltraSPARC system, you can get 4% better
   performance by adding -mcpu=v8 -Wa,-xarch=v8plusa to the CFLAGS
   and CXXFLAGS environment variables.

   If you have Sun's Forte 5.0 (or newer) compiler, you can run
   configure like this:
CC=cc CFLAGS="-Xa -fast -native -xstrconst -mt" \
CXX=CC CXXFLAGS="-noex -mt" \
./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql --enable-assembler

   To create a 64-bit binary with Sun's Forte compiler, use the
   following configuration options:
CC=cc CFLAGS="-Xa -fast -native -xstrconst -mt -xarch=v9" \
CXX=CC CXXFLAGS="-noex -mt -xarch=v9" ASFLAGS="-xarch=v9" \
./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql --enable-assembler

   To create a 64-bit Solaris binary using gcc, add -m64 to CFLAGS
   and CXXFLAGS and remove --enable-assembler from the configure
   line.

   In the MySQL benchmarks, we obtained a 4% speed increase on
   UltraSPARC when using Forte 5.0 in 32-bit mode, as compared to
   using gcc 3.2 with the -mcpu flag.

   If you create a 64-bit mysqld binary, it is 4% slower than the
   32-bit binary, but can handle more threads and memory.

   When using Solaris 10 for x86_64, you should mount any file
   systems on which you intend to store InnoDB files with the
   forcedirectio option. (By default mounting is done without this
   option.) Failing to do so will cause a significant drop in
   performance when using the InnoDB storage engine on this platform.

   If you get a problem with fdatasync or sched_yield, you can fix
   this by adding LIBS=-lrt to the configure line

   For compilers older than WorkShop 5.3, you might have to edit the
   configure script. Change this line:
#if !defined(__STDC__) || __STDC__ != 1

   To this:
#if !defined(__STDC__)

   If you turn on __STDC__ with the -Xc option, the Sun compiler
   can't compile with the Solaris pthread.h header file. This is a
   Sun bug (broken compiler or broken include file).

   If mysqld issues the following error message when you run it, you
   have tried to compile MySQL with the Sun compiler without enabling
   the -mt multi-thread option:
libc internal error: _rmutex_unlock: rmutex not held

   Add -mt to CFLAGS and CXXFLAGS and recompile.

   If you are using the SFW version of gcc (which comes with Solaris
   8), you must add /opt/sfw/lib to the environment variable
   LD_LIBRARY_PATH before running configure.

   If you are using the gcc available from sunfreeware.com, you may
   have many problems. To avoid this, you should recompile gcc and
   GNU binutils on the machine where you are running them.

   If you get the following error when compiling MySQL with gcc, it
   means that your gcc is not configured for your version of Solaris:
shell> gcc -O3 -g -O2 -DDBUG_OFF  -o thr_alarm ...
./thr_alarm.c: In function `signal_hand':
./thr_alarm.c:556: too many arguments to function `sigwait'

   The proper thing to do in this case is to get the newest version
   of gcc and compile it with your current gcc compiler. At least for
   Solaris 2.5, almost all binary versions of gcc have old, unusable
   include files that break all programs that use threads, and
   possibly other programs as well.

   Solaris does not provide static versions of all system libraries
   (libpthreads and libdl), so you cannot compile MySQL with
   --static. If you try to do so, you get one of the following
   errors:
ld: fatal: library -ldl: not found
undefined reference to `dlopen'
cannot find -lrt

   If you link your own MySQL client programs, you may see the
   following error at runtime:
ld.so.1: fatal: libmysqlclient.so.#:
open failed: No such file or directory

   This problem can be avoided by one of the following methods:

     * Link clients with the -Wl,r/full/path/to/libmysqlclient.so
       flag rather than with -Lpath).

     * Copy libmysqclient.so to /usr/lib.

     * Add the path name of the directory where libmysqlclient.so is
       located to the LD_RUN_PATH environment variable before running
       your client.

   If you have problems with configure trying to link with -lz when
   you don't have zlib installed, you have two options:

     * If you want to be able to use the compressed communication
       protocol, you need to get and install zlib from ftp.gnu.org.

     * Run configure with the --with-named-z-libs=no option when
       building MySQL.

   If you are using gcc and have problems with loading user-defined
   functions (UDFs) into MySQL, try adding -lgcc to the link line for
   the UDF.

   If you would like MySQL to start automatically, you can copy
   support-files/mysql.server to /etc/init.d and create a symbolic
   link to it named /etc/rc3.d/S99mysql.server.

   If too many processes try to connect very rapidly to mysqld, you
   should see this error in the MySQL log:
Error in accept: Protocol error

   You might try starting the server with the --back_log=50 option as
   a workaround for this. (Use -O back_log=50 before MySQL 4.)

   Solaris doesn't support core files for setuid() applications, so
   you can't get a core file from mysqld if you are using the --user
   option.

2.13.3.1. Solaris 2.7/2.8 Notes

   Normally, you can use a Solaris 2.6 binary on Solaris 2.7 and 2.8.
   Most of the Solaris 2.6 issues also apply for Solaris 2.7 and 2.8.

   MySQL should be able to detect new versions of Solaris
   automatically and enable workarounds for the following problems.

   Solaris 2.7 / 2.8 has some bugs in the include files. You may see
   the following error when you use gcc:
/usr/include/widec.h:42: warning: `getwc' redefined
/usr/include/wchar.h:326: warning: this is the location of the previo
us
definition

   If this occurs, you can fix the problem by copying
   /usr/include/widec.h to .../lib/gcc-lib/os/gcc-version/include and
   changing line 41 from this:
#if     !defined(lint) && !defined(__lint)

   To this:
#if     !defined(lint) && !defined(__lint) && !defined(getwc)

   Alternatively, you can edit /usr/include/widec.h directly. Either
   way, after you make the fix, you should remove config.cache and
   run configure again.

   If you get the following errors when you run make, it is because
   configure didn't detect the curses.h file (probably because of the
   error in /usr/include/widec.h):
In file included from mysql.cc:50:
/usr/include/term.h:1060: syntax error before `,'
/usr/include/term.h:1081: syntax error before `;'

   The solution to this problem is to do one of the following:

    1. Configure with CFLAGS=-DHAVE_CURSES_H CXXFLAGS=-DHAVE_CURSES_H
       ./configure.

    2. Edit /usr/include/widec.h as indicated in the preceding
       discussion and re-run configure.

    3. Remove the #define HAVE_TERM line from the config.h file and
       run make again.

   If your linker cannot find -lz when linking client programs, the
   problem is probably that your libz.so file is installed in
   /usr/local/lib. You can fix this problem by one of the following
   methods:

     * Add /usr/local/lib to LD_LIBRARY_PATH.

     * Add a link to libz.so from /lib.

     * If you are using Solaris 8, you can install the optional zlib
       from your Solaris 8 CD distribution.

     * Run configure with the --with-named-z-libs=no option when
       building MySQL.

2.13.3.2. Solaris x86 Notes

   On Solaris 8 on x86, mysqld dumps core if you remove the debug
   symbols using strip.

   If you are using gcc on Solaris x86 and you experience problems
   with core dumps under load, you should use the following configure
   command:
CC=gcc CFLAGS="-O3 -fomit-frame-pointer -DHAVE_CURSES_H" \
CXX=gcc \
CXXFLAGS="-O3 -fomit-frame-pointer -felide-constructors \
    -fno-exceptions -fno-rtti -DHAVE_CURSES_H" \
./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql

   This avoids problems with the libstdc++ library and with C++
   exceptions.

   If this doesn't help, you should compile a debug version and run
   it with a trace file or under gdb. See MySQL Internals: Porting
   (http://forge.mysql.com/wiki/MySQL_Internals_Porting).

2.13.4. BSD Notes

   This section provides information about using MySQL on variants of
   BSD Unix.

2.13.4.1. FreeBSD Notes

   FreeBSD 4.x or newer is recommended for running MySQL, because the
   thread package is much more integrated. To get a secure and stable
   system, you should use only FreeBSD kernels that are marked
   -RELEASE.

   The easiest (and preferred) way to install MySQL is to use the
   mysql-server and mysql-client ports available at
   http://www.freebsd.org/. Using these ports gives you the following
   benefits:

     * A working MySQL with all optimizations enabled that are known
       to work on your version of FreeBSD.

     * Automatic configuration and build.

     * Startup scripts installed in /usr/local/etc/rc.d.

     * The ability to use pkg_info -L to see which files are
       installed.

     * The ability to use pkg_delete to remove MySQL if you no longer
       want it on your machine.

   It is recommended you use MIT-pthreads on FreeBSD 2.x, and native
   threads on FreeBSD 3 and up. It is possible to run with native
   threads on some late 2.2.x versions, but you may encounter
   problems shutting down mysqld.

   Unfortunately, certain function calls on FreeBSD are not yet fully
   thread-safe. Most notably, this includes the gethostbyname()
   function, which is used by MySQL to convert host names into IP
   addresses. Under certain circumstances, the mysqld process
   suddenly causes 100% CPU load and is unresponsive. If you
   encounter this problem, try to start MySQL using the
   --skip-name-resolve option.

   Alternatively, you can link MySQL on FreeBSD 4.x against the
   LinuxThreads library, which avoids a few of the problems that the
   native FreeBSD thread implementation has. For a very good
   comparison of LinuxThreads versus native threads, see Jeremy
   Zawodny's article FreeBSD or Linux for your MySQL Server? at
   http://jeremy.zawodny.com/blog/archives/000697.html.

   Known problem when using LinuxThreads on FreeBSD is:

     * The connection times (wait_timeout, interactive_timeout and
       net_read_timeout) values are not honored. The symptom is that
       persistent connections can hang for a very long time without
       getting closed down and that a 'kill' for a thread will not
       take affect until the thread does it a new command
       This is probably a signal handling problem in the thread
       library where the signal doesn't break a pending read. This is
       supposed to be fixed in FreeBSD 5.0

   The MySQL build process requires GNU make (gmake) to work. If GNU
   make is not available, you must install it first before compiling
   MySQL.

   The recommended way to compile and install MySQL on FreeBSD with
   gcc (2.95.2 and up) is:
CC=gcc CFLAGS="-O2 -fno-strength-reduce" \
    CXX=gcc CXXFLAGS="-O2 -fno-rtti -fno-exceptions \
    -felide-constructors -fno-strength-reduce" \
    ./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql --enable-assembler
gmake
gmake install
cd /usr/local/mysql
bin/mysql_install_db --user=mysql
bin/mysqld_safe &

   If you notice that configure uses MIT-pthreads, you should read
   the MIT-pthreads notes. See Section 2.10.5, "MIT-pthreads Notes."

   If you get an error from make install that it can't find
   /usr/include/pthreads, configure didn't detect that you need
   MIT-pthreads. To fix this problem, remove config.cache, and then
   re-run configure with the --with-mit-threads option.

   Be sure that your name resolver setup is correct. Otherwise, you
   may experience resolver delays or failures when connecting to
   mysqld. Also make sure that the localhost entry in the /etc/hosts
   file is correct. The file should start with a line similar to
   this:
127.0.0.1       localhost localhost.your.domain

   FreeBSD is known to have a very low default file handle limit. See
   Section B.1.2.18, "'File' Not Found and Similar Errors." Start the
   server by using the --open-files-limit option for mysqld_safe, or
   raise the limits for the mysqld user in /etc/login.conf and
   rebuild it with cap_mkdb /etc/login.conf. Also be sure that you
   set the appropriate class for this user in the password file if
   you are not using the default (use chpass mysqld-user-name). See
   Section 4.3.2, "mysqld_safe --- MySQL Server Startup Script."

   FreeBSD limits the size of a process to 512MB, even if you have
   much more RAM available on the system. So you may get an error
   such as this:
Out of memory (Needed 16391 bytes)

   In current versions of FreeBSD (at least 4.x and greater), you may
   increase this limit by adding the following entries to the
   /boot/loader.conf file and rebooting the machine (these are not
   settings that can be changed at run time with the sysctl command):
kern.maxdsiz="1073741824" # 1GB
kern.dfldsiz="1073741824" # 1GB
kern.maxssiz="134217728" # 128MB

   For older versions of FreeBSD, you must recompile your kernel to
   change the maximum data segment size for a process. In this case,
   you should look at the MAXDSIZ option in the LINT config file for
   more information.

   If you get problems with the current date in MySQL, setting the TZ
   variable should help. See Section 2.14, "Environment Variables."

2.13.4.2. NetBSD Notes

   To compile on NetBSD, you need GNU make. Otherwise, the build
   process fails when make tries to run lint on C++ files.

2.13.4.3. OpenBSD 2.5 Notes

   On OpenBSD 2.5, you can compile MySQL with native threads with the
   following options:
CFLAGS=-pthread CXXFLAGS=-pthread ./configure --with-mit-threads=no

2.13.4.4. BSD/OS Version 2.x Notes

   If you get the following error when compiling MySQL, your ulimit
   value for virtual memory is too low:
item_func.h: In method
`Item_func_ge::Item_func_ge(const Item_func_ge &)':
item_func.h:28: virtual memory exhausted
make[2]: *** [item_func.o] Error 1

   Try using ulimit -v 80000 and run make again. If this doesn't work
   and you are using bash, try switching to csh or sh; some BSDI
   users have reported problems with bash and ulimit.

   If you are using gcc, you may also use have to use the
   --with-low-memory flag for configure to be able to compile
   sql_yacc.cc.

   If you get problems with the current date in MySQL, setting the TZ
   variable should help. See Section 2.14, "Environment Variables."

2.13.4.5. BSD/OS Version 3.x Notes

   Upgrade to BSD/OS 3.1. If that is not possible, install BSDIpatch
   M300-038.

   Use the following command when configuring MySQL:
env CXX=shlicc++ CC=shlicc2 \
./configure \
    --prefix=/usr/local/mysql \
    --localstatedir=/var/mysql \
    --without-perl \
    --with-unix-socket-path=/var/mysql/mysql.sock

   The following is also known to work:
env CC=gcc CXX=gcc CXXFLAGS=-O3 \
./configure \
    --prefix=/usr/local/mysql \
    --with-unix-socket-path=/var/mysql/mysql.sock

   You can change the directory locations if you wish, or just use
   the defaults by not specifying any locations.

   If you have problems with performance under heavy load, try using
   the --skip-thread-priority option to mysqld. This runs all threads
   with the same priority. On BSDI 3.1, this gives better
   performance, at least until BSDI fixes its thread scheduler.

   If you get the error virtual memory exhausted while compiling, you
   should try using ulimit -v 80000 and running make again. If this
   doesn't work and you are using bash, try switching to csh or sh;
   some BSDI users have reported problems with bash and ulimit.

2.13.4.6. BSD/OS Version 4.x Notes

   BSDI 4.x has some thread-related bugs. If you want to use MySQL on
   this, you should install all thread-related patches. At least
   M400-023 should be installed.

   On some BSDI 4.x systems, you may get problems with shared
   libraries. The symptom is that you can't execute any client
   programs, for example, mysqladmin. In this case, you need to
   reconfigure not to use shared libraries with the --disable-shared
   option to configure.

   Some customers have had problems on BSDI 4.0.1 that the mysqld
   binary after a while can't open tables. This occurs because some
   library/system-related bug causes mysqld to change current
   directory without having asked for that to happen.

   The fix is to either upgrade MySQL to at least version 3.23.34 or,
   after running configure, remove the line #define HAVE_REALPATH
   from config.h before running make.

   Note that this means that you can't symbolically link a database
   directories to another database directory or symbolic link a table
   to another database on BSDI. (Making a symbolic link to another
   disk is okay).

2.13.5. Other Unix Notes

2.13.5.1. HP-UX Version 10.20 Notes

   If you install MySQL using a binary tarball distribution on HP-UX,
   you may run into trouble even before you get the MySQL
   distribution unpacked, as the HP-UX tar cannot handle long file
   names. This means that you may see errors when you try to unpack
   MySQL.

   If this occurs, you must use GNU tar (gtar) to unpack the
   distribution.

   There are a couple of small problems when compiling MySQL on
   HP-UX. Use gcc instead of the HP-UX native compiler, because gcc
   produces better code.

   Use gcc 2.95 on HP-UX. Don't use high optimization flags (such as
   -O6) because they may not be safe on HP-UX.

   The following configure line should work with gcc 2.95:
CFLAGS="-I/opt/dce/include -fpic" \
CXXFLAGS="-I/opt/dce/include -felide-constructors -fno-exceptions \
-fno-rtti" \
CXX=gcc \
./configure --with-pthread \
    --with-named-thread-libs='-ldce' \
    --prefix=/usr/local/mysql --disable-shared

   The following configure line should work with gcc 3.1:
CFLAGS="-DHPUX -I/opt/dce/include -O3 -fPIC" CXX=gcc \
CXXFLAGS="-DHPUX -I/opt/dce/include -felide-constructors \
    -fno-exceptions -fno-rtti -O3 -fPIC" \
./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql \
    --with-extra-charsets=complex --enable-thread-safe-client \
    --enable-local-infile  --with-pthread \
    --with-named-thread-libs=-ldce --with-lib-ccflags=-fPIC
    --disable-shared

2.13.5.2. HP-UX Version 11.x Notes

   If you install MySQL using a binary tarball distribution on HP-UX,
   you may run into trouble even before you get the MySQL
   distribution unpacked, as the HP-UX tar cannot handle long file
   names. This means that you may see errors when you try to unpack
   MySQL.

   If this occurs, you must use GNU tar (gtar) to unpack the
   distribution.

   Because of some critical bugs in the standard HP-UX libraries, you
   should install the following patches before trying to run MySQL on
   HP-UX 11.0:
PHKL_22840 Streams cumulative
PHNE_22397 ARPA cumulative

   This solves the problem of getting EWOULDBLOCK from recv() and
   EBADF from accept() in threaded applications.

   If you are using gcc 2.95.1 on an unpatched HP-UX 11.x system, you
   may get the following error:
In file included from /usr/include/unistd.h:11,
                 from ../include/global.h:125,
                 from mysql_priv.h:15,
                 from item.cc:19:
/usr/include/sys/unistd.h:184: declaration of C function ...
/usr/include/sys/pthread.h:440: previous declaration ...
In file included from item.h:306,
                 from mysql_priv.h:158,
                 from item.cc:19:

   The problem is that HP-UX does not define pthreads_atfork()
   consistently. It has conflicting prototypes in
   /usr/include/sys/unistd.h:184 and /usr/include/sys/pthread.h:440.

   One solution is to copy /usr/include/sys/unistd.h into
   mysql/include and edit unistd.h and change it to match the
   definition in pthread.h. Look for this line:
extern int pthread_atfork(void (*prepare)(), void (*parent)(),
                                          void (*child)());

   Change it to look like this:
extern int pthread_atfork(void (*prepare)(void), void (*parent)(void)
,
                                          void (*child)(void));

   After making the change, the following configure line should work:
CFLAGS="-fomit-frame-pointer -O3 -fpic" CXX=gcc \
CXXFLAGS="-felide-constructors -fno-exceptions -fno-rtti -O3" \
./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql --disable-shared

   If you are using HP-UX compiler, you can use the following command
   (which has been tested with cc B.11.11.04):
CC=cc CXX=aCC CFLAGS=+DD64 CXXFLAGS=+DD64 ./configure \
    --with-extra-character-set=complex

   You can ignore any errors of the following type:
aCC: warning 901: unknown option: `-3': use +help for online
documentation

   If you get the following error from configure, verify that you
   don't have the path to the K&R compiler before the path to the
   HP-UX C and C++ compiler:
checking for cc option to accept ANSI C... no
configure: error: MySQL requires an ANSI C compiler (and a C++ compil
er).
Try gcc. See the Installation chapter in the Reference Manual.

   Another reason for not being able to compile is that you didn't
   define the +DD64 flags as just described.

   Another possibility for HP-UX 11 is to use the MySQL binaries
   provided at http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/, which we have built
   and tested ourselves. We have also received reports that the HP-UX
   10.20 binaries supplied by MySQL can be run successfully on HP-UX
   11. If you encounter problems, you should be sure to check your
   HP-UX patch level.

2.13.5.3. IBM-AIX notes

   Automatic detection of xlC is missing from Autoconf, so a number
   of variables need to be set before running configure. The
   following example uses the IBM compiler:
export CC="xlc_r -ma -O3 -qstrict -qoptimize=3 -qmaxmem=8192 "
export CXX="xlC_r -ma -O3 -qstrict -qoptimize=3 -qmaxmem=8192"
export CFLAGS="-I /usr/local/include"
export LDFLAGS="-L /usr/local/lib"
export CPPFLAGS=$CFLAGS
export CXXFLAGS=$CFLAGS

./configure --prefix=/usr/local \
                --localstatedir=/var/mysql \
                --sbindir='/usr/local/bin' \
                --libexecdir='/usr/local/bin' \
                --enable-thread-safe-client \
                --enable-large-files

   The preceding options are used to compile the MySQL distribution
   that can be found at http://www-frec.bull.com/.

   If you change the -O3 to -O2 in the preceding configure line, you
   must also remove the -qstrict option. This is a limitation in the
   IBM C compiler.

   If you are using gcc to compile MySQL, you must use the
   -fno-exceptions flag, because the exception handling in gcc is not
   thread-safe! There are also some known problems with IBM's
   assembler that may cause it to generate bad code when used with
   gcc.

   Use the following configure line with gcc 2.95 on AIX:
CC="gcc -pipe -mcpu=power -Wa,-many" \
CXX="gcc -pipe -mcpu=power -Wa,-many" \
CXXFLAGS="-felide-constructors -fno-exceptions -fno-rtti" \
./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql --with-low-memory

   The -Wa,-many option is necessary for the compile to be
   successful. IBM is aware of this problem but is in no hurry to fix
   it because of the workaround that is available. We don't know if
   the -fno-exceptions is required with gcc 2.95, but because MySQL
   doesn't use exceptions and the option generates faster code, you
   should always use it with gcc.

   If you get a problem with assembler code, try changing the
   -mcpu=xxx option to match your CPU. Typically power2, power, or
   powerpc may need to be used. Alternatively, you might need to use
   604 or 604e. We are not positive but suspect that power would
   likely be safe most of the time, even on a power2 machine.

   If you don't know what your CPU is, execute a uname -m command. It
   produces a string that looks like 000514676700, with a format of
   xxyyyyyymmss where xx and ss are always 00, yyyyyy is a unique
   system ID and mm is the ID of the CPU Planar. A chart of these
   values can be found at
   http://www16.boulder.ibm.com/pseries/en_US/cmds/aixcmds5/uname.htm
   .

   This gives you a machine type and a machine model you can use to
   determine what type of CPU you have.

   If you have problems with signals (MySQL dies unexpectedly under
   high load), you may have found an OS bug with threads and signals.
   In this case, you can tell MySQL not to use signals by configuring
   as follows:
CFLAGS=-DDONT_USE_THR_ALARM CXX=gcc \
CXXFLAGS="-felide-constructors -fno-exceptions -fno-rtti \
-DDONT_USE_THR_ALARM" \
./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql --with-debug \
    --with-low-memory

   This doesn't affect the performance of MySQL, but has the side
   effect that you can't kill clients that are "sleeping" on a
   connection with mysqladmin kill or mysqladmin shutdown. Instead,
   the client dies when it issues its next command.

   On some versions of AIX, linking with libbind.a makes
   getservbyname() dump core. This is an AIX bug and should be
   reported to IBM.

   For AIX 4.2.1 and gcc, you have to make the following changes.

   After configuring, edit config.h and include/my_config.h and
   change the line that says this:
#define HAVE_SNPRINTF 1

   to this:
#undef HAVE_SNPRINTF

   And finally, in mysqld.cc, you need to add a prototype for
   initgroups().
#ifdef _AIX41
extern "C" int initgroups(const char *,int);
#endif

   For 32-bit binaries, if you need to allocate a lot of memory to
   the mysqld process, it is not enough to just use ulimit -d
   unlimited. You may also have to modify mysqld_safe to add a line
   something like this:
export LDR_CNTRL='MAXDATA=0x80000000'

   You can find more information about using a lot of memory at
   http://publib16.boulder.ibm.com/pseries/en_US/aixprggd/genprogc/lr
   g_prg_support.htm.

   Users of AIX 4.3 should use gmake instead of the make utility
   included with AIX.

   As of AIX 4.1, the C compiler has been unbundled from AIX as a
   separate product. gcc 3.3.2 can be obtained here:
   ftp://ftp.software.ibm.com/aix/freeSoftware/aixtoolbox/RPMS/ppc/gc
   c/

   The steps for compiling MySQL on AIX with gcc 3.3.2 are similar to
   those for using gcc 2.95 (in particular, the need to edit config.h
   and my_config.h after running configure). However, before running
   configure, you should also patch the curses.h file as follows:
/opt/freeware/lib/gcc-lib/powerpc-ibm-aix5.2.0.0/3.3.2/include/curses
.h.ORIG
       Mon Dec 26 02:17:28 2005
--- /opt/freeware/lib/gcc-lib/powerpc-ibm-aix5.2.0.0/3.3.2/include/cu
rses.h
Mon Dec 26 02:40:13 2005
***************
*** 2023,2029 ****


  #endif /* _AIX32_CURSES */
! #if defined(__USE_FIXED_PROTOTYPES__) || defined(__cplusplus) || de
fined
(__STRICT_ANSI__)
  extern int delwin (WINDOW *);
  extern int endwin (void);
  extern int getcurx (WINDOW *);
--- 2023,2029 ----


  #endif /* _AIX32_CURSES */
! #if 0 && (defined(__USE_FIXED_PROTOTYPES__) || defined(__cplusplus)
|| defined
(__STRICT_ANSI__))
  extern int delwin (WINDOW *);
  extern int endwin (void);
  extern int getcurx (WINDOW *);

2.13.5.4. SunOS 4 Notes

   On SunOS 4, MIT-pthreads is needed to compile MySQL. This in turn
   means you need GNU make.

   Some SunOS 4 systems have problems with dynamic libraries and
   libtool. You can use the following configure line to avoid this
   problem:
./configure --disable-shared --with-mysqld-ldflags=-all-static

   When compiling readline, you may get warnings about duplicate
   defines. These can be ignored.

   When compiling mysqld, there are some implicit declaration of
   function warnings. These can be ignored.

2.13.5.5. Alpha-DEC-UNIX Notes (Tru64)

   If you are using egcs 1.1.2 on Digital Unix, you should upgrade to
   gcc 2.95.2, because egcs on DEC has some serious bugs!

   When compiling threaded programs under Digital Unix, the
   documentation recommends using the -pthread option for cc and cxx
   and the -lmach -lexc libraries (in addition to -lpthread). You
   should run configure something like this:
CC="cc -pthread" CXX="cxx -pthread -O" \
./configure --with-named-thread-libs="-lpthread -lmach -lexc -lc"

   When compiling mysqld, you may see a couple of warnings like this:
mysqld.cc: In function void handle_connections()':
mysqld.cc:626: passing long unsigned int *' as argument 3 of
accept(int,sockadddr *, int *)'

   You can safely ignore these warnings. They occur because configure
   can detect only errors, not warnings.

   If you start the server directly from the command line, you may
   have problems with it dying when you log out. (When you log out,
   your outstanding processes receive a SIGHUP signal.) If so, try
   starting the server like this:
nohup mysqld [options] &

   nohup causes the command following it to ignore any SIGHUP signal
   sent from the terminal. Alternatively, start the server by running
   mysqld_safe, which invokes mysqld using nohup for you. See Section
   4.3.2, "mysqld_safe --- MySQL Server Startup Script."

   If you get a problem when compiling mysys/get_opt.c, just remove
   the #define _NO_PROTO line from the start of that file.

   If you are using Compaq's CC compiler, the following configure
   line should work:
CC="cc -pthread"
CFLAGS="-O4 -ansi_alias -ansi_args -fast -inline speed \
        -speculate all -arch host"
CXX="cxx -pthread"
CXXFLAGS="-O4 -ansi_alias -ansi_args -fast -inline speed \
          -speculate all -arch host -noexceptions -nortti"
export CC CFLAGS CXX CXXFLAGS
./configure \
    --prefix=/usr/local/mysql \
    --with-low-memory \
    --enable-large-files \
    --enable-shared=yes \
    --with-named-thread-libs="-lpthread -lmach -lexc -lc"
gnumake

   If you get a problem with libtool when compiling with shared
   libraries as just shown, when linking mysql, you should be able to
   get around this by issuing these commands:
cd mysql
/bin/sh ../libtool --mode=link cxx -pthread  -O3 -DDBUG_OFF \
    -O4 -ansi_alias -ansi_args -fast -inline speed \
    -speculate all \ -arch host  -DUNDEF_HAVE_GETHOSTBYNAME_R \
    -o mysql  mysql.o readline.o sql_string.o completion_hash.o \
    ../readline/libreadline.a -lcurses \
    ../libmysql/.libs/libmysqlclient.so  -lm
cd ..
gnumake
gnumake install
scripts/mysql_install_db

2.13.5.6. Alpha-DEC-OSF/1 Notes

   If you have problems compiling and have DEC CC and gcc installed,
   try running configure like this:
CC=cc CFLAGS=-O CXX=gcc CXXFLAGS=-O3 \
./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql

   If you get problems with the c_asm.h file, you can create and use
   a 'dummy' c_asm.h file with:
touch include/c_asm.h
CC=gcc CFLAGS=-I./include \
CXX=gcc CXXFLAGS=-O3 \
./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql

   Note that the following problems with the ld program can be fixed
   by downloading the latest DEC (Compaq) patch kit from:
   http://ftp.support.compaq.com/public/unix/.

   On OSF/1 V4.0D and compiler "DEC C V5.6-071 on Digital Unix V4.0
   (Rev. 878)," the compiler had some strange behavior (undefined asm
   symbols). /bin/ld also appears to be broken (problems with _exit
   undefined errors occurring while linking mysqld). On this system,
   we have managed to compile MySQL with the following configure
   line, after replacing /bin/ld with the version from OSF 4.0C:
CC=gcc CXX=gcc CXXFLAGS=-O3 ./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql

   With the Digital compiler "C++ V6.1-029," the following should
   work:
CC=cc -pthread
CFLAGS=-O4 -ansi_alias -ansi_args -fast -inline speed \
       -speculate all -arch host
CXX=cxx -pthread
CXXFLAGS=-O4 -ansi_alias -ansi_args -fast -inline speed \
         -speculate all -arch host -noexceptions -nortti
export CC CFLAGS CXX CXXFLAGS
./configure --prefix=/usr/mysql/mysql \
            --with-mysqld-ldflags=-all-static --disable-shared \
            --with-named-thread-libs="-lmach -lexc -lc"

   In some versions of OSF/1, the alloca() function is broken. Fix
   this by removing the line in config.h that defines 'HAVE_ALLOCA'.

   The alloca() function also may have an incorrect prototype in
   /usr/include/alloca.h. This warning resulting from this can be
   ignored.

   configure uses the following thread libraries automatically:
   --with-named-thread-libs="-lpthread -lmach -lexc -lc".

   When using gcc, you can also try running configure like this:
CFLAGS=-D_PTHREAD_USE_D4 CXX=gcc CXXFLAGS=-O3 ./configure ...

   If you have problems with signals (MySQL dies unexpectedly under
   high load), you may have found an OS bug with threads and signals.
   In this case, you can tell MySQL not to use signals by configuring
   with:
CFLAGS=-DDONT_USE_THR_ALARM \
CXXFLAGS=-DDONT_USE_THR_ALARM \
./configure ...

   This does not affect the performance of MySQL, but has the side
   effect that you can't kill clients that are "sleeping" on a
   connection with mysqladmin kill or mysqladmin shutdown. Instead,
   the client dies when it issues its next command.

   With gcc 2.95.2, you may encounter the following compile error:
sql_acl.cc:1456: Internal compiler error in `scan_region',
at except.c:2566
Please submit a full bug report.

   To fix this, you should change to the sql directory and do a
   cut-and-paste of the last gcc line, but change -O3 to -O0 (or add
   -O0 immediately after gcc if you don't have any -O option on your
   compile line). After this is done, you can just change back to the
   top-level directory and run make again.

2.13.5.7. SGI Irix Notes

   As of MySQL 5.0, we don't provide binaries for Irix any more.

   If you are using Irix 6.5.3 or newer, mysqld is able to create
   threads only if you run it as a user that has CAP_SCHED_MGT
   privileges (such as root) or give the mysqld server this privilege
   with the following shell command:
chcap "CAP_SCHED_MGT+epi" /opt/mysql/libexec/mysqld

   You may have to undefine some symbols in config.h after running
   configure and before compiling.

   In some Irix implementations, the alloca() function is broken. If
   the mysqld server dies on some SELECT statements, remove the lines
   from config.h that define HAVE_ALLOC and HAVE_ALLOCA_H. If
   mysqladmin create doesn't work, remove the line from config.h that
   defines HAVE_READDIR_R. You may have to remove the HAVE_TERM_H
   line as well.

   SGI recommends that you install all the patches on this page as a
   set:
   http://support.sgi.com/surfzone/patches/patchset/6.2_indigo.rps.ht
   ml

   At the very minimum, you should install the latest kernel rollup,
   the latest rld rollup, and the latest libc rollup.

   You definitely need all the POSIX patches on this page, for
   pthreads support:

   http://support.sgi.com/surfzone/patches/patchset/6.2_posix.rps.htm
   l

   If you get the something like the following error when compiling
   mysql.cc:
"/usr/include/curses.h", line 82: error(1084):
invalid combination of type

   Type the following in the top-level directory of your MySQL source
   tree:
extra/replace bool curses_bool < /usr/include/curses.h > include/curs
es.h
make

   There have also been reports of scheduling problems. If only one
   thread is running, performance is slow. Avoid this by starting
   another client. This may lead to a two-to-tenfold increase in
   execution speed thereafter for the other thread. This is a poorly
   understood problem with Irix threads; you may have to improvise to
   find solutions until this can be fixed.

   If you are compiling with gcc, you can use the following configure
   command:
CC=gcc CXX=gcc CXXFLAGS=-O3 \
./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql --enable-thread-safe-client \
    --with-named-thread-libs=-lpthread

   On Irix 6.5.11 with native Irix C and C++ compilers ver. 7.3.1.2,
   the following is reported to work
CC=cc CXX=CC CFLAGS='-O3 -n32 -TARG:platform=IP22 -I/usr/local/includ
e \
-L/usr/local/lib' CXXFLAGS='-O3 -n32 -TARG:platform=IP22 \
-I/usr/local/include -L/usr/local/lib' \
./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql --with-innodb \
    --with-libwrap=/usr/local \
    --with-named-curses-libs=/usr/local/lib/libncurses.a

2.13.5.8. SCO UNIX and OpenServer 5.0.x Notes

   The current port is tested only on sco3.2v5.0.5, sco3.2v5.0.6, and
   sco3.2v5.0.7 systems. There has also been progress on a port to
   sco3.2v4.2. Open Server 5.0.8 (Legend) has native threads and
   allows files greater than 2GB. The current maximum file size is
   2GB.

   We have been able to compile MySQL with the following configure
   command on OpenServer with gcc 2.95.3.
CC=gcc CFLAGS="-D_FILE_OFFSET_BITS=64 -O3" \
CXX=gcc CXXFLAGS="-D_FILE_OFFSET_BITS=64 -O3" \
./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql \
    --enable-thread-safe-client --with-innodb \
    --with-openssl --with-vio --with-extra-charsets=complex

   gcc is available at
   ftp://ftp.sco.com/pub/openserver5/opensrc/gnutools-5.0.7Kj.

   This development system requires the OpenServer Execution
   Environment Supplement oss646B on OpenServer 5.0.6 and oss656B and
   The OpenSource libraries found in gwxlibs. All OpenSource tools
   are in the opensrc directory. They are available at
   ftp://ftp.sco.com/pub/openserver5/opensrc/.

   Use the latest production release of MySQL.

   SCO provides operating system patches at
   ftp://ftp.sco.com/pub/openserver5 for OpenServer 5.0.[0-6] and
   ftp://ftp.sco.com/pub/openserverv5/507 for OpenServer 5.0.7.

   SCO provides information about security fixes at
   ftp://ftp.sco.com/pub/security/OpenServer for OpenServer 5.0.x.

   The maximum file size on an OpenServer 5.0.x system is 2GB.

   The total memory which can be allocated for streams buffers,
   clists, and lock records cannot exceed 60MB on OpenServer 5.0.x.

   Streams buffers are allocated in units of 4096 byte pages, clists
   are 70 bytes each, and lock records are 64 bytes each, so:
(NSTRPAGES x 4096) + (NCLIST x 70) + (MAX_FLCKREC x 64) <= 62914560

   Follow this procedure to configure the Database Services option.
   If you are unsure whether an application requires this, see the
   documentation provided with the application.

    1. Log in as root.

    2. Enable the SUDS driver by editing the /etc/conf/sdevice.d/suds
       file. Change the N in the second field to a Y.

    3. Use mkdev aio or the Hardware/Kernel Manager to enable support
       for asynchronous I/O and relink the kernel. To allow users to
       lock down memory for use with this type of I/O, update the
       aiomemlock(F) file. This file should be updated to include the
       names of users that can use AIO and the maximum amounts of
       memory they can lock down.

    4. Many applications use setuid binaries so that you need to
       specify only a single user. See the documentation provided
       with the application to determine whether this is the case for
       your application.

   After you complete this process, reboot the system to create a new
   kernel incorporating these changes.

   By default, the entries in /etc/conf/cf.d/mtune are set as
   follows:
Value           Default         Min             Max
-----           -------         ---             ---
NBUF            0               24              450000
NHBUF           0               32              524288
NMPBUF          0               12              512
MAX_INODE       0               100             64000
MAX_FILE        0               100             64000
CTBUFSIZE       128             0               256
MAX_PROC        0               50              16000
MAX_REGION      0               500             160000
NCLIST          170             120             16640
MAXUP           100             15              16000
NOFILES         110             60              11000
NHINODE         128             64              8192
NAUTOUP         10              0               60
NGROUPS         8               0               128
BDFLUSHR        30              1               300
MAX_FLCKREC     0               50              16000
PUTBUFSZ        8000            2000            20000
MAXSLICE        100             25              100
ULIMIT          4194303         2048            4194303
* Streams Parameters
NSTREAM         64              1               32768
NSTRPUSH        9               9               9
NMUXLINK        192             1               4096
STRMSGSZ        16384           4096            524288
STRCTLSZ        1024            1024            1024
STRMAXBLK       524288          4096            524288
NSTRPAGES       500             0               8000
STRSPLITFRAC    80              50              100
NLOG            3               3               3
NUMSP           64              1               256
NUMTIM          16              1               8192
NUMTRW          16              1               8192
* Semaphore Parameters
SEMMAP          10              10              8192
SEMMNI          10              10              8192
SEMMNS          60              60              8192
SEMMNU          30              10              8192
SEMMSL          25              25              150
SEMOPM          10              10              1024
SEMUME          10              10              25
SEMVMX          32767           32767           32767
SEMAEM          16384           16384           16384
* Shared Memory Parameters
SHMMAX          524288          131072          2147483647
SHMMIN          1               1               1
SHMMNI          100             100             2000
FILE            0               100             64000
NMOUNT          0               4               256
NPROC           0               50              16000
NREGION         0               500             160000

   Set these values as follows:

     * NOFILES should be 4096 or 2048.

     * MAXUP should be 2048.

   To make changes to the kernel, use the idtune name parameter
   command. idtune modifies the /etc/conf/cf.d/stune file for you.
   For example, to change SEMMS to 200, execute this command as root:
# /etc/conf/bin/idtune SEMMNS 200

   Then rebuild and reboot the kernel by issuing this command:
# /etc/conf/bin/idbuild -B && init 6

   To tune the system, the proper parameter values to use depend on
   the number of users accessing the application or database and size
   the of the database (that is, the used buffer pool). The following
   kernel parameters can be set with idtune:

     * SHMMAX (recommended setting: 128MB) and SHMSEG (recommended
       setting: 15). These parameters have an influence on the MySQL
       database engine to create user buffer pools.

     * NOFILES and MAXUP should be set to at least 2048.

     * MAXPROC should be set to at least 3000/4000 (depends on number
       of users) or more.

     * The following formulas are recommended to calculate values for
       SEMMSL, SEMMNS, and SEMMNU:
SEMMSL = 13
       13 is what has been found to be the best for both Progress and
       MySQL.
SEMMNS = SEMMSL x number of db servers to be run on the system
       Set SEMMNS to the value of SEMMSL multiplied by the number of
       database servers (maximum) that you are running on the system
       at one time.
SEMMNU = SEMMNS
       Set the value of SEMMNU to equal the value of SEMMNS. You
       could probably set this to 75% of SEMMNS, but this is a
       conservative estimate.

   You need to at least install the SCO OpenServer Linker and
   Application Development Libraries or the OpenServer Development
   System to use gcc. You cannot use the GCC Dev system without
   installing one of these.

   You should get the FSU Pthreads package and install it first. This
   can be found at
   http://moss.csc.ncsu.edu/~mueller/ftp/pub/PART/pthreads.tar.gz.
   You can also get a precompiled package from
   ftp://ftp.zenez.com/pub/zenez/prgms/FSU-threads-3.14.tar.gz.

   FSU Pthreads can be compiled with SCO Unix 4.2 with tcpip, or
   using OpenServer 3.0 or Open Desktop 3.0 (OS 3.0 ODT 3.0) with the
   SCO Development System installed using a good port of GCC 2.5.x.
   For ODT or OS 3.0, you need a good port of GCC 2.5.x. There are a
   lot of problems without a good port. The port for this product
   requires the SCO Unix Development system. Without it, you are
   missing the libraries and the linker that is needed. You also need
   SCO-3.2v4.2-includes.tar.gz. This file contains the changes to the
   SCO Development include files that are needed to get MySQL to
   build. You need to replace the existing system include files with
   these modified header files. They can be obtained from
   ftp://ftp.zenez.com/pub/zenez/prgms/SCO-3.2v4.2-includes.tar.gz.

   To build FSU Pthreads on your system, all you should need to do is
   run GNU make. The Makefile in FSU-threads-3.14.tar.gz is set up to
   make FSU-threads.

   You can run ./configure in the threads/src directory and select
   the SCO OpenServer option. This command copies Makefile.SCO5 to
   Makefile. Then run make.

   To install in the default /usr/include directory, log in as root,
   and then cd to the thread/src directory and run make install.

   Remember that you must use GNU make to build MySQL.

Note

   If you don't start mysqld_safe as root, you should get only the
   default 110 open files per process. mysqld writes a note about
   this in the log file.

   With SCO 3.2V4.2, you should use FSU Pthreads version 3.14 or
   newer. The following configure command should work:
CFLAGS="-D_XOPEN_XPG4" CXX=gcc CXXFLAGS="-D_XOPEN_XPG4" \
./configure \
    --prefix=/usr/local/mysql \
    --with-named-thread-libs="-lgthreads -lsocket -lgen -lgthreads" \
    --with-named-curses-libs="-lcurses"

   You may have problems with some include files. In this case, you
   can find new SCO-specific include files at
   ftp://ftp.zenez.com/pub/zenez/prgms/SCO-3.2v4.2-includes.tar.gz.

   You should unpack this file in the include directory of your MySQL
   source tree.

   SCO development notes:

     * MySQL should automatically detect FSU Pthreads and link mysqld
       with -lgthreads -lsocket -lgthreads.

     * The SCO development libraries are re-entrant in FSU Pthreads.
       SCO claims that its library functions are re-entrant, so they
       must be re-entrant with FSU Pthreads. FSU Pthreads on
       OpenServer tries to use the SCO scheme to make re-entrant
       libraries.

     * FSU Pthreads (at least the version at ftp://ftp.zenez.com)
       comes linked with GNU malloc. If you encounter problems with
       memory usage, make sure that gmalloc.o is included in
       libgthreads.a and libgthreads.so.

     * In FSU Pthreads, the following system calls are
       pthreads-aware: read(), write(), getmsg(), connect(),
       accept(), select(), and wait().

     * The CSSA-2001-SCO.35.2 (the patch is listed in custom as
       erg711905-dscr_remap security patch (version 2.0.0)) breaks
       FSU threads and makes mysqld unstable. You have to remove this
       one if you want to run mysqld on an OpenServer 5.0.6 machine.

     * If you use SCO OpenServer 5, you may need to recompile FSU
       pthreads with -DDRAFT7 in CFLAGS. Otherwise, InnoDB may hang
       at a mysqld startup.

     * SCO provides operating system patches at
       ftp://ftp.sco.com/pub/openserver5 for OpenServer 5.0.x.

     * SCO provides security fixes and libsocket.so.2 at
       ftp://ftp.sco.com/pub/security/OpenServer and
       ftp://ftp.sco.com/pub/security/sse for OpenServer 5.0.x.

     * Pre-OSR506 security fixes. Also, the telnetd fix at
       ftp://stage.caldera.com/pub/security/openserver/ or
       ftp://stage.caldera.com/pub/security/openserver/CSSA-2001-SCO.
       10/ as both libsocket.so.2 and libresolv.so.1 with
       instructions for installing on pre-OSR506 systems.
       It is probably a good idea to install these patches before
       trying to compile/use MySQL.

   Beginning with Legend/OpenServer 6.0.0, there are native threads
   and no 2GB file size limit.

2.13.5.9. SCO OpenServer 6.0.x Notes

   OpenServer 6 includes these key improvements:

     * Larger file support up to 1 TB

     * Multiprocessor support increased from 4 to 32 processors

     * Increased memory support up to 64GB

     * Extending the power of UnixWare into OpenServer 6

     * Dramatic performance improvement

   OpenServer 6.0.0 commands are organized as follows:

     * /bin is for commands that behave exactly the same as on
       OpenServer 5.0.x.

     * /u95/bin is for commands that have better standards
       conformance, for example Large File System (LFS) support.

     * /udk/bin is for commands that behave the same as on UnixWare
       7.1.4. The default is for the LFS support.

   The following is a guide to setting PATH on OpenServer 6. If the
   user wants the traditional OpenServer 5.0.x then PATH should be
   /bin first. If the user wants LFS support, the path should be
   /u95/bin:/bin. If the user wants UnixWare 7 support first, the
   path would be /udk/bin:/u95/bin:/bin:.

   Use the latest production release of MySQL. Should you choose to
   use an older release of MySQL on OpenServer 6.0.x, you must use a
   version of MySQL at least as recent as 3.22.13 to get fixes for
   some portability and OS problems.

   MySQL distribution files with names of the following form are tar
   archives of media are tar archives of media images suitable for
   installation with the SCO Software Manager (/etc/custom) on SCO
   OpenServer 6:
mysql-PRODUCT-5.1.39-sco-osr6-i686.VOLS.tar

   A distribution where PRODUCT is pro-cert is the Commercially
   licensed MySQL Pro Certified server. A distribution where PRODUCT
   is pro-gpl-cert is the MySQL Pro Certified server licensed under
   the terms of the General Public License (GPL).

   Select whichever distribution you wish to install and, after
   download, extract the tar archive into an empty directory. For
   example:
shell> mkdir /tmp/mysql-pro
shell> cd /tmp/mysql-pro
shell> tar xf /tmp/mysql-pro-cert-5.1.39-sco-osr6-i686.VOLS.tar

   Prior to installation, back up your data in accordance with the
   procedures outlined in Section 2.12.1, "Upgrading MySQL."

   Remove any previously installed pkgadd version of MySQL:
shell> pkginfo mysql 2>&1 > /dev/null && pkgrm mysql

   Install MySQL Pro from media images using the SCO Software
   Manager:
shell> /etc/custom -p SCO:MySQL -i -z /tmp/mysql-pro

   Alternatively, the SCO Software Manager can be displayed
   graphically by clicking on the Software Manager icon on the
   desktop, selecting Software -> Install New, selecting the host,
   selecting Media Images for the Media Device, and entering
   /tmp/mysql-pro as the Image Directory.

   After installation, run mkdev mysql as the root user to configure
   your newly installed MySQL Pro Certified server.

Note

   The installation procedure for VOLS packages does not create the
   mysql user and group that the package uses by default. You should
   either create the mysql user and group, or else select a different
   user and group using an option in mkdev mysql.

   If you wish to configure your MySQL Pro server to interface with
   the Apache Web server via PHP, download and install the PHP update
   from SCO at
   ftp://ftp.sco.com/pub/updates/OpenServer/SCOSA-2006.17/.

   We have been able to compile MySQL with the following configure
   command on OpenServer 6.0.x:
CC=cc CFLAGS="-D_FILE_OFFSET_BITS=64 -O3" \
CXX=CC CXXFLAGS="-D_FILE_OFFSET_BITS=64 -O3" \
./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql \
    --enable-thread-safe-client  \
    --with-extra-charsets=complex \
    --build=i686-unknown-sysv5SCO_SV6.0.0

   If you use gcc, you must use gcc 2.95.3 or newer.
CC=gcc CXX=g++ ... ./configure ...

   SCO provides OpenServer 6 operating system patches at
   ftp://ftp.sco.com/pub/openserver6.

   SCO provides information about security fixes at
   ftp://ftp.sco.com/pub/security/OpenServer.

   By default, the maximum file size on a OpenServer 6.0.0 system is
   1TB. Some operating system utilities have a limitation of 2GB. The
   maximum possible file size on UnixWare 7 is 1TB with VXFS or HTFS.

   OpenServer 6 can be configured for large file support (file sizes
   greater than 2GB) by tuning the UNIX kernel.

   By default, the entries in /etc/conf/cf.d/mtune are set as
   follows:
Value           Default         Min             Max
-----           -------         ---             ---
SVMMLIM         0x9000000       0x1000000       0x7FFFFFFF
HVMMLIM         0x9000000       0x1000000       0x7FFFFFFF

   To make changes to the kernel, use the idtune name parameter
   command. idtune modifies the /etc/conf/cf.d/stune file for you. To
   set the kernel values, execute the following commands as root:
# /etc/conf/bin/idtune SDATLIM 0x7FFFFFFF
# /etc/conf/bin/idtune HDATLIM 0x7FFFFFFF
# /etc/conf/bin/idtune SVMMLIM 0x7FFFFFFF
# /etc/conf/bin/idtune HVMMLIM 0x7FFFFFFF
# /etc/conf/bin/idtune SFNOLIM 2048
# /etc/conf/bin/idtune HFNOLIM 2048

   Then rebuild and reboot the kernel by issuing this command:
# /etc/conf/bin/idbuild -B && init 6

   To tune the system, the proper parameter values to use depend on
   the number of users accessing the application or database and size
   the of the database (that is, the used buffer pool). The following
   kernel parameters can be set with idtune:

     * SHMMAX (recommended setting: 128MB) and SHMSEG (recommended
       setting: 15). These parameters have an influence on the MySQL
       database engine to create user buffer pools.

     * SFNOLIM and HFNOLIM should be at maximum 2048.

     * NPROC should be set to at least 3000/4000 (depends on number
       of users).

     * The following formulas are recommended to calculate values for
       SEMMSL, SEMMNS, and SEMMNU:
SEMMSL = 13
       13 is what has been found to be the best for both Progress and
       MySQL.
SEMMNS = SEMMSL x number of db servers to be run on the system
       Set SEMMNS to the value of SEMMSL multiplied by the number of
       database servers (maximum) that you are running on the system
       at one time.
SEMMNU = SEMMNS
       Set the value of SEMMNU to equal the value of SEMMNS. You
       could probably set this to 75% of SEMMNS, but this is a
       conservative estimate.

2.13.5.10. SCO UnixWare 7.1.x and OpenUNIX 8.0.0 Notes

   Use the latest production release of MySQL. Should you choose to
   use an older release of MySQL on UnixWare 7.1.x, you must use a
   version of MySQL at least as recent as 3.22.13 to get fixes for
   some portability and OS problems.

   We have been able to compile MySQL with the following configure
   command on UnixWare 7.1.x:
CC="cc" CFLAGS="-I/usr/local/include" \
CXX="CC" CXXFLAGS="-I/usr/local/include" \
./configure --prefix=/usr/local/mysql \
    --enable-thread-safe-client \
    --with-innodb --with-openssl --with-extra-charsets=complex

   If you want to use gcc, you must use gcc 2.95.3 or newer.
CC=gcc CXX=g++ ... ./configure ...

   SCO provides operating system patches at
   ftp://ftp.sco.com/pub/unixware7 for UnixWare 7.1.1,
   ftp://ftp.sco.com/pub/unixware7/713/ for UnixWare 7.1.3,
   ftp://ftp.sco.com/pub/unixware7/714/ for UnixWare 7.1.4, and
   ftp://ftp.sco.com/pub/openunix8 for OpenUNIX 8.0.0.

   SCO provides information about security fixes at
   ftp://ftp.sco.com/pub/security/OpenUNIX for OpenUNIX and
   ftp://ftp.sco.com/pub/security/UnixWare for UnixWare.

   The UnixWare 7 file size limit is 1 TB with VXFS. Some OS
   utilities have a limitation of 2GB.

   On UnixWare 7.1.4 you do not need to do anything to get large file
   support, but to enable large file support on prior versions of
   UnixWare 7.1.x, run fsadm.
# fsadm -Fvxfs -o largefiles /
# fsadm /         * Note
# ulimit unlimited
# /etc/conf/bin/idtune SFSZLIM 0x7FFFFFFF     ** Note
# /etc/conf/bin/idtune HFSZLIM 0x7FFFFFFF     ** Note
# /etc/conf/bin/idbuild -B

* This should report "largefiles".
** 0x7FFFFFFF represents infinity for these values.

   Reboot the system using shutdown.

   By default, the entries in /etc/conf/cf.d/mtune are set as
   follows:
Value           Default         Min             Max
-----           -------         ---             ---
SVMMLIM         0x9000000       0x1000000       0x7FFFFFFF
HVMMLIM         0x9000000       0x1000000       0x7FFFFFFF

   To make changes to the kernel, use the idtune name parameter
   command. idtune modifies the /etc/conf/cf.d/stune file for you. To
   set the kernel values, execute the following commands as root:
# /etc/conf/bin/idtune SDATLIM 0x7FFFFFFF
# /etc/conf/bin/idtune HDATLIM 0x7FFFFFFF
# /etc/conf/bin/idtune SVMMLIM 0x7FFFFFFF
# /etc/conf/bin/idtune HVMMLIM 0x7FFFFFFF
# /etc/conf/bin/idtune SFNOLIM 2048
# /etc/conf/bin/idtune HFNOLIM 2048

   Then rebuild and reboot the kernel by issuing this command:
# /etc/conf/bin/idbuild -B && init 6

   To tune the system, the proper parameter values to use depend on
   the number of users accessing the application or database and size
   the of the database (that is, the used buffer pool). The following
   kernel parameters can be set with idtune:

     * SHMMAX (recommended setting: 128MB) and SHMSEG (recommended
       setting: 15). These parameters have an influence on the MySQL
       database engine to create user buffer pools.

     * SFNOLIM and HFNOLIM should be at maximum 2048.

     * NPROC should be set to at least 3000/4000 (depends on number
       of users).

     * The following formulas are recommended to calculate values for
       SEMMSL, SEMMNS, and SEMMNU:
SEMMSL = 13
       13 is what has been found to be the best for both Progress and
       MySQL.
SEMMNS = SEMMSL x number of db servers to be run on the system
       Set SEMMNS to the value of SEMMSL multiplied by the number of
       database servers (maximum) that you are running on the system
       at one time.
SEMMNU = SEMMNS
       Set the value of SEMMNU to equal the value of SEMMNS. You
       could probably set this to 75% of SEMMNS, but this is a
       conservative estimate.

2.14. Environment Variables

   This section lists all the environment variables that are used
   directly or indirectly by MySQL. Most of these can also be found
   in other places in this manual.

   Note that any options on the command line take precedence over
   values specified in option files and environment variables, and
   values in option files take precedence over values in environment
   variables.

   In many cases, it is preferable to use an option file instead of
   environment variables to modify the behavior of MySQL. See Section
   4.2.3.3, "Using Option Files."
   Variable Description
   CXX The name of your C++ compiler (for running configure).
   CC The name of your C compiler (for running configure).
   CFLAGS Flags for your C compiler (for running configure).
   CXXFLAGS Flags for your C++ compiler (for running configure).
   DBI_USER The default user name for Perl DBI.
   DBI_TRACE Trace options for Perl DBI.
   HOME The default path for the mysql history file is
   $HOME/.mysql_history.
   LD_RUN_PATH Used to specify the location of libmysqlclient.so.
   MYSQL_DEBUG Debug trace options when debugging.
   MYSQL_GROUP_SUFFIX Option group suffix value (like specifying
   --defaults-group-suffix).
   MYSQL_HISTFILE The path to the mysql history file. If this
   variable is set, its value overrides the default for
   $HOME/.mysql_history.
   MYSQL_HOME The path to the directory in which the server-specific
   my.cnf file resides (as of MySQL 5.0.3).
   MYSQL_HOST The default host name used by the mysql command-line
   client.
   MYSQL_PS1 The command prompt to use in the mysql command-line
   client.
   MYSQL_PWD The default password when connecting to mysqld. Note
   that using this is insecure. See Section 5.5.6.2, "End-User
   Guidelines for Password Security."
   MYSQL_TCP_PORT The default TCP/IP port number.
   MYSQL_UNIX_PORT The default Unix socket file name; used for
   connections to localhost.
   PATH Used by the shell to find MySQL programs.
   TMPDIR The directory where temporary files are created.
   TZ This should be set to your local time zone. See Section
   B.1.4.6, "Time Zone Problems."
   UMASK The user-file creation mode when creating files. See note
   following table.
   UMASK_DIR The user-directory creation mode when creating
   directories. See note following table.
   USER The default user name on Windows and NetWare used when
   connecting to mysqld.

   The UMASK and UMASK_DIR variables, despite their names, are used
   as modes, not masks:

     * If UMASK is set, mysqld uses ($UMASK | 0600) as the mode for
       file creation, so that newly created files have a mode in the
       range from 0600 to 0666 (all values octal).

     * If UMASK_DIR is set, mysqld uses ($UMASK_DIR | 0700) as the
       base mode for directory creation, which then is AND-ed with
       ~(~$UMASK & 0666), so that newly created directories have a
       mode in the range from 0700 to 0777 (all values octal). The
       AND operation may remove read and write permissions from the
       directory mode, but not execute permissions.

   MySQL assumes that the value for UMASK or UMASK_DIR is in octal if
   it starts with a zero.

2.15. Perl Installation Notes

   Perl support for MySQL is provided by means of the DBI/DBD client
   interface. The interface requires Perl 5.6.0, and 5.6.1 or later
   is preferred. DBI does not work if you have an older version of
   Perl.

   If you want to use transactions with Perl DBI, you need to have
   DBD::mysql 2.0900. If you are using the MySQL 4.1 or newer client
   library, you must use DBD::mysql 2.9003 or newer. Support for
   server-side prepared statements requires DBD::mysql 3.0009 or
   newer.

   Perl support is not included with MySQL distributions. You can
   obtain the necessary modules from http://search.cpan.org for Unix,
   or by using the ActiveState ppm program on Windows. The following
   sections describe how to do this.

   Perl support for MySQL must be installed if you want to run the
   MySQL benchmark scripts; see Section 7.1.4, "The MySQL Benchmark
   Suite." It is also required for the MySQL Cluster ndb_size.pl
   utility; see Section 17.6.21, "ndb_size.pl --- NDBCLUSTER Size
   Requirement Estimator."

2.15.1. Installing Perl on Unix

   MySQL Perl support requires that you have installed MySQL client
   programming support (libraries and header files). Most
   installation methods install the necessary files. However, if you
   installed MySQL from RPM files on Linux, be sure that you've
   installed the developer RPM. The client programs are in the client
   RPM, but client programming support is in the developer RPM.

   If you want to install Perl support, the files you need can be
   obtained from the CPAN (Comprehensive Perl Archive Network) at
   http://search.cpan.org.

   The easiest way to install Perl modules on Unix is to use the CPAN
   module. For example:
shell> perl -MCPAN -e shell
cpan> install DBI
cpan> install DBD::mysql

   The DBD::mysql installation runs a number of tests. These tests
   attempt to connect to the local MySQL server using the default
   user name and password. (The default user name is your login name
   on Unix, and ODBC on Windows. The default password is "no
   password.") If you cannot connect to the server with those values
   (for example, if your account has a password), the tests fail. You
   can use force install DBD::mysql to ignore the failed tests.

   DBI requires the Data::Dumper module. It may be installed; if not,
   you should install it before installing DBI.

   It is also possible to download the module distributions in the
   form of compressed tar archives and build the modules manually.
   For example, to unpack and build a DBI distribution, use a
   procedure such as this:

    1. Unpack the distribution into the current directory:
shell> gunzip < DBI-VERSION.tar.gz | tar xvf -
       This command creates a directory named DBI-VERSION.

    2. Change location into the top-level directory of the unpacked
       distribution:
shell> cd DBI-VERSION

    3. Build the distribution and compile everything:
shell> perl Makefile.PL
shell> make
shell> make test
shell> make install

   The make test command is important because it verifies that the
   module is working. Note that when you run that command during the
   DBD::mysql installation to exercise the interface code, the MySQL
   server must be running or the test fails.

   It is a good idea to rebuild and reinstall the DBD::mysql
   distribution whenever you install a new release of MySQL,
   particularly if you notice symptoms such as that all your DBI
   scripts fail after you upgrade MySQL.

   If you do not have access rights to install Perl modules in the
   system directory or if you want to install local Perl modules, the
   following reference may be useful:
   http://servers.digitaldaze.com/extensions/perl/modules.html#module
   s

   Look under the heading "Installing New Modules that Require
   Locally Installed Modules."

2.15.2. Installing ActiveState Perl on Windows

   On Windows, you should do the following to install the MySQL DBD
   module with ActiveState Perl:

    1. Get ActiveState Perl from
       http://www.activestate.com/Products/ActivePerl/ and install
       it.

    2. Open a console window (a "DOS window").

    3. If necessary, set the HTTP_proxy variable. For example, you
       might try a setting like this:
set HTTP_proxy=my.proxy.com:3128

    4. Start the PPM program:
C:\> C:\perl\bin\ppm.pl

    5. If you have not previously done so, install DBI:
ppm> install DBI

    6. If this succeeds, run the following command:
ppm> install DBD-mysql

   This procedure should work with ActiveState Perl 5.6 or newer.

   If you cannot get the procedure to work, you should install the
   MyODBC driver instead and connect to the MySQL server through
   ODBC:
use DBI;
$dbh= DBI->connect("DBI:ODBC:$dsn",$user,$password) ||
  die "Got error $DBI::errstr when connecting to $dsn\n";

2.15.3. Problems Using the Perl DBI/DBD Interface

   If Perl reports that it cannot find the ../mysql/mysql.so module,
   the problem is probably that Perl cannot locate the
   libmysqlclient.so shared library. You should be able to fix this
   problem by one of the following methods:

     * Compile the DBD::mysql distribution with perl Makefile.PL
       -static -config rather than perl Makefile.PL.

     * Copy libmysqlclient.so to the directory where your other
       shared libraries are located (probably /usr/lib or /lib).

     * Modify the -L options used to compile DBD::mysql to reflect
       the actual location of libmysqlclient.so.

     * On Linux, you can add the path name of the directory where
       libmysqlclient.so is located to the /etc/ld.so.conf file.

     * Add the path name of the directory where libmysqlclient.so is
       located to the LD_RUN_PATH environment variable. Some systems
       use LD_LIBRARY_PATH instead.

   Note that you may also need to modify the -L options if there are
   other libraries that the linker fails to find. For example, if the
   linker cannot find libc because it is in /lib and the link command
   specifies -L/usr/lib, change the -L option to -L/lib or add -L/lib
   to the existing link command.

   If you get the following errors from DBD::mysql, you are probably
   using gcc (or using an old binary compiled with gcc):
/usr/bin/perl: can't resolve symbol '__moddi3'
/usr/bin/perl: can't resolve symbol '__divdi3'

   Add -L/usr/lib/gcc-lib/... -lgcc to the link command when the
   mysql.so library gets built (check the output from make for
   mysql.so when you compile the Perl client). The -L option should
   specify the path name of the directory where libgcc.a is located
   on your system.

   Another cause of this problem may be that Perl and MySQL are not
   both compiled with gcc. In this case, you can solve the mismatch
   by compiling both with gcc.

   You may see the following error from DBD::mysql when you run the
   tests:
t/00base............install_driver(mysql) failed:
Can't load '../blib/arch/auto/DBD/mysql/mysql.so' for module DBD::mys
ql:
../blib/arch/auto/DBD/mysql/mysql.so: undefined symbol:
uncompress at /usr/lib/perl5/5.00503/i586-linux/DynaLoader.pm line 16
9.

   This means that you need to include the -lz compression library on
   the link line. That can be done by changing the following line in
   the file lib/DBD/mysql/Install.pm:
$sysliblist .= " -lm";

   Change that line to:
$sysliblist .= " -lm -lz";

   After this, you must run make realclean and then proceed with the
   installation from the beginning.

   If you want to install DBI on SCO, you have to edit the Makefile
   in DBI-xxx and each subdirectory. Note that the following assumes
   gcc 2.95.2 or newer:
OLD:                                  NEW:
CC = cc                               CC = gcc
CCCDLFLAGS = -KPIC -W1,-Bexport       CCCDLFLAGS = -fpic
CCDLFLAGS = -wl,-Bexport              CCDLFLAGS =

LD = ld                               LD = gcc -G -fpic
LDDLFLAGS = -G -L/usr/local/lib       LDDLFLAGS = -L/usr/local/lib
LDFLAGS = -belf -L/usr/local/lib      LDFLAGS = -L/usr/local/lib

LD = ld                               LD = gcc -G -fpic
OPTIMISE = -Od                        OPTIMISE = -O1

OLD:
CCCFLAGS = -belf -dy -w0 -U M_XENIX -DPERL_SCO5 -I/usr/local/include

NEW:
CCFLAGS = -U M_XENIX -DPERL_SCO5 -I/usr/local/include

   These changes are necessary because the Perl dynaloader does not
   load the DBI modules if they were compiled with icc or cc.

   If you want to use the Perl module on a system that does not
   support dynamic linking (such as SCO), you can generate a static
   version of Perl that includes DBI and DBD::mysql. The way this
   works is that you generate a version of Perl with the DBI code
   linked in and install it on top of your current Perl. Then you use
   that to build a version of Perl that additionally has the DBD code
   linked in, and install that.

   On SCO, you must have the following environment variables set:
LD_LIBRARY_PATH=/lib:/usr/lib:/usr/local/lib:/usr/progressive/lib

   Or:
LD_LIBRARY_PATH=/usr/lib:/lib:/usr/local/lib:/usr/ccs/lib:\
    /usr/progressive/lib:/usr/skunk/lib
LIBPATH=/usr/lib:/lib:/usr/local/lib:/usr/ccs/lib:\
    /usr/progressive/lib:/usr/skunk/lib
MANPATH=scohelp:/usr/man:/usr/local1/man:/usr/local/man:\
    /usr/skunk/man:

   First, create a Perl that includes a statically linked DBI module
   by running these commands in the directory where your DBI
   distribution is located:
shell> perl Makefile.PL -static -config
shell> make
shell> make install
shell> make perl

   Then you must install the new Perl. The output of make perl
   indicates the exact make command you need to execute to perform
   the installation. On SCO, this is make -f Makefile.aperl inst_perl
   MAP_TARGET=perl.

   Next, use the just-created Perl to create another Perl that also
   includes a statically linked DBD::mysql by running these commands
   in the directory where your DBD::mysql distribution is located:
shell> perl Makefile.PL -static -config
shell> make
shell> make install
shell> make perl

   Finally, you should install this new Perl. Again, the output of
   make perl indicates the command to use.
